Authors
Seth Bookey
Number of Reviews
113

Title
Review for Queen Kelly (1929)
I am a fan of silent film director Eric von Stroheim and yet I had never
seen his incomplete work, Queen Kelly. Intented to be five hours long, it
was only half finished, and released in the 1980s with titles and stills
to fill in the story. Regarless of the uncompleted film, what remains is
stunning, haunting, and compelling. I literally could not be moved from my
seat from the time Wolfram enters the convent to the time Kelly leaves the
palace.
The storyline is fairly simple. A prince of Coburg-Nassau, "Wild" Wolfram,
meets schoolgirl Patricia Kelly (Gloria Swanson) one day while leading his
cavalry on horseback. A free-spirited baudy exchange ensues (baudy by 1928
standards). The reverend mother sends her to bed without any
supper. Meanwhile, Wolfram is betrothed to marry the mad Queen, Regina
V. They clearly don't like one another, but they are getting married. The
best line in this silent film: "I have a surprise for you," says
Regina. Wolfram replies, "It must be very unpleasant, otherwise you
wouldn't be so cheerful."
But Wolfram falls madly in love with Kelly, at first sight, and must see
her, even though it's the night before his wedding. What ensues from her
through the end of the movie is some of the best filmwork of the silent
era. The pantomime acting was by then an artform, and von Stroheim's
penchant for extravagance is not abated here. Considering it was 1928,
some of the visual effects are quite dazzling.
Kelly is chased from the palace by the mad queen (Seena Owen) in a true
fetishistic von Stroheim fashion, and later winds up being summoned to
German East Afrika to the bedside of her dying aunt. It turns out the aunt
ran a brothel. 
In the only extant sequence in the African portion of the film, the
reptilian Jan, an old degenerate on crutches, schemes to take over the
brothel and winds up marrying Kelly, quite literally, over the dying aunt.
The scene is fantastic: Kelly and Jan on one side and a black Roman
Catholic priest with black alterboys on the other. I can only imagine the
implication to a white audience of a black priest ordaining an unholy
alliance between a convent girl and a despicable, criminal schemer who
wants to get control of the brothel. As in Greed, von Stroheim's other
altered masterpiece, the simultaneity of a wedding and a funeral is both
funny and horrifying (in Greed, a funeral procession is shown behind a
pries marrying McTeague and Trina; here, the priest has just performed
ultimate unction (last rites) on the aunt, and then marries then with the
dying woman between them).
Incomplete thought it might be, what is available is a testament to what
some call the inescapable wordless wonderment that was the silent movie,
the beautiful black and white lost world of the cinema.
NB: The European and American versions have differing storylines and
endings.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Seen 19 June 1998 with Nicole for $8.75 at the Cineplex Odeon Chelsea
There are two kinds of people in this world. Those who are fans of the TV
series The X Files and those who don't get it. But the truth is now out
there. Either category of person is going to be a bit baffled or
disappointed by the film, albeit for different reasons.
The good news is that it's not a bad movie. As action-adventure goes, it
succeeds and it's definitely a smart one. X Files novice Byron points out
that Special Agent Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) is a very perceptive
detective. The rapport with Special Agent Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson)
is deep. So are the paranoia and the conspiracies. So are the colors. That
brings me to my favorite part of the movie. 
Director Rob Bowman finally gets to bring the same exciting filming we see
on the small screen to the big screen. The filming is clearly inspired by
the big screen and forerunning series like David Lynch's *Twin Peaks*. The
films combines the action aspects with deep colors--illuminated bubble
structures agains a night sky and a velvety green cornfield; lights and
shadows in a prehistoric ice cave; the brilliant whites of Antarctica. The
only time the film looks flat is when they film in modern-day North Texas.
Bowman's lens can be undone, and it is--by drab beiges and tans of the
dust bowl.
But the story: Well, as the tagline reveals, "The truth is revealed," but
not all the answers the devoted viewers are expecting. But, some of the
basics of the dragged-out five-year plot is revealed. There *are* aliens,
and those old white guys *are* involved in some muddled conspiracy with
them. Also problematic are some plot issues, like how do two people
stranded in Antarctica suddenly wind up back in DC safe and sound? But,
there is a lot of suspense and a sufficient amount of gore to keep you
interested and cringing for two hours. The special effects are pretty good
(note the black oil taking over the boy in the beginning), but the set
from the big finale looks like every big space-monster movie set we've
been seeing lately.
A lot of regular cast members appear here in their usual demeanor: The
Cigarette-Smoking Man (William B. Davis), Skinner (Mitch Pileggi), The
Well-Manicured Man (John Neville) are all here, but other characters like
Crychek and the Morphing Man (Roy Thinnes) are not here.  There are some
notable additions to the cast--Blythe Danner appears twice as the
investigating Assistant Director Jana Cassidy, Armin Mueller-Stahl is one
of the conspirators, Terry O'Quinn (of Millenium) is an FBI agent, and
Glenn Headly is a barmaid who cuts off Mulder. The most wasted talent here
is probably Martin Landau, as the conspiracy theorist Alvin Kurzweil, who
perfectly good in his limited role of skulking around urine-drenched
alleys talking with Mulder and dropping him some clues.
So, the choice is yours. Fans of the show are likely to be seeing this one
day, if not now, on video. I would advise them to see it on the big
screen. But, don't expect a lot of answers about green gel blood and
Mulder's abducted sister. You won't get them.
Best Moment in the Film: Scully and Mulder are at a desert crossroads,
wondering what to do--go left or right. It is a defining moment that
typifies everything about the show and the two agents and their
relationship. 
Written by Chris Carter and Frank Spotnitz, cinematography by Ward
Russell, original music by Mark Snow, production design by Christopher
Nowak, film editing by Stephen Mark.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Seen on 20 December 1997 with Lynne and Sandy at the Great Neck Squire for
$24 for their birthdays. 
Sequels, especially to successful horror movies, are renowned for their
failure to retain the spirit and character of the original. But, director
Wes Craven and writer Kevin Williamson have teamed up again and created
not only a sequel that stands up on its own, but another effective horror
movie. 
It's a year after the murders in *Scream*, and a movie, "Stab", is
capitalizing on the sensationalism. This puts the spotlight on Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell) again, and it puts her in danger again, as
murders mirroring the incidents from the year before start happening
around the campus. Also back from the original are Jamie Kennedy as the
geeky Randy Meeks, David Arquette as the bumbling deputy Dewey Riley,
Courteney Cox as the ambitious TV reporter (and "Stab" author) Gale
Weathers, and Liev Schreiber as the innocent victim and possible killer
Cotton Weary. 
There are also a lot of newcomers, and a lot of dead people by the end of
the movie.
There is also a lot of parodying from other horror movies, and from
*Scream* itself. Having seen *Scream* is a plus, but I think *Scream 2*
succeeds on its own. But, if you saw the first movie, seeing Tori Spelling
recreating the opening of Scream in the opening of "Stab," it's a lot more
fun--more than just how funny it is seeing Tori Spelling in *anything.* 
Unlike most horror movies, *Scream 2* actually shows the intelligence of
its creators in the dialogue and the cinematography. Added but not
necessary are discussions of sequels that were better than the originals,
the film within a film, Gale being hounded by grade-B local reporter
Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf), and the terror for Sidney as she is
surrounded by masked figures while rehearsing in a Greek tragedy. There is
also a wonderful scene where the killer has called his next victim on a
cellular phone while in the middle of a campus quad. 
I don't want to give too much away, so I'll just finish by saying that the
movie plays with the cliches without succumbing to them, and that the cast
really does a great job in this surprisingly literate film. It's always
wonderful to watch a movie of the genre created by people who love it.
The only thing I didn't like about the movie was its title. I would've
liked any of the alternate working titles: *Scream Again*, *Scream
Louder*, or *Scream: The Sequel*. Then there's my idea: *Keep Screaming*. 
Apparently, there is a Scream 3 in the works. Let's hope it lives up to
its two predecessors. 
Also starring Sarah Michelle Gellar, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Jada
Pinkett, Omar Epps, Rebecca Gayheart, and Malcolm McDowell as the film
professor. Cinematography by Peter Deming.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Hamam (1997)
Review of Hamam (1997, Italian and Turkish with English subtitles; a/k/a
Steam: The Turkish Bath)
"Go like the tide and come back like the tide," says a Turk to a visiting
Italian in Istanbul. That's the tone of *Hamam*. Life is slow and easy in
this crowded, ancient corner of Istanbul (not Constantinople), and
presented as a pleasant alternative for the stressed out and skinny
Westerners looking to unwind, get real, and live fuller lives. 
Whether this is true or not of Turkey, this is the reality of *Hamam*.
Francesco (Alessandro Gassman) inherits a building in the Turkish capital
from an aunt he's never met. He leaves his shrill wife Marta (Francesca
D'Aloja) back in Italy while he goes to wrap up his aunt's affairs. But he
sure does take his time when he realizes three things. First, his property
included a steam bath, a hamam. Second, he discovers that Zozo (Zozo
Toledo), who is pressuring him to sell, is working for a woman who wants
to tear down the whole area and build a conference center and office
complex. Oh, third, he's gay. He figures this out when the son and
daughter of his aunt's servants eye him pruriently, and the son (Mehmet
Gunsar) wins. Shades of *Boudu Saved from Drowning*...
An interesting device is the narration of his aunt's letters to his
mother, which were returned unopened. "One must be happy in life; one
must," she tells her sister. They are estranged, but we never find out
why. Like a prescient Auntie Mame, she sees ahead to the adult Francesco
as someone with "eyes that see desires and strong arms to accomplish
them." And that's what happens. Once in the bosom of his aunt's servants'
family life, where he becomes one of them, he decides to restore the hamam
to its former glory; it faded as the hamam's went out of vogue, probably
due to indoor plumbing and increased Western influence. Francesco's
restoration efforts are seen with a voiceover of the aunt's letter that
details her own restoration of the building years earlier.
Because Italian moviegoers are treated to Intermission, the film had the
"part one/part two" markers. This is interesting, as it delineates two
distinct movements in the film: Istanbul's seduction of Francesco, and
having to face the wife with his new life when she turns up after
Francesco stays there a wee bit too long.
*Hamam* succeeds in its storytelling, accentuating the cultural
differences with humor (the Italians are told constantly they are too
skinny) and observation (women "share secrets" by yelling out the windows
to each other; circumcisions are a public event, but the boys are about
ten years old). The music is also very stirring, sweeping you up
feverishly in what seems like an otherwise quiet lifestyle.
Pushed to gay audiences with a sexy poster of two towel-clad men facing
away from the camera, very little sex, much less male pulchritude, is
offered to us. Pushed to straight audiences with a photo of the couple,
there is very little of them together until the second half.
Like *When the Cat's Away*, Hamam shows the small unsung joys of living in
a metropolitan enclave facing "urban renewal" and changes in a way of life
that doesn't need changing. And despite an appalling human rights record,
life in *Hamam*'s Turkey looks mighty appealing.
Directed by Ferzan Ozpetek and original music by Aldo De Scalzi and Pivio.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Seen on 14 June 1998 by myself for $5.50 at the SONY Loews Showplace
I am a real sucker. I cried at this movie. But remember that I cry during
everything. If children die, parents die, dogs or cats die, if any of them
come back from the other world to haunt and love you, if someone knows
they are dying and are having a final farewell, if something selfless and
devoted happens, I am there with Kleenex (TM). Heck, I cried during the
McDonalds commercial when they make that retarded kid they hired feel
important because they let him work there. So I am a big mushpot, okay? I
love a good movie and a good cry and it's nice when they coincide but they
can be mutually exclusive. Read on...
*Deep Impact* knows exactly how to manipulate the emotions. This is
essential since there is a variety of problems with the screenplay. The
first problem is that there are too many characters. The magic is that
they are able to manipulate a great deal of them into emotional situations
that an extinction-level event like a meteor hitting Western Canada will
bring.
Unfortunately, the main reason people go to these movies is to see the
destruction and the special effects, so the movie's best scenes appear in
commercials and the surprises are at a minimum. For example, the whole
beginning of the movie could have had more impact (no pun intended) if
they took the tack of MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) stumbling
onto something big first, and then showed the comet's discovery in
flashback.
So, we all know a huge comet is coming toward Earth. Luckily, President
Beck (Morgan Freeman) is hopeful that the big spaceship Messiah headed by
Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall) will be able to implant nuclear
warheads in the moving meteor by landing on it (sound pretty impossible,
eh?). His backup plan is "The Ark"--a huge cave that will house the best
minds in America (Europe apparently is on another planet) and people
selected by lottery. [The real sci-fi aspect is this: How did a black man
get elected to the Presidency in the present time? I don't expect to see
that in my own lifetime, and I'm a young liberal!] It's set in the
present, and being an anti-senior nation, no one older than 50 is allowed in
the tunnel. This poses a problem to Jenny, as her mother is played by
Vanessa Redgrave--a national treasure, for God's sake! It's an outrage!
Didn't anyone see Julia? Are we still mad about her PLO affections?
Someone should have made an exception. This country was built on making
exceptions.
Known for her work on the TV series *ER*, director Mimi Leder does a
pretty good job with a panoramic script that calls for nationalistic space
heroics involving an astronaut crew and their families, a teenage love
story and their two families, the reporter and her divorced parents and
all her coworkers, and a President who's married to a family we never
actually see and all the President's men. There is just way too much going
on here. Her successes, however, are the emotional tearjerker scenes, and
the scenes involving tension, as seen in the two space missions. These
required good direction and editing.
The actors do a pretty good job. Redgrave and Duvall are excellent as
always. Leoni is pretty good as well, considering this is her first lead
role in a summer blockbuster. Elijah Wood and Leelee Sobieski are good as
the teenage lovers, considering how little that story was shown. 
Two more problems: The movie is a commercial for NBC and MSNBC. Those
logos are throughout the film. Stars from *ER* and NBC--Ron Eldard and
Blair Underwood as two of the astronauts, and Laura Innes as Beth Stanley
are here also. The other problem is that the special effects are not all
that great. It's about two steps up from NRA Chairman Charlton Heston
parting the Red Sea in The Ten Commandments from the 1950s. Plus, knowing
a comet is heading to the Atlantic, why was anyone in NYC, much less
sitting leisurely reading a paper in Washington Square Park. I guess it's
more fun to destroy New York City when you get to see New Yorkers hurt
also. The only thing missing was a woman absentmindedly walking her baby
in a pram across Broadway while the tsunami wave is bearing down on her.
*Deep Impact* is best seen trapped in the theatre, in the full grasp of
it's manipulation. You'll laugh (unintentionally), you'll cry, you'll see
New York destroyed (again). Just try to pay less than full price.
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin. At least that's what they
called it.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Seen with Andrea and Byron for free on 12 August 1997 at Bryant Park. 
*Vertigo* is another movie that was lovingly restored recently and made
the rounds recently. *Vertigo*, it turns out, is a movie that is easily
seen and not heard. Hearing it is practically a formality, because the
real joy is in the viewing. 
As a Hitchcock fan and movie fan, I am even surprised at myself for saying
this. After all, it's a classic, a masterpiece. There is only one very big
problem with the movie. The story is absolutely ridiculous and
implausible. It's a narrative sieve upon inspection!
Police detective Scotty (James Stewart) has a nervous
breakdown following a rooftop chase in which he nearly died. He remains
acrophobic and quits the force. Even the top of a stepladder gets him
nervous and sweaty. He is hired by an old college friend to follow his
troubled wife Madeleine (Kim Novak) around town as she relives the tragic
last days of her disturbed birthgrandmother. Madeleine looks great, has
class, and is dying to kill herself. No big surprise when she falls off a
Spanish mission bell tower, leaving Scotty with a metric ton of guilt.
The pair fell in love and he sees her wherever he goes, at all the places
she used to haunt. No one is more surprised than Scotty when trashy Judy
(Kim Novak again) from Kansas City steps into view. Scotty obsesses on her
and tries to turn her into Madeleine. Actually, he does--same clothes,
hair and mannerisms. If this were filmed today, it would be a Sunday
"woman in distress"; movie starring Joanna Kern getting a court order
against Woody Harrelson entitled The Stalker Had Two Girlfriends. Two
women at the bus stop who never saw Vertigo before were not sure about
certain plot points, but agreed that Scotty "was crazy, right?"
Barbara Bel Geddes plays the innocent exgirlfriend bystander, bra designer
Midge. 
The true star of *Vertigo* is the meticulous placement and manipulation of
everything on the screen by Hitchcock. It is a lush pastel oasis. It is
beautifully filmed and even the hyperbolic parts (Scotty's dreams and
telling flashbacks) are effective. It is so hypnotically beautiful that
paying attention to the story actually gets in the way sometimes. It is
like a Japanese garden. Everything is perfectly placed. 
*Vertigo* languished unseen for years when Hitchcock died and it was part
of a probate process. It was re-released with great fanfare in 1984 along
with several other Hitchcock movies from the 1950s--including some with
star Stewart (*Rear Window*, *Rope*, and *The Man Who Knew Too Much*).
Others have noted that this is Jimmy Stewart's "darkest role." 
*Vertigo* is filmed in Vistavision for all its worth, and with
letterboxing, it has a chance to languish on TV. The music is absolutely
wonderful, scored by one of Hitchcock's best collaborators, Bernard
Herrmann (best remembered for his work on *Psycho*).
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More film reviews by Seth J. Bookey can be seen at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
  Seen on 20 April 1998 for $8.75 with Tony at the Village East Cinema.
   Wendy Wasserstein's screenplay of *The Object of My Affection* has
   borne out good movie. It's based upon Stephen McCauley's novel of the same
   name--one of my all-time favorites. The two works are, however,
   mutually exclusive. George Hansen (Paul Rudd) and Nina Barowski
   (Jennifer Aniston) are introduced awkwardly at a dinner party, when
   George's lover Joley (Tim Daly) breaks up with George via Nina. George
   discovers they have broken up when Nina offers him a place to stay in
   her Brooklyn apartment. Luckily, they soon become fast friends and
   actually get along much better with each other than they do their
   respective mates.
   When Nina becomes pregnant by the overbearing Vince (John Pankow), she
   ultimately decides she would rather have George raise the baby with
   her. What ensues is a struggle for George--wanting some form of
   fatherhood or a life of his own. Some people might object to the theme
   of the woman who goes over the unobtainable man because it's safer
   than facing her own issues (a la My Best Friend's Wedding). But, Nina
   comes to her own conclusions, and finds a way to be happy. There is
   also the overused device of ending the film in the future, and
   equalizing all the characters with fairy-tale happy endings. Expecting
   the movie to be completely awful, based on advance press and
   Wendy Wasserstein's admission that the George character was "a lump"
   and that she decided to play up the Nina story more, I was pleasantly
   surprised. Wasserstein's screenplay is both funny and touching, and
   the performances by Rudd and Aniston save this film from being a
   complete flop. In fact, Aniston's performance here alone was enough to
   win me as a fan. She's quite endearing.
   The supporting cast is also good: Tim Daly excels as the narcissistic
   Joley; Allison Janney as Nina's stepsister Connie and Alan Alda as
   Connie's husband do not overdo their comic roles. In fact, this is one
   of the first times I have not wanted to see Ald a shot to death on
   film (which he finally was in Murder at 1600). Nigel Hawthorne plays
   the older drama critic who points out to Nina, "What happens when all
   these homosexual men at your dinner table leave you for other men?"
   It's a nice change from the "lonely gay man" image.
   The weakest member of the cast is Amo Gulinello as Paul. It's hard to
   see why he and George get together and fall in love. It's pretty clear
   that he is only there to accentuate to Nina that George might not be
   hopeless devoted to her for long, as she grows very jealous.
   One frustration with this adaptation is that George was meant to be a
   lump--not a stud. There is little of MacCauley's sensibilities left in
   this story. Paul Rudd is one of the cutest actors alive, and he can
   also act. It's not difficult to see why both men and women would want
   to rope him in. He is actually cuter than most of the men Nina goes
   out with; why wouldn't she fall for him? It might have been more
   poignant of she fell for a man who was both gay and not absolutely
   stunning; Paul Rudd is the latter.
   Some of the best scenes are the ones in which Nina and George take
   dancing lessons. It showed both their growing fondness for one
   another, as well the passing seasons. Unfortunately, an otherwise
   funny and touching movie experience is marred by two very poor editing
   mistakes. One occurs when George and Paul go swimming, and the other
   is when we finally see Nina's baby born. It is obvious some
   last-minute editing was going on, and there is no excuse for such
   blunder in this day and age.
   Bottom line: If you feel you must choose, read the book. You will
   probably laugh a lot more at the self-deprecating humor of George.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
On the television series of the same name, Roger Moore and Ian Ogilvy
played the Saint as a Robin Hood via James Bond.  Not so in the latest,
cinematic version, where Simon Templar (Hollywood bete noire Val
Kilmer) uses his human fly and lockpicking services for the highest
bidders. But, as the prologue shows, no one can go though a cruel church
orphanage full of Dickensian horrors and a tragic event without a
conscience. So, when Tretiak, a Russian former Communist turned mob boss
and presidential candidate, employs him to steal the secret of cold fusion
from an American physicist at Oxford, Dr. Emma Russell (Elisabeth Shue),
he has a difficult time. A master of disguise and escape, The Saint
penetrates Emma's life, and surprises himself by falling for her. 
One of the biggest stars of the movie is Moscow. To my knowledge this is
the first big Hollywood movie to take full advantage of Moscow for its
backdrop--from the Kremlin and Red Square to Soviet-style apartment blocks
and subterranean mazes. The political intrigues and doublecrosses are not
contrived and for once, the real suspense is in the chases, not the
explosions (kept, gratefully, to a minimum). London and Berlin also
provide wonderful atmosphere. Most of the sites shown in this wintry film
evoke a lot of gray, somber tones. 
Val Kilmer puts in a good performance as The Saint, with a variety of disguises.
He seems believable as the mercenary daredevil who finally lets his conscience
dictate to him. Elisabeth Shue seems a bit too young and naive for the role
of the physicist. But, she seems addled enough throughout to be the scientist
suddenly tossed into skullduggery. The plot also avoids ending at a romantic
upswing and delivers a few last-minute surprises without being excessive.
Rade Serbedzija and Valeri Nikolayev are wonderful as the diabolical
father-and-son-duo, Ivan and Ilya Tretiak, respectively. Charlotte
Cornwall and Alun Armstrong are also very amusing in their roles of
Scotland Yard Detectives who are onto the Saint. 
TV has made much of the soundtrack, which does not seem so apparent during
the movie. At one point, during the initial love scene, a pop tune that
drifts in and out of the much better score is quite annoying.
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
Seth Bookey
sethbook@panix.com
Criticism         http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/mission.html
Family History         http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588

Title
Review for Vanina Vanini (1961)
(1961, Italy/France; Italian with gigantic English subtitles in the middle
of the screen; also known as The Betrayer)
Seen on 22 October 1997 at Symphony Space (second of a double feature)
Set in pre-Unification Italy, Vanina Vanini is the story of the love of a
young princess (Vanina Vanini) for a young revolutionary freemason
(Pietro). It is important to remember two things about this period. First,
this is an era when the Pope still owned large portions of land and led
considerable armies. Second, a freemason was seen as a heretic and was
considered persona non grata. 
The action begins in Rome, where Vanina and her maid Clelia discover that
her father Asdrubale has hidden a wounded Pietro from the authorities.
Pietro is full of revolutionary fervor and Vanina is a good Catholic.
Their love is *surely doomed*, especially since the Pope has declared it
open season on all freemasons -- and their little friends, too!
As a lavish costume drama, it works best when the movie is set in Rome.
There is a ball featuring the forbidden dance--not the lambada but the
waltz--and a lot of lubricious characters with witty dialogue.
Unfortunately, we do not stay in Rome for most of the time. The story
shifts north to Vanina's homeland, Romagna, which is quite spartan by
comparison. The dialogue goes from sparkling to rancid once they head
north. Their love story goes from touching to overbearing almost
instantly. Vanina is tortured with premarital sex-guilt. Pietro goes from
loving her to wanting to thrash her--you will want to join him. At best,
it is a B-level melodrama. Douglas Sirk did this sort of thing much
better. 
Since I was seeing an old print, it was unfortunate that the colors seemed
faded and many of the outdoor scenes washed out. Of course, since it was
filmed in 1961, my pet peeve, the poorly used zoom lens, is abused
throughout. All the outdoor shots are shabby and it's easy to see how
Italy wound up making Westerns. You half expect to see a tumbleweed roll
by. 
Asbrubale Vanini--the heroine's father--is not on screen nearly enough,
and he has the best lines. His friend the Contessa also would have been a
welcome addition, if only we had seen more of her.
It is hard to believe ths was directed by film great Roberto Rossellini. 
It also starred Jean-Claude Brialy, Martine Carol, Sandra Milo, Paolo
Stoppa, Laurent Terzieff
Based on the story Vanina Vanini by Stendhal.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Seen on 26 December 1997 for $8 with Wendy and Tony G. at the Paramus
Picture Show, of all places. 
Well, I should say right off that bat that despite two major objections, I
really enjoyed this movie. I should also add that there is so much going
on that I almost feel like I ought to see it a second time. 
*Deconstructing Harry* blurs the lines between the real lives of writer
Harry Block (Woody Allen) and the people in his life, and the characters
in his stories that are based on them. So, the pill-popping, sex-obsessed
Harry Block is also glimpsed in Bob, Ken (Richard Benjamin), Harvey
(Tobey Maguire), Paul (Stanley Tucci), and Mel (Robin Williams). 
Harry has a few ex-wives and ex-girlfriends who cannot deal with him and
his obsession with sex. His latest book details how he cheated on his wife
with her sister, and the latter shows up at his house ready to shoot him
for his thinly disguised portrayal of his betrayals. He has also been
invited to his alma mater, and--getting desperate--he winds up inviting
Cookie (Hazelle Goodman) to accompany him, just as she is. Mind you, she
is the prostitute dressed in a two-piece pink leather outfit who the night 
before Harry ordered to tie him up, beat him, and give him a blowjob.
Along the way, he brings an old friend, and his son. Throughout this
diegesis are flashes from his works of fiction, and flashbacks to Harry's
real life, and his imagination. 
All of this could be a frightening mish-mash, but Woody Allen has managed
to pull it all together rather well. This format also allows him to bring
out some hilarious and fantastic moments. Robin Williams is the actor who
is literally out of focus (a wonderful cinematic effect) and expects his
family to adjust to the distortion he has become. Joan, the psychiatrist,
has a hilarious scene in which she constantly leaves a patient so she can
yell at Harry in the next room for cheating on her. The visit to Ha Harry's
orthodox Jewish sister and brother-in-law. Two older women who share a
"dark secret" at a 1976 Bar Mitzvah reception with a Star Wars theme. 
There are many funny moments in *Deconstructing Harry* that make it worth
seeing. 
The performances are also very memorable, especially the womens'.
Actresses as disparate as Judy Davis and Kirstie Alley and Demi Moore
really stand out. The women suffer the brunt of Harry's behavior, and that
makes them a lot more interesting than the men.
The denouement of *Deconstructing Harry* does not measure up to the movie,
but that's okay, since the journey is more illuminating than the
destination. Also, the use of really hateful, foul language (the "C word"
is used more than once) is really beneath someone as smart as Woody Allen.
While it amplifies the misogyny of Harry, that misogyny is evident without
it. Some people would say it's brave of him to use this sort of language,
but I think it's an offensive easy way out. 
My other main objection is the heralding of the wonderful event--that
Woody has finally given a major role to a black actor. Hazelle Goodman is
absolutely hilarious, but she is playing the prostitute, Cookie! That the
"first major role for an black actor" in a Woody Allen movie is that of a
prostitute is insulting and a stereotype. A black actor could just as
easily have played one of Harry's friends in this movie, and been just as
important. Allen is often criticized that there are no black people in his
movies. The defense has been that the social class he depicts don't have
any interaction with blacks (which is hard to believe); so the only one
that gets this new status is a hooker?
Overall, *Deconstructing Harry* is the strongest movie Allen has put out
in years. The familiar themes of relationships, self-discovery,
self-hating Jews, atheism, are all here and are very entertaining. It's
hard not to disconnect Allen's movies from his real life, but either way,
it's an enjoyable, intelligent romp. 
Written and directed by Woody Allen cinematography by Carlo Di Palma, and
production design by Santo Loquasto. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Love, etc. (1996)
(France, 1996; French with English subtitles)
   *Love, etc.* is one of those artsy French films that give good French
   art films a bad name. It is full of uninteresting characters with
   incomprehensible motivations and a lot of annoying touches that are
   supposed to make it more "fascinating." Truffaut's Jules et Jim is the
   film to which this one is compared, but Jules et Jim it ain't.
   The hook in *Love, etc.* is the "odd couple" friendship of Benoit (Yvan
   Attal) and Pierre Thibault de Montalembert. The former is shy and odd,
   and not lucky with the ladies, while the latter is cocky and confident
   and usually arranged the blind dates. Personally, I thought Benoit was
   much cuter than Pierre, and I guess a zero of self-esteem makes him
   such a schlub that when he eventually meets Marie (Charlotte
   Gainsbourg) via a personal ad, it is Pierre's photo he sends to her.
   So, Benoit and Marie fall in love and get married, but something odd
   develops between Pierre and Marie. The film's most interesting moment,
   cinematically, is when the wedding photos are being taken and the
   three principal characters speak directly to the camera about how they
   are feeling, while the rest of the image is still.
   What ensues is painful: Pierre starts harassing Marie with
   protestations of love soon after the wedding. Eventually, Marie's
   resistance is broken and all three characters get twisted in the
   inevitable emotional wreckage.
   I guess what bothered me most about this movie was that it confirms
   every horrible feeling you have about humankind. It's horrible to see
   a "best friend" betray another, simply because he decides at the last
   minute he is in love with the man's wife. Marring the film also is the
   "artistic" inclusion of music that is supposed to be a fine little
   touch, but gets very annoying very quickly.
   The best performance belongs to Attal as the wronged husband and
   lonely soul, as he vents his rage on Marie and Pierre once he finds
   out he's been betrayed.
   THEATRE NOTE: Despite reserved seating and plush seats, and an
   attentive and courteous staff, a gaggle of annoying women still had to
   be shushed by yours truly during the dramatic highpoint of the film.
   This seems to be a worldwide phenomenon.
   Based on a novel by Julian Barnes. Directed by Marion Vernoux.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Mrs. Dalloway (1997)
"Marriage is a disaster, particularly for women!" announces young Sally
Seton (Lena Heady) to her friend, Clarissa Dalloway (Natascha McElhone),
as they spend the summer lazing around the latter's estate. This is what
Mrs. Dalloway (Vanessa Redgrave) remembers as she goes about her errands
the day of her big party--coming up that evening. Is it such a disaster,
though? That's part of what she considers forty years later, when she
looks back on her life and the people to whom she was close when she had
that conversation. There was her suitor Peter (Alan Cox), and Sally
(another suitor of sorts), and finally, the stuffy, boring, dull Richard
Dalloway (Robert Portal). Despite her exposure to different things and
ideas, Clarissa chooses the safest route possible--the one she can best
imagine herself following. Was it the right one? "I'm not even Clarissa
anymore--I'm Mrs. Dalloway," she realizes. 
*Mrs. Dalloway* explores this question while Clarissa goes about her
errands and meets callers and mulls things over in the diegetic time of
one day. Interwoven into this is the story of the shellshocked Septimus
Warren Smith (Rupert Graves), who sees ghosts from the Great War
everywhere, and for whom life is pretty unbearable. He and Clarissa don't
meet, but he plays a big part in her life that day. 
*Mrs. Dalloway* is a difficult movie to review. I almost would need to see
it a second time to give it the attention it deserves. The performances
are first rate--especially that of Vanessa Redgrave, who brought more to
Mission: Impossible with a crinkle of her nose than the entire cast every
could. The writing is also good. Thoughtful, yet funny.  Let's face it,
the stuffy mores and rituals of the British upper classes is very amusing
to late 20th Century Americans, and always will be.  Margaret Tyzack, as
the brutal Lady Bruton, is horrifying and hilarious as the aristocrat who
wants all unemployed young men sent to Canada if they cannot find jobs
within a year--and might have it happen, as she has the ear of Members of
Parliament. 
"Relationships are just scratches on the surface," is one conclusion
Clarissa eventually makes as she mulls over life, and her life. It's a
shattering statement, but accurate. Despite their hopes and thoughts for
her, Sally and Peter, forty years later, realize that perhaps Clarissa is
happy, even if they don't understand her choices, or even ever knew her at
all. This solitary contemplation of human nature is not for everyone, but
seeing *Mrs. Dalloway* is a worthy endeavour nonetheless. 
Directed with sensitivity by Marleen Gorris, Mrs. Dalloway's difficult
stream-of-consciousness is fathomed. The movie is a nice contrast to
Gorris' other big film, *Antonia's Line*, which followed several strong
women making their own choices and eschewing the world of men. 
Based on the novel by Virginia Woolf with screenplay by Eileen Atkins.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
In a summer with movies filled with explosions, chases, and stunts, it is
interesting to see a movie centered around a quiet beekeeper who faces an
equal amount of danger with grace and patience. 
Peter Fonda might have gone down in film history best known for being
Henry Fonda's son and having been in a film that influenced a generation
(Easy Rider); but now he will have made an indellible impression on
anybody who sees Ulee's Gold. Fonda has mentioned in interviews that
he emulated his father when preparing for this role. 
Ulysses Jackson spends his days and years as he always has; living in
central Florida, looking after his bees and keeping his family business
within the family. Ulee is raising two granddaughters--Casey and Penny.
Their father Jimmy is in jail and their mother, Helen, has left them to do
God only knows what in Orlando.
Life is humming along as it needs to until the sins of the son are visited
on the father as well as the rest of the clan. Ulysses winds up leaving
his bees at the most crucial time of the season when he is asked to go
retrieve Helen (Christine Dunford) from Orlando, where Eddie and
Ferris--two criminal associates of Jimmy's--have loaded her up on drugs,
or have taken advantage of her condition, and have discovered that Ulee
can find something they want. They make it clear that they will do harm to
the family if he doesn't comply. 
Of course, all of this is a red herring. Much like The 39 Steps, Ulee
learns that no man is an island. Ulee is forced to realize that sometimes,
you need to accept help, and help others. Shut down since his wife
Penelope has died, Ulee finds that he is going to have to trust someone,
and that someone is his tenant Connie Hope (Patricia Richardson), a doctor
who helps detox his daughter-in-law. Even while a dangerous situation
exists, Ulee continues his backbreaking labors, but gets help from his
granddaughters and even his daughter-in-law, slowly, one by one
Great performances are turned out by all. It was great to see Patricia
Richardson do something beyond the limitations of her role as Tim Allen's
wife on Home Improvement. Especially wonderful is Vanessa Zima as the
younger granddaughter, Penny. An rather wonderful scene is her description
to her mother of how the bees are sometimes scared and fly off, and have
to be brought back. Watch for it.
The movie makes some wonderful use of dissolves and jump cuts; they really
accentuate the monotony and continuity of the life Ulee leads in swampy
rural Florida. If the film has any fault, it is sparing the expenses on
sound. Some dialogue seems to get lost between regional dialect and/or
mumbling. Other than that, writer/director Victor Nunez.
P.S.: You get two extra points if you can think of a classical story in
which Ulysses must leave the stalwart Penelope to help find the lost
Helen.
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
  Seen with Byron for $3 on 21 August 1997 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide
   Something has survived, and it still stinks.
   A review of this movie would be pretty much similar to those for the
   first (Jurassic Park), except that this is even worse. To quote Bart
   Simpson, "it's crappy crap crap crap."
   Four years after the Lost World theme park was destroyed by
   genetically revived dinosaurs running amok, ruining a big investment,
   and killing a few people, it turns out "something has survived."
   Actually, it turns out dinosaurs were also bred on nearby on a nearby,
   also off Costa Rica. Sort of the alpha version of the Jurassic Park,
   which was destroyed many many opening weekends ago. The movie opens
   briskly by putting a little girl in jeopardy and then cuts away
   without showing what has happened to her. A bad sign.
   The principal character now is Dr. Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum), who
   winds up back on the island when John Hammond (Richard Attenborough)
   convinces Ian's girlfriend Dr. Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore) to
   document the dinosaurs in actions. She is a paleontologist on the go.
   Along with two other photographers, they are going to show what the
   island is like without man's interference. It turns out the bad folks
   at Ingen want to resurrect the theme park idea, where tourists would
   happily pay to see T-Rex--in San Diego.
   When the corporate bad guys show up, the movie takes the first of many
   tragic turns into laughability. It's a labyrinth of conflicting
   incohesive theme. The environmentalists versus the evil corporate
   slant. There are lots of ridiculous plots in here: Malcolm returning
   to do relay races with dinosaurs, now with stowaway black daughter in
   tow (putting a child at risk for "dramatic effect" is a longstanding
   cinema faux pas); Sarah's insisting on setting the broken leg of a
   baby T-Rex, not believing its Ma and Pa will hunt it down and actually
   be dangerous (this is when Byron exclaimed that she should be the
   first to get eaten); a T-Rex is holed up in the boat's cargo bay, so
   how does it kill people at the helm (leaving just a hand on the wheel)
   without any destruction on the ship?
   A slew of stereotypes ensue as well. The bad guys invariably have
   British accents, like Pete Postlewaite as Roland Tembo, whose dream is
   to hunt a buck T-Rex. Time for a new dream, bub. There's the wide-eyed
   black man running from the T-Rex in San Diego that evokes the
   "manservant" from jungle movies yelling "da Mummy is on da loose!"
   There's the mambo-listening hispanic inexplicably named "Carter."
   There are the panicky Asian tourists, with cameras, fleeing the T-Rex.
   I guess they only expect Godzilla in Tokyo.
   It's insulting to expect us to suspend all disbelife and care too. If
   you want to create a tense thriller with great special effects and
   lifelike dinosaurs, do that, but don't throw machismo, blended
   families and their traumas, conservation politics, and impossible
   feats of agility at us in a noisy mishmash. If grown men are plucked
   out of cars and torn asunder, can we really believe a 12-year-old girl
   can conquer an overgrown lizard with her gymnastics routine?
   The only worthwhile portion of the movie is the overlong scene where
   Sarah's life is literally hinging on the shattering of a windowpane.
   Of course it steals from other masters, but it works, until it goes on
   far longer than it should.
   The Lost World represents two hours plus that I can never reclaim,
   with an idiotic unendurable moralizing finale. Luckily, with Wondee
   Siam around the corner, we able to bolt the theatre and have something
   to look forward to.
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
Seen on 10 September 1997 for $0 at the SONY 19th Street
Every now and then there is a movie that absolutely astounds you, that
makes you think and wonder... how and why it every got made. Clearly,
there must be a special place in hell for the writers and producers of the
aptly named Excess Baggage.
This is possibly one of the worst movies I have ever witnessed. At one
point I was so bored I actually started counting loose singles and coins
in my back pocket. But I remained hopeful that perhaps Alicia Silverstone
(who plays the whiney Emily Hope) wou ld shine like she did in Clueless.
Well, it was a cloudy day for Alicia. 
The film features the "unlikely romance" (code words for unbelievably
stupid) of rich, spoiled Emily, who fakes her own kidnapping and locks
herself in her BMW's trunk, and Vincent (Benicio Del Toro), the car thief
who steals her car with her in it. In t he course of the following two
days, he tries to dump her, she persists in staying with him, and they are
pursued by Vincent's yuppie partner (Harry Connick Jr.), some criminals
(one played by the otherwise wonderful Nicholas Turturro), and Emily's
"uncle " Ray (the typecast, unhealthy looking Christopher Walken). 
Overall, for a nonstop rollicking chase movie, there are many torturously
slow moments, which get interrupted by "cool videolike sequences" and some
really dreadful dialogue like this: 
Emily:  My shirt is stained. My pen exploded. 
Vincent: They have postcards in the room. You can write on them. 
It is just so hard to believe someone actually wrote this crap. The other
major liability is the love interest: Benicio Del Toro, which roughly
translated means "good bull." He is barely comprehensible, which might
turn on some pre-teens out there, but he has gigantic carry-on bags under
his eyes. He looks like a heroin addict.  I am not sure who in casting
owed someone a favor, but that's one possible explanation for making him
the romantic lead. He is so bad, he makes Adrian Zmed look like Lawrence
Olivier.
Luckily, I paid zero dollars to see this movie, but I still feel like
someone owes me something. Don't see it, don't rent it; just watch it when
you're truly bored and have nothing better to do than watch USA's *Up All
Night*. 
Trashy Bonus: Excess Baggage features not one but two special homophobic
comments: Emily refers to Greg as Vincent's "faggot boyfriend" and Ray
later tells Emily that he doesn't want her surrounded in jail by
"sociopathic lesbians."
----------------
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com.
Other movie reviews with graphics can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Midnight in Savannah (????)
This two-hour documentary actually does the stories of Savannah much more
justice than the theatrical release *Midnight in the Garden of Good and
Evil*. 
Two things make this documentary superior to the forementioned movie. 
First, the facts are much more interesting than their dramatization.
Second, more facets of the book are covered than the movie does. 
In real life, and in the book, the trial of Jim Williams was actually four
trials that covered eight years. Apparently, no murder trail has gone four
rounds. In the end, Williams gets off on a technicality, with legal
maneuvers that blame the policework--the forerunner of the OJ Simpson
defense.
We also get to see a variety of points of view. Not just the other real
people behind the characters in the novel, but also other Savannah
citizens and their opinion of the book that has put their town on the map
and made it a tourism center. Many old-time Savannah residents resent the
negative effects of schlocky gift shops and trolley-style tour buses
running around the old part of town.
Also, the documentary also does a better job of showing how beautiful the
old part of town is. One would have hoped Clint Eastwood would have shown
more of this in the theatrical movie.
If you have a chance to see the documentary, do. It is a nice counterpart
to the book, which is also worth experiencing.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
  Seen at the SONY/Loews Bay Terrace on 23 May 1997 with Lynne and Sandy for
  $8.
   There is a lot to be said for escapist entertainment. Even if it
   amounts to a 90-minute courteous, if it is done well, if it is a "taut
   thriller," it will work. Especially after the latest round of
   downsizing at work before a three-day weekend. It also teaches us a
   few things, like don't take your cell phone out of range, and don't
   worry about your Grand Cherokee Jeep more than you worry about your
   wife.
   The action starts fairly quickly when Jeff Taylor (Kurt
   Russell) and his wife Amy (Kathleen Quinlan) narrowly miss sideswiping
   a beat-up pick-up truck in the Arizona desert. Soon after a tense
   confrontation at the next gas station, the Taylor's spanking new Jeep
   breaks down in the middle of nowhere, and "helpful" trucker Red Barr
   (JT Walsh) offers to take them to the next truck stop, Belle's, where
   a tow truck can be contacted. Jeffrey finally figures out what is
   wrong with his new Jeep, fixes it, and goes to Belle's. However, Ann
   is nowhere to be found, and no one recalls seeing her or the trucker.
   The police are not all that helpful, and the adventure continues apace
   from there.
   The film has two major assets. First, the story never lets
   up. Despite many calls for suspension of disbelief, the suspense and
   tension are constantly keeping the viewers wondering what will happen.
   My sister-in-law almost didn't make it through the viewing, and our
   seats were stationary. The second major asset is the location
   shooting. The entire movie is set against the vastness of the American
   Southwest's desolateness, and its highways. For example, as the film
   opens, the car is humming along at 80 mph but the rocks out the driver
   window never seem to move--they are huge mountains so far off but so
   massive that the car practically stands still.
   Even the rather interesting opening credit sequence echoes
   that very bizarre feeling of a detailed map to the middle of nowhere,
   with names of towns that you have never heard of and will never
   see--and that you wouldn't know how to leave if you were suddenly
   plunked down there. The biggest town in the movie is Population 200.
   Kurt Russell succeeds in playing the Boston yuppie lost among small
   town people, none of whom he can trust, and JT Walsh as the malefactor
   who relishes taking advantage of just such folks. Also noteworthy is
   Jack Noseworthy, who plays Billy, a co-conspirator of Red's. Most
   audiences can identify with Russell, since most people in the same
   situation would feel just as helpless as he does through a lot of the
   movie.
   The general lawlessness of the road and west make the conclusion
   inevitable, but even so, viewers are left as the film began--desolate
   on the road. [Compare this film to La Ceremonie.]
------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Ermo (1994)
Hong Kong, 1994; Chinese with English subtitles
Ermo is the much younger wife of a former village "chief" who is trying,
in rural Chinese fashion, to keep up with the Joneses. The town is nestled
in the mountains and is accessible by a long winding mountain road. All
the houses are about ten feet apart from each other. Ermo, her husband and
son live in a comfortable house, but their neighbor--"Blindman"--is a
successful hauler and has a TV. The only TV in the village. Tiger, Ermo's
son, is constantly over there watching the tube
Ermo spends long days in physical labor, weaving baskets and making twisty
noodles. She then trudges into the closest larger town to sell her wares. 
She is determined and will not be bargained down her selling prices. She
endures the insults of Blindman's wife and eventually decides that she is
going to make enough money to buy the biggest TV in the county, one even
the county chief does not have. This leads her to eventually working in
the city as a noodle maker at a restaurant, and even living away from home
so she can make as much money as she can and not waste time commuting. She
even starts selling blood for money, at an alarming rate. Another evil
enters the picture as well: Blindman, who constantly complains of his
"fat, slack-assed wife" is paying Ermo a lot of mind, and making the
career suggestions that keep her from her home
Ermo is a tedious cross between Madame Bovary and Sunrise. It is hard to
know whether or not it is the cultural differences that make it a less
than compelling experience, or if it is in fact just slow moving and
unempathetic. The movie clearly moralizes that the best things in life are
free. That Ermo sinks to demeaning depths all for the sake of buying a
29-inch TV set really hits you over the head. 
China is undergoing a major cultural change as free-market influences
force rural dwellers into facing the 20th Century. Ermo's husband was once
the Communist chief of the village. He keeps reminding everyone that he is
no longer the chief when he is called by that nickname. It is clear that
having what you need and living communally has been replaced by the art of
the deal and having it all. If nothing else, Ermo provides a glimpse of
what sort of mindset and circumstances a tremendous percentage of the
global population possess.  If most Chinese villages are like the one in
Ermo, you can easily understand why the news of Tianenmen Square was
easily propagandized; what you cannot see or hear, you cannot think about. 
Ermo, like many women she probably represents, is naive and the best parts
of the movie are when she "visits" the TV she intends to buy, wondering if
the TV has forgotten Chinese when foreign language programs, and hoping it
does not "wear out" by the time she has saved up enough yuan to buy it. 
God only knows what she would do when she finds out about VCRs. 
Was it all worth it for Ermo? In many ways, the final moments of the film
answer that question very well. 
More reviews by Seth Bookey are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html
Copyright (c); 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021 USA,
sethbook@panix.com. 

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
Seen on 4 September 1997 with Andrea for $8.75 at the East 86th Street Theatre
*Mimic*, for me, is a case of really wanting to like a movie and really
looking forward to it and eventually realizing how idiotic that sort of
optimism can be. 
I was given ample warning way back when I saw Batman & Robin, when a young
man, clipboard in hand, outside the theatre was giving away preview
screening passes for Mimic. You had to be 17-34 years old to enter. By the
time I called the RSVP number, they only wanted 17-24 years. So, I was
washed up at 33... 
*Mimic* starts off very strong; the opening credits were marvellous. An
entomologist's dream and a creepy sequence for the rest of us, with sharp
crisp images and slightly blurry, inky American Typewriter font. The mood
continued with dark set design and evocative sets that showed New York
City in crisis; children were falling prey to Strickler's Disease, which
brings Susan Tyler (Mira Sorvino) to NYC. 
To kill the Strickler's Disease, which is borne by cockroaches, Susan and
Peter (Jeremy Northam) genetically engineer a new insect, the "Judas
breed." It is supposed to kill the cockroaches that kill the children, and
then die out within a generation. Unf ortunately, that does not happen,
and three years later, some perplexing, frightening evidence shows up that
points to the Judas breed's survival. 
Up to this point, the movie is sufficiently creepy, and engaging. The CDC
workers are being shadowed by a dark figure who is able to hang
upside-down from ceilings, jump off buildings, etc. But there is some
mysterious moviemaking law that states that hal fway through a decent
creature feature all sense and writing goes out the window and it turns
into a Die Hard film. 
Once the CDC investigators (including Josh Brolin) actually get close to
their prey, the whole film converts itself from smart thriller to splatter
fest. Some people are killed instantly, some are "saved for later"--that
is one of many facets that make no sense. A lot of the peripheral
characters who could be interesting get lost in the shuffle--F. Murray
Abraham as a fellow entomologist, Giancarlo Giannini as the immigrant
shoeshiner, Alexander Goodwin as the strange "special" Chuy (Retarded?
Autistic? We never quite find out what his problem is). Charles Dutton is
completely wasted as Leonard, the ornery subway cop, who, by the way,
should have a police radio on him, but doesn't. That alone is a major
gaffe. They spend a good part of the film "seven sto ries underground" but
there is ample sunlight. I could go on, but why bother?
In the end, what happens in Mimic makes little or no sense, the audience
seemed to agree with my unspoken "enough already." Perhaps even
17-year-olds are not so easily fooled.
Pet Peeve: A lot of kids are harmed here, in a gratuitous way. Very
unappealing.  
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com.
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Broadway Damage (1997)
Seen 30 May 1998 for $8 with Andrea at the Quad Cinema
"Greetings from Greenwich Village" is the subtitle to this bubbly little
independent film, written, edited, and directed by Victor Mignatti.
Considering it's practically a one-man show, it can be forgiven its flaws.
In fact, it's lucky it got made at all,
 in all likelihood. 
*Broadway Damage* presents us with two young people starting out. Marc
(Michael Lucas)  is a cute young gay man, would-be actor, and Cynthia
(Mara Hobel) is his fabulous female friend who does not let more than a
few extra pounds get in the way of self-esteem or her dream to work for
New Yorker editor Tina Brown. She thinks she's better than entry level,
and doesn't try too hard to do anything but try getting an interview with
Ms. Brown in a variety of inventive methods. 
"Broadway damage" is acting jargon I didn't fully understand, but I think
it refers to those would-be actors who are particularly stuck on the idea
of performing live on stage. Throughout the film we see Marc and his
friend Robert (Aaron Williams) getting feedback from a drama coach as
they recite lines or sing. Robert is stuck on Marc and with his goofy
Gilligan-style hat and glasses he is the "nerd" role in the movie. While
pining away for Marc, he attempts to woo a hunky, bespectacled,
Monet-loving, Zola-reading clerk in a kitschy card store. 
Meanwhile, Marc falls in love with neighbor David (Hugh Panaro), whom he
spots in a backing building visible from his fire escape. Hearing him sing
a song helps him fall a bit harder. But David is involved in a
relationship, and as the story progresses, David turns out not to be at
all what he seems. 
*Broadway Damage* is light, fluffy entertainment; it provides a lot of
amusing little moments and more than a few stereotypes along the way. But
the audience (98% gay) seemed to love it nonetheless. Mara Hobel, best
known for playing the Christina Crawford as a child role in Mommie
Dearest, is the stereotypical fat girl fag hag; Marc is a "ten" but
doesn't think so--"my arms aren't big enough"; Robert loves Sondheim, of
course. The movie has a curious throwback quality. Finding an dilapidated
apartment via obituaries is something straight out of a 1970s sitcom.
Didn't Oscar and Felix have to do this once? Nary a mention of AIDS. Just
frivolous amusement all the way. Costumes and interior design are more
important here than cinematography, which is rather basic. 
I could go on about "why are these people friends?" but why? Yes, it's odd
that they are friends but no one knows the clothes hound Cynthia comes
from a family that's stinkin' rich. But it's all so amusing--at least at
the time. Broadway Damage shows young people starting out in life and
love. Mostly gay. Hearts broken and rebuilt along the way. Possibly the
biggest problem they have in life is a mouse and rat problem in their
hovel. It doesn't take itself too seriously and neither should you. Go and
enjoy it. Class dismissed.
TOILET NOTE: There were just three women in this audience, and they were
thrilled to discover that for once, there was no long line at the Ladies'
Room. A once-in-a-lifetime event.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Soul Food (1997)
The theme of a special persn who keeps a fractious family together is
certainly nothing new; nor is the theme of the loving Grandmother.  *Soul
Food* is able to make these tried and true ideas seem fresh and special.
Narrated by young Ahmad (Brandon Hammond), he comments that "Big Mama"
(Irma P. Hall) had a way to let you know you were her favorite. He also
realizes that she was able to make everyone feel that way. He also tells
us she had no enemies; if she did, she would just invite them over for
Sunday Dinner and the enmity would be buried under heaping helpings of
collard greens and egg pie (to name but a few).
The Sunday dinners, the family house, and the effort Big Mama puts into
maintaining both help keep her three daughters from continuous fighting. 
Teri (Vanessa Williams) is a driven attorney married to another attorney
(Miles, played by Michael Beach of ER) who wants to quit and become a
musician. Teri never misses an opportunity to remind Maxine (Viveca Fox,
playing Ahmad's mother) how much money she contributes toward their
mother. However, Maxine is recognized as "the strong one." Bird (Nia
Peeples) is married to an ex-con (Lem, played by Mekhi Phifer), and is
running her own beauty salon with help from Teri.
Rounding out the family are mysterious and unseen Uncle Pete, the hermit
upstairs who takes his meals upstairs, and the ironically named Faith
(Gina Ravera--who gets to show more of her talent here than in Kiss the
Girls), Big Mama's screw-up niece who is a stripper turned serious dancer,
and whose arrival means trouble for a few people.
Without giving away too much of the plot, I can say that a crisis spurs a
variety of problems to devolve horribly--problems that probably would have
been avoided if people just spoke to each other. 
Along the way, a lot of issues are explored: unemployment, male-female
relations, the importance of family and role models, and having dreams,
however simple they might be. The movie tempers its dramatic moments with
a lot of humor, and even stops twice to provide some musical moments. A
real lump-in-the-throat moment was shattered when Linda leaned over and
said, "Here's where you lose it, right?" (She was right.) There really is
something for everyone in *Soul Food*.
*Soul Food* earned a respectable number-two spot at the box office its
first weekend at theatres. This is especially respectable when you
consider how much profit was made compared to the special effects fiesta
that was in the number-one slot: The Peacemaker. While it obviously grew a
large black audience, it has also drew large audiences in general. The
theme of having a special relationship with a loving Grandmother and
Matriarch is a winner, and when it is done without heavy-handedness like
it was in *Soul Food*, a good time will be had by all. 
There is also a nice little Soul Food Website at
http://www.foxmovies.com/soulfood/. 

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Seen on 5 July 1996 with Andrea and Kerry at the Ziegfield for $8.50. Also
seen repeatedly on HBO in June 1997. 
After months of watching previews for *Independence Day* it was clear that
I would be seeing it whether I wanted to or not. Gigantic space ships
looming over great cities, worried citizens looking skyward, and every
landmark familiar to us blown to smithereens. While watching one preview
months earlier, the White House is blown up and at least one exuberant
audience member exclaimed "Sign me up!" 
Like movies before and after it, the special effects and the previews were
the true stars of the show. Did you go to Towering Inferno to see Fred
Astaire pet a cat? Did you sit through Earthquake to see Ava Gardner throw
barbs at Charlton Heston? I didn't think so.
Consequently, you didn't go to *Independence Day* to see Jeff Goldblum
chomp on a cigar; you went to see the Capitol blown to bits. I was hoping
for the IRS building, but no dice.
It is clear now why the stars of the movie were not prominently featured
in the previews. The entire story is subordinate to the special effects.
The biggest let down in Independence Day is the opportunity to make the
movie something more than a jingoistic flag waving epic in which only an
American can think up a way to beat the aliens (that it takes a minorities
to do it is something at least). It is also disappointing that after all
the build-up to see the aliens, they are two dimensional as well. Their
entire dialogue and mission is limited to about three or four words,
indicated they are simply evil and bellicose.
Like I said, the buildup is terrific and the let down tremendous. The best
scenes after the aliens start microwaving the world's great cities occur
in the "notorious" Area 51 in the subterranean lab the government has kept
secret all these decades. But it all ends in macho swagger. Oy gevalt. 
The cast is good but not stellar. The comic talents of Judd Hirsch,
Margaret Colin, and Harvey Fierstein do go a long way to temper the
general testosterone nonsense perpetuated by Will Smith, Bill Pullman,
Jeff Goldblum, Robert Loggia and a host of others; and if Randy Quaid was
included to make sure we were annoyed, mission accomplished. 
In anachronistic retrospect, Contact and Men in Black are preferable.
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey are available at 
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html.

Title
Review for Hol volt, hol nem volt (1987)
(also known as Hol volt, hol nem volt; Hungarian with English subtitles,
black and white) 
I read a description of this film in 1989, and I had dreamed of seeing it
ever since. So, I was very excited to see the movie on the Walter Reade
Theatre's schedule for *Somewhere in Europe*, a festival of Hungarian
films from a variety of decades.
The problem with a dream come true is that the dream is often better than
reality, and that you are better left with your illusions. 
*Hungarian Fairy Tale* is the story of Andris, a boy whose father is
absent and whose mother is tragically killed in a street mishap. Andris
Orban "knows" his father's name--but it is the name that a bureaucrat
chose for him. According to the director (who was present at the
screening), there actually was a law in Hungary that demanded a fake name
be given to children conceived out of wedlock when the father was unknown
or unnamed. As is often the case in the old Eastern bloc, lies have a way
of ripening and coming to term when you least expect them to. So, upon the
death of his mother, Andris decides to seek out his father in the small
town where his birth certifcate says he can find him. This seems a better
idea than being sent to a state-run orphanage.
The film starts out strong, with dreamlike scenes of the first moments of
romance between Andris's parents. They meet at a performance of the Magic
Flute, where she has just sung her solo. The black and white scenes of the
couple walking around Budapest at night are really spectacular.  Also, the
scenes of Andris hiding out inhis apartment, and hoping his mythical
father will show up there are very stirring and tense.
But then Andris goes to the small town where his father is supposed to
live. He winds up hungry, and holds up a woman in her own home for food. 
Meanwhile, the bureaucrat who signed Andris's certificate is having a wee
nervous breakdown, and starts collecting all the papers he processed and
burns them.
It is possible that cultural differences have made this highly allegorical
film difficult to understand and enjoy. The significance of a bureaucrat
and his victim in communist Hungary is probably more potent for a native
audience. However, the big problem, I think from any standpoint, is the
odd finale. Why the three principal characters wind up together is not
easy to figure out. Also, the really awful special effects at the symbolic
ending really mar the film. It's almost like watching two different films
when you contrast the chase scenes at the end to the romantic, richly
photographed finale. 
The best performance is clearly that of David Vermes, who plays Andris.
Maria Varga performance as his mother Maria is also very touching and
loving.
Add a star if you know Hungarian; half a star if you really are familar
with Hungarian 20th Century history. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Histoire d'Adle H., L' (1975)
(The Story of Adele H, French with English subtitles)
Seen on 22 October 1997 for $8 at Symphony Space (part of a double feature
with *Vanina Vanini*)
Perhaps what is most shocking about this movie is its statement that "this
story is true." Adele H is Adele Hugo, the daughter of French poet and
novelist Victor Hugo, one of the most famous men of his time. Having read
a bit about the true story, it is interesting to actually see its
dramatization.
The story begins in 1863 in Halifax, Nova Scotia. Adele (Isabelle Adjani)
arrives looking for that object of her affection, Lt. Albert Pinson, who
is stationed there as part of Her Majesty's armed forces. The two met on
the Channel Island of Guernsey, where her father lived in exile after
Napoleon III overthrew the French Republic.
Albert, a ladies' man, gets more than he bargained for when he trifles
with Adele's heart. She is determined to get him to return her affections.
She goes by a pseudonym, living as a boarder of the kind Mrs. Saunders
(Sylvia Marriott), and using it as a base for her machinations. There is
very little Adele will not put herself and ALbert  through--spying,
blackmail, public humiliation, even procuring young women for Albert if he
will not have her. 
At night, Adele paces the floors and prays to a shrine with Albert's photo
enclosed within. She rapidly deteriorates as she pursues Love as religion.
It is painful to watch her beg Albert "Keep me!"
Adele suffers a complete identity crisis. She is named after her (living)
mother; her father is larger than life. Making matters worse is the
drowning death of her sister Leopoldine, the family favorite. A desire to
make an impression and stand out as an individual in such a family would
be understandable; but the depths of her tragedy are unimaginable.
Adele Hugo's diaries were not discovered until the 1960s. She wrote in her
own secret language of her obsessive desire to make the Lieutenant love
her. It is easy to see why Francois Truffaut would be so fascinated that
he would make a movie about it. 
It is also easy to see why Isabelle Adjani won a Cesar for her performance
-- it *is* the movie. It is hard to believe that the beautiful young woman
we first see coming off the boat is the bleak spectre that unravels before
us. Her obsession blinds her to the many kind people around her and the
family imploring her to come home.
*L'Histoire d'Adele H* is not always that easy to find on video or on TV,
so getting to see it for the first time as it was originally intended--in
its cinematic glory--was a real treat. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Well, what everyone has had to say about this movie, and
about all the movies that have come before this one in the series, is all
true. The villains are more interesting than the heroes. Even the sets and
the costumes and the gadgetry are more interesting than the actors. But,
there is no stopping the moneymaking machine of the 1990s--the Batman
series.
Everything you need to know about the movie are easily
seen in the movie's subway posters--the heroes are Batman, Robin, and Batgirl,
and the villains are Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy. As in the other three installments
of this series, the villains are much more interesting than the heroes.
Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger, who gets top billing) is grieving for
his terminally ill and cryogenically preserved wife, who has some disease
he is trying to cure. Meanwhile, he is stealing diamonds to power the suit
that keeps him at a requisite freezing temperature, and that power his freezing
machines.
Across town, dowdy Dr. Pamela Isley falls into a pit of
botanical toxins and becomes Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), who uses pheromone
dust to entrance men and get them to fight over her. Both Thurman and Schwarzenegger
are entertaining, and are the main show, as far as I'm concerned. The characters
are written quite shallow, and spend far too much dialog on idiotic sexual
innuendo than anything else.
Meanwhile, at stately Wayne Manor, there is trouble. Bruce Wayne/Batman
(George Clooney) is having trouble getting ward Dick Grayson/Robin (Chris
O'Donnell) to reign in his teenage hormones and stop taking so many risks.
Faithful Butler Alfred (Michael Gough) is dying, and his niece Barbara
Wilson/Batgirl (Alicia Silverstone) has popped in for a visit by day, and
borrows motorcycles at night to go hellraising and drag racing. All of
this is basically a lot of noise signifying ...? Nothing. 
George Clooney is the third Batman and is supposed to be
a kinder, gentler Batman. Less brooding, but just as uninteresting as Michael
Keaton and Val Kilmer were in the title role. The movies are quickly approaching
the same level of silliness the television series displayed. (Viveca Fox
plays "Ms. B. Haven"--har har.) Again, the sets are marvelous
and moody and evoke silent screen classics like Fritz Lang's Metropolis.
But, after spending about $40 in eight years, enough is enough already.
This latest installment is just a lot of chase scenes set on a gargantuan
metropolitan set with outrageous villains and uninteresting heroes. Robin's
teen tantrums left me uninterested, and we don't see nearly enough of Alicia
Silverstone as Batgirl. Perhaps in the next chapter, which is supposed to
feature "The Joker's Wife" and actresses are lining up already
to win the role...

Copyright  1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Seen on 14 July 1998 with Andrea and Patrick at the UA 64th and Second.
Studio preview.
The Zorro tale has been treated more than two dozen times in movies, since
the silent days. I was not completely familiar with it, though, and until
recently the most exposure I had to it was my plate-and-mug set from
childhood. I liked the marketing, so it follows I would like the movie
too.
The previews for *The Mask of Zorro* were quite long and practically gave
away the whole movie. So I thought I knew what to expect. I was wrong.
There was a lot more intelligence and thought in this recent incarnation.
It's got a lot of humor and wit to go along with all the swashbuckling and
swaggering. 
There is some heavyhandedness, melodrama, and even some outright
silliness, but the movie is enjoyable nonetheless. It is fast-paced and
engaging. Perfect for a summer movie, and a lot more rollicking than any
of those comets or lizards bent on destroying New York City.
The story is your basic good-versus-evil tale. Don Rafael Montero (Stuart
Wilson) is an inate baddie who is raping the resources of Mexican-held
California in 1821. He is more than willing to kill innocents to lure the
mysterious Zorro out into the open. But Zorros is able to fend off
countless attackers with vigor and swordsmanship. He gets a little help
from the Murrieta brothers along the way.
Flash ahead to 20 years later. Don Rafael has arrested Don Diego de la
Vega (Anthony Hopkins) and absconded to Spain with Elena de la Vega as his
own daughter. But he returns as governor of California and brings her
fully grown back (with Catherine Zeta-Jones as the full-figured Elena)
with him. De la Vega gets out of prison and is seeking revenge. Along the
way he re-encounters the grown-up Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas),
now an ungroomed horsethief. A tale of revenge and honor ensues, as worthy
of the tradition as other tales of this ilk, like the better known *Count
of Monte Cristo*. Both Zorros are heroes to the people; the elder Zorro is
a rich man who doesn't have to help anyone, but follows a higher moral
code. I guess that's what makes him so sexy. That, and long hair. It all
depends on whom is asked.
While Don Rafael and a younger baddie, Captain Love (Matthew Letscher)
scheme to use California gold to buy the land from the Mexican government,
using natives to mine in in concentration-camp-like conditions, de la Vega
mentors Murrieta in swordsmanship and charm so they can both exact revenge
on their mortal enemies. These are among the most enjoyable scenes. 
There is a lot of swordplay and impossible escapes in *The Mask of Zorro*,
some of them very comic. Some of them are also very heartstopping. It is
all abetted by great music and lavish costumes and set design.
Hopkins is by far the best actor in the bunch. Catherine Zeta Jones is
rather good also (watch for her "cleavage stage right" scene). Bandaras is
pretty good too; it's hard to believe, sometimes, that he's not just there
to look good and make a good percentage of the audience pant with sexual
desire. He's not a bad actor, but he's no Anthony Hopkins, who's not made
a bad movie for the past decade. But, Hopkins and Bandaras are both worthy
successors to the mantle first made famous by Douglas Fairbanks in the
silent era. He did his own stunts though. Today a small army is on hand to
help in that department. 
Directed by Martin Campbell; original music by James Horner; production
design by Cecilia Montiel; costume design by Graciela Mazn.
Audience Note: A woman in front of us actually *gasped* when Don Rafael
opened a box to reveal a single bar of gold. Andrea and I could not stop
laughing.
Historical Note: Four years after the fictional Zorro story ends, the US
steals half or Mexico or more and we all lived happily ever after. Except
for the Mexicans. 
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Seen on 25 May 1998 with Lothlorien and Scooter for $8.50 at the Village
East Cinema.
Director Neil Jordan brings us an unrelenting view of a disturbed young
Irish lad. Really, truly unrelenting. Perhaps it's a metaphor. That must
be what it was. Yes. A depressing, long, unrelenting metaphor that made me
very happy to be brought up in a leafy suburb.
Francie Brady is the product of a poor, fractious couple. He's a
wifebeating drunk (Stephen Rea) and she's having a series of nervous
breakdowns (Annie Brady). But they are Da and Ma and Francie loves them;
they are all he's got, really, and he desperately wants a "normal family
life."
Francie lives in his own little world; a chubby lad with ruddy cheeks.
Boisterous with bravado and quivering with fear; he's a little toughie who
just wants to be loved and understood. Eamonn Owens really does a
remarkable job for his first movie. 
But Francie has a long way to go in the being loved and understood
department. He has decided that Mrs. Nugent (Fiona Shaw)--the mother of a
boy he torments--is the root of all his problems, ever since she came back
from England and brought airs with her. 
Francie lives in what must be the world's stupidest town, though. Knowing
his family problems, and knowing he is disturbed and has been to a boys'
reformatory and even the mental hospital (he calls it the garage because
they fix you there), they still let him run around town and he's even
allowed to work in the slaughterhouse! Hello! He's deranged. Give good
old Francie the biggest cleaver you've got! Every adult in this film is
ineffectual--and that's the point, I guess. Still, it's pretty odd.
Along the way, we see Francie chase flies from his poor Old Da's corpse in
the living room, and talk to the Virgin Mary (ironically played by Sinead O'Connor), and almost get buggered but a randy old priest (Milo O'Shea), whom he attacks.  Guess what? It 
gets worse...
The backdrop to this story, set in 1962, is the Cuban missile crisis. Even
in this tiny Irish town, there is a lot of worry of a nuclear winter. 
Personally, I didn't find this device effective. Not like the *Ice Storm*
using the Watergate hearings as a backdrop, for example. Francie's
negligent supervisors are more to blame than the Russians and the
Americans. The device of devout Catholicism contrasted to a complete lack
of adult supervision and a hatred of children ought to have more play than
it did
Also very effective in his child role is Alan Boyle as Francie's best pal
Joe, possibly the only person he hold dear beyond his parents.
Normally, I think I would have liked this movie, but Francie's madness and
the negligence of the adults was just too unrelenting. There are also
moments of joy and humor, which are a bit jarring against the horrors of
his life. Perhaps keeping it completely bleak would have made *The
Butcher Boy* more like *Fresh* or *Los Olvidados*, where loss is complete
and desperate. Bringing magic realism into realism is an unnecessary
addition. 
Still, it's better than *Interview with the Vampire*, which Jordan also
directed. From the novel by Pat McCabe (as Patrick McCabe) and screenplay
by Neil Jordan. Cinematography by Adrian Biddle; costume Design by Sandy
Powell (II).

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
Seen on 11 September 1997 with Byron for $3 at the Cineplex Worldwide
Austin Powers proves that what is hilarious for $3 can be a rip off at
thrice the price. It is hard to know how much I would have liked it at
full price, but for $3, I had a rollicking good time! 
A lot of movies and TV shows are spoofed here; not just the obvious 60s
stuff like the 007 films, Get Smart, and the Avengers, but some newer
movies like Demolition Man and more obscure things that the
twentysomething set might not know at all. It's all h ere, from Dr. No's
cat to gyrating hips that can decimate the Fembots (I was working my mojo,
baaabeee!).
The plot is "fairly simple" as Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery
(that is what his card says) and his archnemesis Dr. Evil are
cryogenically frozen, fighting each other in both the "Swinging London" of
the 1960s and today's Las Vegas. (Both are played by the talented Mike
Myers).
What surprised and delighted me most was that rather than endulging in
constant "out of time" disparity jokes, there is a nice balance of
spoofery. Obviously, if you have not seen a lot of the silly/nutty movies
of the 1960s and 1970s, you will be missing a lot. There are not a lot of
people out there who are going to catch Laugh-In references that quickly,
you know.
My favorite scenes are those with Dr. Evil and his evil co-horts, as well
as Dr. Evil trying to work out a relationship with his artificially born
son Scott Evil (played by Seth Green, the little red-haired kid from Radio
Days). 
Most of the actors look like they're having a lot of fun. Mimi Rogers is
Mrs. Kensington; Elizabeth Hurley is her curvaceous spy daughter in 1997
who is politically correct, but not invulnerable to Austin's persistent
request: "Let's shag!" There are also lots of Go-Go Girls and Fembots (who
look a lot like the women who used to surround Dean Martin with martinis).
The biggest problem with Austin Powers is the insistence to hold a joke
and hit it repeatedly over our heads. A bad joke is funny sometimes;
telling all six of its variants literally all at once, is not. Mike Myers
is a very funny man. He should know better.
Overall, I had a lot of fun watching this movie. However, it was not the
all-out laff riot that the five morons in front me must have thought it
was. I guess they must've done lots of drugs before coming to the theatre
to have that much forced laughter.
Watch for my perennial favorite Carrie Fisher as a father-son therapist. 
-----------------------------------
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com.
More movie reviews with graphics can be seen at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html. 

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
Seen on 22 November 1997 with Laura for $8.50 at the Angelika.
This is the latest entry in screen adaptations of Henry James novels
(quickly following the latest version of *Washington Square*), and it's a
very good one. Henry James' characters are complex--no cookie cutters
here. What could have been a soap opera--poor man is urged by girlfriend
to seduce her dying friend--is in fact a sophisticated emotional drama. 
Set in London in 1910, Kate Croy (Helena Bonham Carter) is a poor relation
who winds up living under the auspices of her coercive Aunt Maude
(Charlotte Ramplng), who controls not only Kate's finances but those of
her opium-addicted father (Michael Gambon). She forbids Kate to be
involved with poor journalist Merton Densher (Linus Roache). Since her
choice involves two fates, she tried to relegate Merton to her past.
Resentfully settling into her new glamorous life, she meets Millie Theale
(Alison Elliott), the "richest orphan in America,"  who is visiting from
New York.
The two women become close friends and in due time, they start running
into Merton all over town; Millie fancies him. When Kate finds out that
Millie has a terminal illness, she starts to think... 
Millie and Kate go on a trip to Venice, and they both invite Merton to
join them. They both love him, but Kate urges him to cozy up to the
heiress with an illness, thinking it will solve all their problems, and
free them financially so they can--eventually--be together. 
Luckily, this is not *Days of Our Lives*. The characters are richly drawn
and the actors all do a wonderful job. Their faces reflect their changing
emotional tides. It's a joy to watch talent in action. You really feel the
emotional consequences to their actions. Linus Roach, who I last saw in
*Priest*, is both attractive and talented, but not in the usual Hollywood
sort of way. It's nice to see someone who is both offbeat *and* appealing.
Venice is the fourth star of the movie. It is one of the only cities in
the world that is guaranteed never to change; a city without auto traffic
built in a lagoon on stilts is not going to sprout character-altering
skyscrapers.  Whether it's *Summertime* or *Comfort of Strangers*, putting
a film in Venice changes it completely. It's hard to imagine this story
taking place entirely in London. 
Director Iain Softley deserves special mention. It takes something special
to make a park bench look like an island of loneliness or a rowboat for
the lovelorn. He really knows when to, and not to, use a close-up. For
example, when Helena Bonham-Carter's full moon of a face fills the screen,
there's a good reason for it, and it shows. 
Kudos also to Sandy Powell (II) for costume design. The flamboyant
fashions of the 1910s are captured perfectly. The whole production looks
like Merchant Ivory, even though it's not. 
MPAA reasons: Rated R for sexuality. That would be *hetero*sexuality in
this case. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Svengali (1931)
Early sound movies were plagued with a variety of problems. The new
technology caused many creative setbacks for the film industry. One was
where to place the camera so the actors' voices could be recorded
properly. This resulted in many awkward scenes with everyone talking into
telephones, or even vases. Imagine everyone in the shot gathered around
the vase to discuss the matters at hand.
Seeing Svengali shows a mastering of the new technology after four years.
The story of the hypnotic maestro Svengali (John Barrymore) who loves the
much-younger Trilby  (Marian Marsh) is well suited to constant close-ups.
The story itself is rather silly--the only way Svengali can get this woman
into his life is by constantly hypnotizing her and stealing her away from
her true love, the poor painter Billy.
Marian Marsh, as Trilby, is dreadful. Meryl Streep she ain't. Sound movies
had produced a new problem: Actors have to memorize and perform the spoken
word credibly. Luckily, John Barrymore more than makes up for this. His
performance is wonderful, and it looks like most of the lines are written
for him. When a theater owner complains of all the broken engagements, and
says the crowd will kill him, Barrymore responds, "I will give you a
military funeral."
The true star of Svengali is its style. The sets are in the same vein as
The Cabinet of Doctor Caligari and other German Expressionists. Evocative,
soundless longshots alternate superbly with the intense light-and-shadow
close-ups. All this was before high-tech, and how they get Svengali's eyes
to glow when he casts his spell is amazing. What the story lacks in plot
and action is more than made up in the little touches, like the pan to the
cat catching the mouse after Svengali has called Trilby to his rooms from
across town in the middle of the night. The use of models will seem
unsophisticated by the standards of special effects today, but they lend
tremendously.
Note: This film was refilmed several times. One hilarious noteworthy one
starred Peter O'Toole and Jodie Foster,  in which he declares, upon
hearing her sing, "She has a voice like raw meat!"
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY, 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
  Seen on 25 April 1998 with Andrea at the SONY Lincoln Square for $10
  (including teleticket fee).
   *Sliding Doors* takes a look at what would happen if you missed your
   train by a few seconds. Helen (Gwyneth Paltrow) goes to work one
   morning, only to find out she's been sacked and then goes to take the
   District Line tube home. (By now you must've figured the film is set
   in London). After missing her train, the camera backs up to the moment
   a young girl got in the way and takes her out of the way, so Helen can
   get on the train. Henceforth, the movie skillfully alternates between
   the tale of Helen coming home to find her boyfriend Gerry (John Lynch)
   in bed with his old girlfriend Lydia (Jeanne Tripplehorn), and the
   tale of her just having missed that scene.
   So, the stories ensue in similar paths. The outraged Helen
   moves out, dyes her hair blonde (this helps distinguish the two
   storylines), and gets involved with James (John Hannah of *Four
   Weddings and a Funeral*) as she starts her own PR company, and deals
   with Gerry wanting her back.
   In the other storyline, the cuckolded Helen struggles along waiting
   tables and working two jobs while Gerry "writes his novel" and
   continues to cheat on Helen with Lydia, who is pressing for him to
   make a break with Helen.
   A lot of women I know just hate Gwyneth Palthrow (she's "too
   beautiful" or something), but Sliding Doors might change their minds.
   She gives an engaging, fresh performance to both "realities" shown in
   the film. John Hannah (who has a delightful Scottish accent) is
   equally wonderful as James. The supporting roles of Anna (played by
   another Scot, Zara Turner) and Russell (Douglas McFerran) as Helen and
   Gerry's best friends (respectively) also do a wonderful job. McFerran
   is particularly good in his role as Gerry's amused but unsympathetic
   confessor.
   Lynch and Tripplehorn, especially the latter, are a bit over the top
   as the panicky cheat and the bitchy American lover. But they are not
   so over the top that it destroys the romantic comedy mood created by
   first-time director and writer Peter Howitt. It was very surprising to
   discover that he had never directed before. Some of the night scenes
   on the Thames with the lights of a suspension bridge on the Thames are
   among the best ever seen in a romantic comedy.
   *Sliding Doors* features many funny moments as well as touching,
   romantic ones. One of my favorite lines came from Tripplehorn, who
   tells Gerry, "We know what we want, but we don't tell you what we
   want, but we reserve the right to get angry when you don't know.
   That's what makes us so fascinating, and so scary!" In another, as
   Russell laughs at Gerry's plight, he tells him, "If it weren't for you
   I don't know how I'd make it a whole week before the next Seinfeld."
   As ever, I recommend you see it on the big screen, especially for the
   full effect of the night scenes on the Thames.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
Seen on 17 October 1997 with Lynne and Sandy for $7.75 at the Port
Washington Cinemas.
There is something compelling about *Kiss the Girls* that transcends its
inherent misogyny and depiction of depraved behavior. You want to find out
how they catch the man who is kidnapping beautiful and talented women and
who kills the ones who break the rules--his rules. Along the way, though,
you are imbued with a certain uncomfortable feeling that also transcends
the movie. Unless you're a serial killer yourself, there is nothing
entertaining about women being held captive and forced to do things
against their will, despite the porn industry's images that counter that
idea.
The movie is very carefully set up to make you want to care about finding
the killer. Alex Cross (Morgan Freeman) is a police psychologist whose
niece is kidnapped in the Research Triangle in North Carolina. Kate
McTiernan (Ashley Judd) is an doctor who is passionate about her work and
very gutsy and forthright. This, according to the movie's epistemology,
makes her ripe for being the next victim. But she manages to get away, and
insists on helping Alex find the culprit. 
This is where the movie takes a few unbelievable turns--why on Earth would
these characters not *once* think of calling for backup? In New York City,
if a cop is even thought to be shot, 40 officers arrive on the scene in a
variety of vehicles. Why wouldn't an experienced detective call for back
up? Because making sense and making suspense do not always mix... 
Ashley Judd really stands out at Kate. One aspect that I really enjoyed
was that when she escapes, runs through the woods, falls off a cliff and
suffers hypothermia -- it looks real. It's not like other filems where
heronines do all of it without scratching a nail. Her run through the
woods is full trips and falls and a lot of bruises; you are there with her
every step of the way, and that really makes the audience empathize. 
What is disturbing throughout the film is the idea that somehow these
women made themselves victims simply because they were smart and therefore
visible. There is probably a good reason why there are so few female
serial killers, and this movie shows why, in so many ways. It's offensive
in that it is implied that compliant women are safe and the victim is to
blame.
Along the way, a few red herrings are tossed our way to "enhance" the
mystery, but formulaic movies defy these efforts.
Also starring were Cary Elwes, Tony Goldwyn, Bill Nunn, and Gina Ravera.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Seen on 5 December 1998 by myself at the Cineplex First Ave and 62nd
Street for $8.75
Earlier this year Roger Ebert declared that the one movie that did not
need to be remade was Alfred Hitchcock's *Psycho*. So of course they went
out and remade it
The ad campaign was very slick, leading you to believe that you might be
seeing something something new and different. Well, with very few
exceptions, you are seeing director Gus Van Sant refilm the Hitchcock
classic shot-for-shot, with all the same dialogue, and even Bernard
Herrmann's original score.
Now mind you, I am a bit of an expert on this film. It was my term paper
for my Hitchcock class at college, and I saw the movie four times in one
week while studying the shot-by-shot analysis in a book--appropriately
entitled *Psycho*.
So it was actually disappointing to see nothing new. The few additions
made by van Sant are distracting at best--like the cutaways to fuzzy video
images during Crane's and Arbogast's murders. Why? It simply ruins the two
best scenes in the movie.
While refilming the movie shot-for-shot "brings it to a new audience"--and
in color--it becomes dated. Elements from the original that placed it in
1960, like detectives wearing hats, having the operator "put the call
through" and a motel that suffers because "they moved the highway" are
misplaced here. Meanwhile, references to her Walkman make Lila Crane
(Julianne Moore) a commercial for Sony.
Oh, and adding slapping noises as a Norman masturbates while peeping at a
disrobing Marion is completely unnecessary. Subtlety, Gus, subtlety,
please. Hitchcock's audiences knew how to fill in the blanks quite nicely
on their own. Contrasted to the dullness of telling the story
moment-for-moment as the original, the audience's derisive laughter is
well deserved.
Because the new version is in color, there is some room for new movement,
but the only option played is to give Marion (Anne Heche) an orange motif.
The reasons for this are not clear, or necessary.
While younger audiences (late teens/early twenties) might never have seen
the original, it's hard to see how it can stand up to the far more
sophisticated thrillers they surely have come expect, like *Scream*. In
it's day, killing off the star in the first third of the film and leaving
the rest of the cast to play out a new storyline (embezzlement story turns
into a murder mystery of psychotic proportions) was new, innovative.
Today, the story seems quite boring, and Viggo Mortensen (as Marion's
lover Sam) and Moore (as her sister) are the twin definitions of
uncompelling as they look into Marion's disappearance.
Only Vince Vaughn's crack at the Norman Bates role made famous by Anthony
Perkins keeps the story moving. He is much taller than Heche, and more
menacing than Perkins.
In the end, the most interesting performance is Heche's. The most
interesting part of *Psycho* (here and in the original) is the unsung
first reel in which Marion has decided to make off with her boss's cash,
and is imagining the hot pursuit she must be fleeing. In both movies, the
cop with the sunglasses is possibly the *most* menacing figure,
practically rivaling "Mother" (whose rants were better in the original).
Chad Everett is hilarious as the lecherous Texan businessman.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Seen on 27 November 1997 with Linda, Sandy and Lynne, and Miriam and
Justin, for $8.50 at Douglaston Movieworld. 
What's that old adage again? Ah yes! "The movie is never as good as the
book."  Truer words were never recalled as fiercely as they are for
*Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil*. Director Clint Eastwood was
lucky enough to get ahold of a novel that was on bestsellers lists for
years. It is unfortunate that the deep impression left upon me by the book
leaves me disappointed with this movie, which is longer than two and a
half hours. 
John Berendt's novel is written much like a Balzac novel--rich in history,
very much roman a clef, and it is not until all the players and their
stories are firmly in place that the "main action" or crisis for the
characters begins. 
In this case, it is the shooting of young Billy Hanson (Jude Law) by
nouveau riche Savannah aristocrat Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey). On the eve
of this event arrives *Town and Country* writer John Kelso (John Cusack),
to cover Jim's annual Christmas party, one of the most highly sought-out
invitations in Savannah society.
John becomes enmeshed in a variety of social intrigues and the quirky
Southern characters that propel them. There's Luther Driggers (Geoffrey
Lewis), who ties horseflies to his clothes and threatens to poison the
water supply; carriage-driving Joe Odom (Paul Hipp), who siphons
electricity to light his illegal tours and parties; Minerva (Irma P.
Hall), the local voodoo lady;  and who will ever forget The Lady Chablis
(played by herself)--the transvestite transsexual? 
There are also other ancillary quirkies to keep us entertained: the party
guest who blithely waves a pint-sized pistol around; the man who "walks"
an empty leash around the town square; the bulldog mascot that is treated
like royalty. 
All of this conspires to give an essence of living in Savannah; Berendt's
book is based on true characters. However, what made the book interesting
is absent in many ways in the movie. A book allows the luxury of depth and
imagination heightens that depth. Movies limit this. 
The film spends a lot of time in the courtroom when Jim Williams is
arrested for killing hustler Billy Hanson. It is known that he did kill
him, but the depth of *why* is not really explored from anyone but Jim
William's point of view. Instead of spending time court telling the story,
flashbacks would have been more elaborative--a movie technique ignored for
the most part. A Rashomon style storytelling would have added to the
extent of Billy's despicable nature.
Also rather uninteresting was the filming. Considering how colorful the
characters and the town are, why is there a dull, flat look throughout the
movie? At one point, the courtroom scenes almost look like they relied on
natural lighting. 
The Lady Chablis is the standout performance here. Flambuoyant and
buoyant, without her the movie would simply limp its way home. Also
interesting was Jack Thompson (I) as defense attorney Sonny Seiler, the
epitome of Southern gentility and chicanery. Alison Eastwood (Clint's
daughter) plays Mandy Nichols, who seems thrown in to provide a love
interest for John Cusack. She plays one useful purpose in the story, but
is otherwise wasted. She will probably make a good leading lady in her own
right one day, however.
The saddest part of this adaptation is that it is the the possibly the
first book about the South to garner this much attention since *Gone with
the Wind*, and it gets a typical Hollywood treatment that proves the "old
adage" once again. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Seen on 7 December 1997 for $0 at the Loews New York Twin. 
*Good Will Hunting* is a situation drama about a supergenius who cleans
the floors at MIT instead of pacing them as a student.
That's the situation, the high-concept, if you will. Mathematics professor
Lambeau (Stellan Skargard) leaves an "impossible" problem on the bulletin
board, and Will Hunting solves it. Lambeau tracks him down and wants to
take credit for discovering him. But, for all his cerebral cortex action,
Will is a diamond in the rough, and needs polishing if he's going to
become part of the Establishment. 
Will's life is rooted in South Boston, an orphan shuttled around foster
homes who now lives in a dump, works in construction, and gets into
trouble with his ne'er-do-well friends, who clearly have no use or respect
for the college kids that abound in Boston. 
To get him under control, Lambeau takes Will to prominent psychiatrists,
all of whom Will either infuriates or outwits, until he reaches Sean
McGuire (Robin Williams), who is an old friend of Lambeau's who is also
from South Boston, and teaches at a Bunker Hill Community College. 
What follows is a fairly predictable and average "he's met his match and
they have more in common and they learn a lot from each other story."
McGuire's background: he lost his beloved wife and is "ironically" in his
own protective shell, "ironically," just like Will. It's a good premise,
but it just wasn't very interesting. Even the double-entendre title (Good
Will Hunting, hunting for good will) seems a bit sophomoric and quite the
cliche. 
Skylar, Will's love interest, played by the personable Minnie Driver,
who--finally--gets to use her (real) British accent. The interaction Will
has with her and with his friend Chuckie (Ben Affleck) is the most
believable. The epiphanies Will reaches with them seem much less hackneyed
than the ones he reaches with McGuire. In fact, it is Affleck's speech to
Will that really seems to cut through Will's defenses more than anything
else. Robin Williams' performance is a bit too earnest and forced.
Perhaps it's my own bourgeois background, but it was difficult for me to
understand the reverse snobbery shown in *Good Will Hunting* that keeps a
supergenius stuck in a clapboard shack with a screen door that is barely
on its hinges. Apparently, it was h ard for Chuckie to understand either,
and he's from the same background. 
The performances are what stand out in this movie. Damon is charming and
funny, as is Driver. Affleck's big scene gives Chuckie some actual depth
the rest of the characters are lacking. But, it's enjoyable nonetheless;
I've seen a lot worse. 
Directed by Gus Van Sant, this must be his blandest offering yet, when you
consider his credits include the offbeat *Drugstore Cowboy*, *My Own
Private Idaho*, *Even Cowgirls Get the Blues*, and more recently, his
biting, more upscale hit *To Die For*. *Good Will Hunting* is probably
good for his bankroll and his Hollywood credentials, but it is the least
original of his projects. 
Affleck and Damon have been hyped for penning and selling their
screenplay. Why? It's a feel-good movie written by two men already firmly
entrenched in the Hollywood establishment. Affleck was in Chasing Amy last
year, and Damon has had three big movies this year and the cover of
Vanity Fair. It doesn't seem that David-and-Goliath to me. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
Seen on 26 September 1997 with Linda for $9 at the SONY Lincoln Square
As an acquaintance put it, "*In & Out* is good PR for the gay community in
middle America." This is a very perceptive description of this
high-concept situation comedy. Howard Brackett (Kevin Kline) is a
high-school English teacher who about to get married. He lives in a small
town in Illinois and the story takes place on the eve of the Oscars. One
of the alumni, actor Cameron Drake (Matt Dillon), has been nominated for
Best Actor. So, the whole town is watching and waiting to see if he will
win. He does, and cites Howard as one of his inspirations, and he
announces, "and he's gay."  Howard does his best to reassure his newly t
hin fiancee Emily (Joan Cusack), his parents (Debbie Reynolds and Wilford
Brimley), his principal (Bob Newhart), and his friends and students that
he is fact *not gay*.
But there is also the small matter of satisfying the media circus that
camps out in the town the very next day.. One infotainment reporter--Peter
Malloy (Tom Selleck)--is gay himself, and relentless hounds Howard about
the status of his sexual orientation.
Without giving too much away, I can safely say that the characters are
strictly l ight and fluffy. From Debbie Reynolds as the mother who claims
she needs Howard's wedding the way an addict needs heroin, to Joan Cusack
as the befuddled bride-to-be, there are a lot of harmless chuckles to be
had here. Just about *everyone* is a stereoty pe here. What ensues is an
exploration into "what makes a man a man" and it does so very humorously. 
A very memorable scene: Howard listening to a tape to "improve
masculinity."
It all leads to an obligatory happy ending, obligatory since it is a
comedy. It even has the feel of a *Mr. Smith Goes to Washington*; fairness
must win the day.
Perhaps the most important aspect of this movie is that it garnered the
number two spot for its opening weekend. This officially marks the end of
the "invisible gay man" in the minds of the mainstream moviegoer. In a
year when Ellen Degeneres comes out on national TV, *In & Out*'s number
two status means more straight people are seeing positive gay images than
ever before. I read recently that movies have to do well in the heart of
America and if they do, they will succeed everywhere. Paul Rudnick, author
of *Jeffrey* and the alter-ego of Libby Gelman-Waxner, is a funny and
talented writer, which contributes greatly to this success. It might not
be among the top ten mo vies I will ever see, but it is enjoyable, and its
success at this time is very telling. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Crmonie, La (1995)
France, 1995; in French with English subtitles
"Well, you will certain reconsider hiring help after this movie!" And with
that, Linda and I plunged ahead to see La Ceremonie, director Claude
Chabrol's 55th movie. The opening couldn't be more ordinary--Catherine
Lelievre (Jacqueline Bisset) interviews Sophie (Sandrine Bonaire) at a
cafe.  She needs a domestic worker at her remote home in Bretagne for her
blended family--her rich husband and their children from previous
marriages.
Fate pairs Sophie with Jeanne (Isabelle Huppert), a wacked-out postal
clerk (this stereotype extends beyond America), who has it in for the
bourgeois family. They routinely receive their mail opened, mutilated, or
not at all. The stage for unsettling us is set early, when Catherine picks
up Sophie at the train and Jeanne asks for a ride. She shows an intense
interest in Sophie, and the feeling that *something* is going to happen is
palpable. 
Without giving too much away, the secret Sophie hides is certainly part of
her problem, and it is rather unnerving when it is revealed to us. That
she has not remedied the problem is what seems truly disturbing.  But she
has bigger problems. Both she and Jeanne have had close relatives perish
in suspicious circumstances, and this only bonds them further.
The family goes about its business, with worries about what to have for
dinner, and other petit bourgeois concerns; the university
student/daughter, Melinda, feels free to treat Sophie like a person; but
Sophie grows to dislike this family, with Jeanne fanning the flames for a
personal Marxist revolt. The family is used to having domestic help
around, regardless of how the domestics feel about them. In a capitalist
western nation like France, it is understood that when you are hired as a
maid, democracy disappears, but you are free to leave employment. 
However, this freedom can disappear when you need housing and food. Is
Catherine truly guilty of class insensitivity? The two are clearly
unbalanced, but is there an underlying truth to their outrage? La
Ceremonie is a nice comparison to *Breakdown*; the former pits intimate
strangers against each other and grudges are overblown; the latter shows
strangers deliberately victimizing people at random, and the grudge is
just a rouse. 
Sandrine Bonnaire has never looked more drab, but it suits the tabula
rassa she becomes for Jeanne's vengefulness. Isabelle Huppert, often
likened to an "ice princess"; because of her portrayals throughout her
career (Madame Bovary, Sincerely Charlotte), really opens up as the
unhinged, postal clerk. A very nice surprise is Jacqueline Bisset, who is
elevated to a whole new level when she speaks French throughout a movie. 
Most people remember her for such unilluminating performances as Rob
Lowe's mother and his classmates lover in Class.
Based on Ruth Rendell's novel *A Judgement in Stone*. 
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021

Title
Review for Keep the Aspidistra Flying (1997)
Review of A Merry War (1998) (a/k/a Keep the Aspidistra Flying or Comstock
and Rosemary (1997))
Seen with on 29 August 1998 with Peter at the Lincoln Plaza Cinemas for
$8.75Q
When does it become painfully clear that being middle class is not all
that bad? Well, for most people, settling comfortably into the bourgeoisie
is not a problem. But Gordon Comstock wants to be a full-time poet, so he
quits his job with New Albion Publicity and gets a low-paying job in a
bookshop and writes poetry at night at a respectable boarding house
nearby. Respectable, since there's an aspidistra in the window, and in his
room. He laments that while the greats wrote, "Tiger tiger burning bright"
he is writing ad slogans like, "Corner Tables takes his with BOVEX."
As seen in so many other British movies, class distinctions in British
society are alive and well here. Here, the delineations are done with a
wry wit and with a great love of language. Gordon benefits from having a
Fellow Traveller for a friend--who happens to be well-tanned, stinking
rich, and able to spend, as an envious Gordon points out, "have sex in the
afternoon."
Richard E. Grant, as Gordon, brings a comic sense that gives the movie its
entire character. His energy when delivering lines like, "Promise me we'll
have sex in the afternoon," and "I've been reduced to thruppence!" (upon
discovering his aptly named slim volume of poetry, "Mice," is selling for
three pence), is the difference between yet another lavish British costume
drama and sheer and utter joy. One of the funniest movies I have seen in a
long time, actually, with a good bite.
Grant alternates between disgust and joy, enlivening his forays into fancy
restaurants that don't believe he's the host, despite his ability to pay,
and Lamberth, a horrible slum he romanticizes as he shows it off to his
one-time fiance Rosemary (played by a very pale "straight man" Helena
Bonham Carter) while joking with the local working girls.
Basically, Grant's performance overshadows the other actors', but they are
all very good. Julian Wadham is the aristocratic Ravelston, who loves the
working classes, but from a distance that ensures he doesn't have to smell
them. Harriet Walter is the long-suffering sister; Lesley Vickerage the
wisecracking, sarcastic lover of Ravelston. Barbara Leigh-Hunt is the
stuffy bourgeois landlady, overly concerned with her aspidistra, while Liz
Smith as Mrs. Meakin, the landlady in his reduced circumstances, is
hilarity itself. That a publicized brawl in a pub ruins his career the
"good" bookstore is a comment on what Britain was like at the time, and in
many ways, still is. Grant makes the "ruination" far from tragic, but
redemptive, cleaning himself by rolling in the mud of the working class
and loving every minute of it.
There are a few things that will make you wonder, like, why do these
people around him stand by him and believe in him, even when he eschews
and insults them? Also, it's the height of the depression. Why is everyone
so happy, well-fed, and trouble-free?
It doesn't matter. It's well done and enjoyable. The cinematography is
also well done, BOVEX ads going up around both town and countryside, and
later, being picked at, are portentious of the inevitable conformity, the
certainty of an aspidistra coming into his life one way or another. There
is also some lovely original music by Mike Batt. Written by Alan Plater
and based on a novel by George Orwell.
Frankly, it's on my Best Ten List of 1998.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Hairspray (1988)
Seen on 25 October 1998 with Laura at the American Museum of the Moving
Image for $16 (part of missed double feature)
If you take John Waters's word as the Gospel Truth, and as far as I can
see, there is no reason you ought not to, music was a lot more fun before
the Beatles "came along and ruined everything." Hairspray is a homage to
that era, when dances had names and watched them on local versions of
American Bandstand. According to John Waters, all the dances you see in
Hairspray were ones he "knew and did them drunk at home with his friends."
Because Hairspray is campy and a lot of fun, the teens are very clean cut,
sober, and if they are addicted to anything, it's hairspray and mirrors,
and yeah, dancing.
For those of you who have somehow missed the last ten years, or simply
never saw Hairspray,  its the simple story of the Turnblads versus the von
Tussles. A hefty Tracy Turnblad (Ricki Lake in her movie debut) auditions
for the Corny Collins show, much to the ire of bitchy Amber von Tussle
(Colleen Fitzpatrick), who's on the Student Council and doesn't like too
much competition, or fat girls.
It's also 1962 and segregation is still in high gear; the Corny Collins
show still has a "Negro Day" and there is no interracial dancing. But as
luck would have it, Tracy's best friend Penny Pingleton (Leslie Ann
Powers) falls in love with Seaweed (Clayton Prince), a black boy. He's the
son of Motormouth Mabel (played by Ruth Brown herself), who is determined
to teach the white children how to dance the "Bird" as well as integrate
NOW.
And so the fun ensues. Tracy becomes a celebrity, does ads for Mr. Pinky's
Hefty Hideaway store for big gals, and even woos Amber's boyfriend, Link
(Michael St. Gerard). The girls squabble, and eventually, so do their
parents. Divine and Jerry Stiller are Tracy's parents, Debbie Harry and
Sonny Bono are the von Tussles.
When it was made, Hairspray was the most mainstream and tame of John
Waters's movies, with Female Trouble and Polyester being the most
representative of his body of work. Hairspray still retained the
"shocking" aspects that were Waters's trademark--close ups of zits being
exploded, rats crawling over a foot during a makeout session in an alley,
a time bomb in a up hairdo. It's all a lot of fun, though, if not a little
unreal. In real life, integration didn't happen; the show was run off the
air by parents who were "more racist than the kids," according to Waters.
Speaking of racist parents, Jo Ann Havrilla is a scream as the hyperracist
mother or Penny Pingleton, who goes nuts in a black neighborhood and
literally incarcerates Penny to keep her from her black beau.
Pia Zadora and Ric Ocasik appear as beatniks. Shawn Thompson as Corny
Collins; Mink Stole as his sidekick Tammy. Writer and director John Waters
appears as the doctor who tries, unsuccessfully to hypnotize Penny into
only liking white boys. 
At the museum, John Waters spoke about Hairspray and his work in general,
and took questions from the audience. One thing that shocks just about
everybody is that Hairspray is now a staple of children's parties. Waters
said that he is often recognized by children as "the doctor from that
movie." He also says that Ricki Lake had just been turned down for a job
by the Gap before he cast her in the movie, but he knew she was destined
for greatness (or a least fame--have you seen Mrs. Winterborne? Not
great, not at all). 
He's also a little more than shocked to discover one of his movies on the
AFI's Top 100 films-of-all-time list.
He also noted that Divine, who looked like a lot of the woman in the
Baltimore neighborhood in which he grew up (also depicted in Hairspray),
died shortly after the movie was released, and her fame was about to be
fulfilled. He also told us that people leave donuts, dresses, and
eyemake-up on Divine's grave.
On his years of working with Divine, he summed it up best: It was a
combination of "Divine's extreme beauty and my mental illness."
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Cousin Bette (1998)
*Cousin Bette*, to date, has been reviewed by only two other
rec.arts.movies.reviews critics. One, a Marxist, loved it, and the other,
a Balzac purist, hated it. Both are right. *Cousin Bette* is the
cinematization of one of Balzac's last novels. The Marxist notes the evils
portrayed by Balzac are accurate--the haute bourgeoisie elevated to
nobility by Napoleon want to live well no matter who gets hurt, no matter
how much they have to borrow from others to attain the rich lifestyles
they think are necessary to pass into high society. The purist duly notes
the gutting of the novel for the sake of the film. I will comment on this
later. 
I am somewhere in the middle. As a film, *Cousin Bette* is quite
entertaining, in darkly humorous way. In the film, Bette, the "plain"
cousin, promises her dying cousin Adeline (Geraldine Chaplin) that she
will "take care of" Adeline's family. In the short deathbed conversation,
it all becomes clear--Bette was the slighted, plain cousin. Bette notes
she was sacrificed at Adeline's alter, leaving her a bitter spinster who
lives in a shoddy part of Paris, working as a seamstress backstage at a
musical burlesque theatre.
Adeline's family--the Hulots--comprise her philandering husband Hector
(Hugh Laurie), her ingenue daughter Hortense (Kelly MacDonald), sensible,
level-headed son Victorin (Toby Stevens), his wife and baby, and a lot of
superfluous servants.
Bette Fischer is played by Jessica Lange--a lovely woman made plain here
with dark makeup and drab olive and black clothing and dark braided hair.
Bette has been excluded from the life she wants--a home, a family, love.
She is 40, but in Paris 1846, she might as well be 80, considering her
bitterness. Bette's rage for the time is understandable--today she'd be
considered a stalker or a borderline schizophrenic. When Bette cannot have
what she considers rightfully hers, her rage is volcanic, as it is in the
novel.
Bette forms a friendship with actress/singer Jenny Cadine (Elisabeth
Shue); they are both originally peasant women from Lorraine-about as far
from Paris you can get, in some ways. Bette also befriends and saves the
life of her upstairs neighbor--Count Wenceslas Steinbach (Aden Young)--a
Polish noblemen and sculptor. She provides funding and scheduling for his
work, hoping gratitude will turn into love. It doesn't. In fact, her young
cousin Adeline deliberately "steals" the count from Bette, causing Bette
to manipulate situations that bring about the emotional, financial, and
physical downfall of her "beloved family."
For all the dark revenge-minded plotting, there is a lot of humor here.
Bob Hoskins is hilarious as the lecherous parfumerier Crevel, as is Laurie
as Hector. Both are in pursuit of the beautiful Jenny. Macdonald is
perfect as the spoiled Hortense, and Young is good as the much loved
rapscallion goldbrick Wenceslas.
While the best parts of the book are sacrificed at the alter of modern
motion picture viewing brevity, the soul and wit of Balzac survive. It is
a shame that Valerie Marneffe is never seen. In the book, she is Bette's
partner in crime, who convinces at least four men that they each are the
father of her unborn child (which did not even exist) while extorting
money from each of them. Adeline is a major figure in the book; killed
here for some cinematic expediency. But the full dissipate nature of the
nouveau riche is felt here. Living lavishly while plunging into
life-threatening debt is made abundantly clear. Marxists everywhere would
nod their heads while watching the beautiful trapping brough forth. 
However, director Des McAnuff, who is primarily a theatre director, brings
some truly wonderful cinematic moments here. What would have taken many
chapters to explain in the novel, he does here with a well-timed glance
(like when Hortense asks Bette if she ever loved any one, and Bette tells
her while looking at Hector; Hector married Adeline instead of her, and
only we see this bitter glance). When Bette discovers Wenceslas is "two
timing" her, her rage is only quenched by plunging her head in a basin of
water. This is straight out of the novel and very well done. One of the
best scenes in the movie is Bette's arrival at the young couple's wedding;
she sees them through screens set up around the outdoor party. She is
partitioned to be an outsider, and only catches glimpses of the life she
so desires from the outside. Bette always plays her part and is never
discovered. Her cutting remarks are often only felt by us; she does what
is expected of a "spinster." Ending the film with the 1848 Revolution that
toppled the "Citizen King" Louis Philippe, while not in he book as I
recall it, helps drive the disaster home, and ties it into the more
lucrative *Les Miserables*.
*Cousin Bette* is lively and entertaining , and along with a fluid camera,
this atmosphere is abetted by a lively classical soundtrack and some
original songs as well. This version might not be as correct and full as
the 1972 six-hour miniseries, but it's a worthy version that truly
captures Balzac's wit and commentary. That figures from Balzac's wider
"Comedie Humaine" are mentioned--Nucingen, Marneffe, Birotteau--shows some
loving reverence to the author a fan like myself is happy to notice. It is
one of two Balzac adaptations out there now--Passion in the Desert being
the other. If 1998-99 is the Balzac revival year, I happily apply for
more.
Written by Lynn Siefert and Susan Tarr; cinematography by Andrzej Sekula;
original music by Simon Boswell; production design by Hugo
Luczyc-Wyhowski; costume Design by Gabriella Pescucci; film editing by
Tariq Anwar.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
  Seen on 26 April 1998 for $8.50 with Laura at Angelika.
   Not knowing much about *2 Girls and a Guy*, I went into it
   without any preconceived notions or expectations. It started out
   interestingly enough, as two women standing on the steps of a Sohoi
   loft slowly discover the boyfriend they hoping to surprise upon his
   return from London is in fact the same boyfriend, Blake (Robert Downey
   Jr.). Carla (Heather Graham, most recently seen as Boogie Night's
   "Rollergirl") is tall, blonde, refined, and innocent looking. Lou
   (Natasha Wagner) is short, dark-haired, speaks in streetsmart tones,
   and has no problem scaling a fire escape and breaking into Blake's
   window so the two can really surprise him upon his return.
   The first 45 minutes to an hour of this movie work very well, as the
   two cuckolded women bond as they rehash all of Blake's lines and
   realize he's been seeing both of them for almost the same length of
   time--ten months. As Carla, wide-eyed, recites Blake's romantic
   mantras, Lou is able to finish them, word for word. The fun,
   therefore, is really supposed to begin when Blake returns and the
   women confront him and turn tables on him.
   Blake does return and immediately calls his mother. We learn from
   Carla and Lou that he is fixated on his mother. This plays prominently
   into the film, and it is interesting to see Downey tune the women out
   to call his mother, and then her doctor, and completely focus on
   everything but them.
   This movie takes place completely in Blake's loft, so it is
   interesting to see how director James Toback is able to keep it from
   getting too claustrophobic, and too talky, like My Dinner with Andre.
   However, the move takes a sharp left turn halfway through and never
   quite recovers. The things you might expect and look forward to do not
   happen, and instead, the films ends unsatisfactorily. Considering the
   sharp emotions and strong start the movie made, it is
   disappointing--to say the least--to see the characters do things no
   one would ever do, and basically wimp out.
   Despite the script, Downey and Graham sustain a level of energy that
   still keeps you wondering what is going to happen, way after that bad
   turn is made. Wagner's performance, however, despite promising
   delivery in the first half, peters out and leaves you unimpressed.
   Watching three characters that are eventually revealed to be
   emotionally confused is not for everyone. It's hard to figure out
   whether the conclusions we can draw are that a) the director is
   misogynist, or b) "Why try being honest with people? Life is so
   futile?"
   CINEMA FAN NOTE: In the loft you will notice a poster for Truffaut's
   film Jules et Jim, a movie about 2 Guys and a Girl.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
Andrea and I went to see Stepmom last night and boy, did it suck. Here is
my review, which gives a lot away. I have not felt so compelled to talk
through a movie in a long time. As people who love Susan Sarandon, this is
a huge disappointment.
Seen on 16 December 1998 with Andrea at the SONY Lincoln Square as a 
Preview
Stepmom is a tedious bore, but it still has hit written all over it, if
the American audience is as stupid as Hollywood surely assumes it must be.
When I held my nose during the preview of Stepmom, it wasn't just because
the movie stank, but to keep myself from laughing with inappropriate vigor
during the schmaltziest parts, with respect to the less jaded members of
the half-empty house.
Movies like Stepmom make you wonder what exactly people in Hollywood think
of the viewing public, and why it took no less than six people to write
such a treacly screenplay. It's not only insulting to just about every
viewer, but it also makes you wonder if Susan Sarandon is that hard up for
money that she has to make a movie like this, much less be one of the
producers.
Stepmom is the story of a family that's undergone a divorce, and recently
added a new element--the father's live-in lover Isabel (Julia Roberts). 
Isabel tries very hard to step into the parent role, but to no avail. Anna
and Ben (Jena Malone and Liam Aiken, respectively) don't like her and
neither does their mother Jackie (Susan Sarandon). All three hurl verbal
barbs at her while Isabel huffs and puffs and wonders "Why don't they
like me?" Luke (Ed Harris) doesn't seem to really like any of them--he's
never around much. Why Isabel takes on parental responsibilities for
these overpriveledged spoiled brats, when she has a fabulous job as a
fashion shutterbug is beyond me. 
The family home is gingerbreadesque, with a grand porch, gables
everywhere, no neighbors in sight and a magnificent Hudson River valley
view. Even Luke's New York loft, which looks like 100 percent IKEA, would 
make Martha Steward kvell. Even the *emergency room* has designer
curtains.
I hate to give anything away in a review, but it's necessary, and it's
what the ad campaign doesn't tell you: Jackie gets a diagnosis of
lymphatic cancer from her very very very concerned oncologist (Lynn
Whitfield). Jackie doesn't tell anyone though, and tries to soldier on
bravely. Brave in that even though there are references to babysitters,
they are never seen, as she seems to be UberMama. She cooks, sews,
chats, and quilts. She's always available for those horrible children of
hers. Horrible in that Anna has a face reads like an admission form for
Our Lady of Perpetual Hurt Feelings. Her brother's squealing laugh is cute
for about two seconds.
Stepmom is insulting on two levels. The two female leads alternate
erratically from histrionic hissy fits to bonding moments. It gets
tiresome. Even when undergoing chemotherapy, Jackie still finds time to be
a bitch. When she's not quilting.
On the second level, it is very anti-urban and pro-family to a degree that
ignores the realities of family issues in America. At one point, it is
clearly implied that being a career girl in New York, working with
effeminized ad executives and "having a life" is not preferable to
sequestering yourself in an upper-class throwback life of the stay-at-home
mother. You "lose your edge." Winning the hearts of cranky children, and
getting them to their riding lessons on time, *that's* important. There
are no real American family issues here--two working parents,
money problems, "quality time" problems, etc., are all ignored. Stepmom is
a landscape where the biggest problem facing you is finding out you're
making the wrong Halloween costume for your daughter with only a week to
go. 
Finally, Jackie's cancer is treated like it's not a horrible devastating
tragedy. In Stepmom, having cancer means you have to recline as often as
possible and keep a chenille blankie over your knees. You still have
plenty of energy to sew, take midnight horseback rides, even go to a Pearl
Jam concert. There's also plenty of time for idiotic "loving" discussions
that don't really have much depth. 
"I like talking to you about stuff, too."
It's no accident that cloying and annoying rhyme.
What's so problematic about Stepmom is the perverse morbidity of it all.
Mom's dying--let's take a photo! Everyone say, "Last Christmas!"  
Clearly, there cannot be two women that are important in the kids'
lives--only one. So, Jackie has to *die* and usher an orderly transfer of
her children to Isabel. The idea that they share responsibilities and
emotions is inadequate to this hyperbolic family values dramedy. Why
Isabel is determined to love these horrible children, or even have a
relationship with the perpetually absent Luke (who seems to have more
chemistry with Jackie, even when they battle) defies logic. The two-parent
nuclear family is the only thing that counts. So few characters outside of
these five characters are ever seen. It's Family Values claustrophobia all
the way. Even the divorce is sanitized. Luke was tossed out not for
adultery or wife beating, but for simply being a workaholic lawyer who
wasn't around enough for trips in the SUV around the exclusive
neighborhood that features no sidewalks or minorities.
Directed by Chris Columbus, this is another in a line of his "family
sitcom dramas"--he brought us the first two *Home Alone* movies, and
*Mrs. Doubtfire*.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Seen on 24 October 1997 with Lynne and Sandy for $8 at the Squire Cinemas,
Great Neck, NY
It was not too difficult to imagine, based on the commercials, to think
that Devil's Advocate was going to be crap. Seeing Al Pacino boiling Holy
Water with a single finger, who wouldn't? Happily, I wound up seeing one
of the more satisfying commercial vehicles of the year. It is not as
subtle as Rosemary's Baby, but is much more safisfying and sophisticated
than the classic Devil and Daniel Webster.
Kevin Lomax (Keanu Reeves) is a prosecutor turned criminal lawyer who has
never lost a case on either end of the spectrum, who lives with his
devoted wife Mary Ann (Charlize Theron) in Florida. After ensuring the
freedom of his client--a pedophile junior high school teacher--he is
approached by a representative from a high-profile law firm in New York.
They offer everything--first class transportation, a huge salary, an
eight-room apartment in the posh Carnegie Hill neighborhood near Central
Park.  
In fact, isn't it a little weird that the entire building is inhabited by
members of the law fim? Boss John Milton has the penthouse atop the
spooky, urban haunted house. While Kevin thrives in the high-pressure
atmosphere and passes the tests before  him, his hitherto happy wife has
her reservations. She doesn't quite like being left on her own, shopping
wih the superficial, creepy wifes of the other associates, and wondering
if Kevin is sleeping with the slinky Christabella (Connie Neilsen). She
doesn't quite like her nightmares either--and neither will you. During a
visit, Kevin' Bible-quoting mother notices how poorly Mary Ann is doing;
Kevin does not.
Al Pacino's performance as John Milton (a/k/a The Devil) changes the whole
tone of the film whenever he appears on screen. The movie is well written,
but it seems especially well written for him. Larger than life (as Satan
should be, I guess), it is a joy to see his eyes and face light up
whenever he appears, whether he is luring Kevin into temptation, or
confronting a hooligan on the subway (the only way he will travel).
It is also gratifying to watch a basic morality story that does not hit
you over the head over and over again. Obviously the temptations offered
are evil, but watching how Kevin reacts to them, rationalizing them, helps
keep the film nicely paced. Like Young Goodman Brown, Kevin too will see
demons  everywhere.
Brava to Roberta J. Holinko, the set decorator. Milton's office and
apartment are as wide as widescreen will allow, and decorated appropriate
to his satanic position. Devil's Advocate shows a lush superrich side of
New York most people do not see, like the courtrooms with WPA murals, or
high-rise apartments with gilts wall and ceilings and spectacular views,
or offices that have Manhattan at your feet. A lot of churches appear in
this movie too, some of the most beautiful, cavernous ones Manhattan has
to offer. Yet, there is always a firey glow somewhere in the distance, or
down a hallway, to remind you what road you are on, even if the best
intentions are propelling you. 
All of this is so enjoyable, the ending(s) sort of take the wind out of
you as they hit you repeatedly over the head. There are other ways I would
have ended the movie. If you would like to know, email me and I will tell
you (sethbook@panix.com).

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
Seen on 4 December 1998 with Laura at the UA Union Square East for $8.75.
Little Voice is a young introverted woman living on the edge. Perhaps just
living edgily. The home she shares with her mother is a powder keg: every
outlet is taxed with extension cords and outlet multipliers; her mother's
baudy, brassy bravado has the nervous young thing unhinged and hiding.
Either way, you can hear the sparks crackling dangerously in the air.
What Little Voice (Jane Horrocks; best known as "Bubble" from the TV
series *Absolutely Fabulous*) can do to liberate herself is listen to the
music her deceased father loved--Judy Garland, Billie Holliday, Marilyn
Monroe, Marlene Dietrich, etc.--and mimic the singers perfectly. This is
not just an obsession, but a matter of survival, as her mother, Mari
(Brenda Blethyn), never stops talking. Whether she's talking sex or making
fun of LV in front of the telephone man, the woman does not shut up. So LV
turns up Judy Garland while her Mum turns up Tom Jones's "It's Not
Unusual."
Enter Ray Say (Michael Caine), a dubious "show biz" agent, but who does
know talent when he hears it in LV. No, he's never met Shirley Bassey, but
he has heard of acts almost completely unknown to civilization.
LV represents a ticket out. Out of debt is where Ray wants to go. Out of
their depressed Northern English town is where Mari wants to go. Yes, LV
represents their escape to worthier locales, like Las Vegas.
Meanwhile, managing to look mousey, telephone repair assistant Billy (Ewan
McGregor) is only slightly obsessed with his missing homing pigeon Duane,
and his growing interest in mutual introvert LV.
If there is a problem with *Little Voice* it's the premise that someone
can be this socially and emotionally stunted without being
institutionalized. But two elements overpower this deficiency--acting and
writing. All the performances are first rate, from Blethyn's raucousness
to Horrocks's wide-eyed terror and talent for mimicry. Viewers find it
hard to believe that Horrocks sings all of her own songs. The highlight of
the film is LV's debut at the decrepit club, the "RendezBoo", where she
sings a full roster of songs, imitating the original stars perfectly down
to the way they cocked their heads.
As Ray Say, Michael Caine has never looked so horrible. It's a departure
from the usual erudite sophistication we expect, but perfect for his role 
as the opportunistic loser. Also noteworthy is Annette Badland as
Mari's only friend, Sadie; she says even less than LV, but her face is so
expressive, she often steals the show. You can tell exactly what she's
thinking, from concern to anger to humor.
Director Mark Herman (*Brassed Off*) takes advantage of more than just the
actors' talents. The sleepy little northern town offers some dramatic
backdrops for the action here. While some viewers might find the harsh,
serious denouement a departure from the more frothy tone of the film,
Little Voice is still a very satisfying experience. Despite the humor, the
movie will strike a chord with anyone who has ever felt awkward, isolated,
lonely, or crushed by an insensitive parent. The music is pretty
sensational, and of course there's a segment of particular community that
will go for that alone.
The film was based on Jim Cartwright's play *The Rise and Fall of Little
Voice*), which was written specifically for Jane Horrocks to showcase her
singing and mimicry talents.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Seen on 3 January 1998 for $3 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide
There are some movies you go to, no matter how dumb you know they are
going to be, because you want to see the gorgeous star, or you want to see
giant arachnids eat people and cut them in two, or just because you were
bored one Saturday afternoon and $3 is a good price to pay for crap. 
Guilty on all counts in my trip to Starship Troopers, and in the words of
Bart Simpson, it was "craptastic."  The special effects were spectacular,
but the story left a lot to be desired. 
Set in one of those not-so-distant futures, the Earth is ruled by
the one-world government of the Federation, where you only become a
citizen if you serve your planet with military service; everyone else is
merely a "civilian," none of whom are allowed to vote. Part of this
one-world lifestyle is that a city like Buenos Aires is populated by WASPy
looking teenages with perfect teeth. They even call it "BA." Why not just
set it in LA and get it over with already?
The Earth is being run by veterans and it's threatened by Klandathu, a
planet run by arachnids whose meteors threaten send their bug eggs to us,
and endangering our one-world way of life, and our perfect teeth. 
In what clearly is *Beverly Hills 90210* versus *Them*, the heros are the
high school graduates of Buenos Aires High School--the dumb stud Johnny
Rico (Casper van Dien, unknown except for One Life to Live viewers), his
brainy girlfriend Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards), his genius friend Carl
Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris, best known as Doogie Howser), and the girl
who loves him, Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer).
Johnny's parents don't want him to join the military, but you know how
kids are in the not-so-distant future. They have minds of their own. 
Johnny, however, thinks with his penis (the only part of his body we do
not see in this movie), and joins the mobile infantry to impress Carmen. 
Of course, being 18 and smart, she is put in charge of a big spaceship
almost immediately, and flies with Zander Barcalow (Patrick Muldoon, of
*Melrose Place* and *Days of Our Lives*). All the while, Johnny is in boot
camp, where his new best friend is also his obnoxious rival, Ace Levey
(Jake Busey).
Soon, it turns out that the "bugs" are much smarter than anyone ever
thought, and 12 million people are killed, including most of the beloved
folks of "BA." This allows the movie to degenerate quickly into nonstop
action, as humans have to fight off endless hordes of giant human-slicing,
gore-producing arachnids, on their planet. 
The special effects really are fantastic, but the second half makes almost
no sense. At one point, space ships are able to incinerate most of the
bugs, but when the fortress is surrounded by bugs, that ability
disappears. The laser weapons used at boot camp also disappear, and the
gang is fighting off the bugs with machine guns. HUH? Oh, and if they can
fly across the galaxy, why can't the giant spaceships get out of harm's
way?
The movie does feature one very interesting and entertaining element: the
Federation's propaganda ads, exhorting people to join the army, do their
part, and crush bugs while mother's look on delightedly. The ads bring
out the movie's subversive side, poking at the fascist veteranocracy
running the world. But, once war breaks out, it's all-out "save the
Earth with your bare hands with your high school friends." The intelligent
injections of satire, which worked so well in directory Paul Verhoeven's
liberal sci-fi movie *Robocop*, just adds to the movie's mayhem. Obscure
jokes, the the Mormon's planet colony, will be lost on most people.
So, if you like this sort of nonsense, you will love Starship Troopers.
You'll go for the special effects, but you will stay for Casper van Dien's
buttocks in the co-ed showers.
Based on the then-controversial novel by Robert A. Heinlein.
Rated R for graphic sci-fi violence and gore, and for some language and
nudity. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Seen on 23 May 1998 for $3 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide
Do you remember the first time you heard Kajagoogoo's "Too Shy"? Did you
ever try to solve Rubik's cube?  Did you ever have to explain to your
mother that Boy George was not a girl, no matter how good his makeup and
no matter how womanly his features were? Do you remember when guys with
deliberate stubble and equally deliberate white blazers, thanks to Miami
Vice? Do you have more than one album by A Flock of Seagulls? Do you
remember when albums cost $4.99 on sale? Did anyone in your neighborhood
drive a Gremlin and see a movie with the same title?  "Deadhead sticker on
a Cadillac" mean anything to you? Do you remember your... President
Reagan? 
If you answered yes to any of these questions (I answered yes to *all* of
them), you will probably enjoy *The Wedding Singer*. Actually, all the
1980s nostalgia is a red herring, and underneath all the pastel and
two-tone tuxedos and feathered haircuts is a rather endearing little love
story. That Adam Sandler and Drew Barrymore are endearing is also a nice
surprise. Plus, the movie is hilarious. Sandler is espcially surprising.
It's good to see that he's a bit more than the obligatory movie actor SNL
alumni are expected to become no matter how bad the movie scripts they're
offered are.
Robbie Hart, who sings at weddings every weekend for $60, seems to enjoy
his life despite his lack of income, and his basement apartment in his
sister's house. It bothers his fiancee, who leaves him standing at the
alter at his wedding. Robbie, who is tenderhearted and humorous and adds
to the occasions where he sings, turns sullen. Luckily, the results are
equally humorous, and either way, he gets the attention of Julia
(Barrymore)--a waitress at the catering hall. 
Unfortunately, Julia is engaged to a ratfink named Glenn Gulia (Mrs. Julia
Gulia..., yikes), and Robbie is an honorable man.  But this is a romantic
comedy and we all know how it ends. The difference is how they get there.
The nice thing about this movie is that the nostalgia is not completely
overpowering the storyline. The movie's basic dialogue is pretty funny on
its own, free of the 1980s trappings. That Carrie Fischer is one of the
uncredited writers might have a lot to do with this. But, all that
nostalgia is very amusing. References to Moonwalking, someone shooing
J.R., and "time to make the donuts," don't hurt the movie either. The only
thing that puzzles me is that it's a movie about the 1980s that sometimes
looks a lot like the 1970s, which were being made fun of quite heartily
by 1985.
The supporting characters are also amusing. Christine Taylor plays Julia's
cousin, the Madonna wannabe; Alexis Arquette is the Boy George wannabe; 
Ellen Albertini Dow is particularly hilarious as the octogenarian singing
student Robbie tutors for a fee of two meatballs a week. Jon Lovitz makes
a funny appearance as a rival wedding singer; Steve Buscemi has a nice
cameo bookending the movie. There's even a special guest star (Billy
Idol!). 
So, go and enjoy the Wedding Singer. You'll laugh, you'll almost cry,
you'll wonder what happened to Spandau Ballet, LPs, and men named Marilyn. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
*I Know What You Did Last Summer* comes to us from writer Kevin
Williamson, who brought us *Scream*, and of course, *Scream 2*. He has
also been busy with other projects, like *Killing Mrs. Tingle*, *Texas
Blood Money*, and *Halloween 7*. A new era in scary movies is upon us. One
that is witty, suspenseful, and shows a love of the movies. So far, it has
been very enjoyable, with half the splattering of the horror movies of the
1980s. 
*I Know What You Did Last Summer* has a simple premise. On July 4th, just
after graduating, four teens hit a man on a desolate cliffside road.
Thinking he's dead, using horror movie logic, they decide to dump his body
into the ocean. They swear never to tell anyone about what they have done. 
The following year, looking very pale and nervous, the four have stopped
talking to each other, and Julie (*Party of Five's* Jennifer Love Hewitt) 
looks particularly cadaverous. It's the eve of another holiday weekend,
and strange things start happening, including an anonymous note that
simply states, "I know what you did last summer."
Without giving too much more of the story away, let's just say that people
disappear, get stalked, and have a lot of strange things happen to them,
okay. As in *Scream*, the suspense is constant. Knowing the psychology of
horror movies, Williamson and director Jim Gillespie frustrate you by not
delivering the expected thumps, and blindsiding you when they do. 
Another element that adds to the movie is the seaside setting in North
Carolina.  Crashing waves and rocky cliffsides are featured prominently in
the opening credits. Also, the lower-middle class setting is a nice
departure from the usual settings for these stalker/splatter films. 
The actors do a good job--nothing sensational, but not lacking either. 
Sarah Michelle Gellar (a/k/a Buffy the Vampire Slayer) plays Helen the
local beauty to the hilt. Freddie Prinze Jr. is the erstwhile boyfriend of
Julie, and Ryan Phillippe, the snotty rich kid, has made a 180 degree turn
from his stint as *One Life to Live*'s Billy, the sensitive gay teenager.
Anne Heche is particularly good in the limited role of Missy Egan, the
nervous wierdo who lives alone in the woods.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Review of La Vita E Bello (1997, a/k/a Life Is Beautiful, in Italian with
English subtitles)
Seen on 2 January 1999 by myself at the Paris for $8.75
There's a limit to which an audience that knows better can be asked to
suspend their disbelief, and *La Vita E Bello* crosses that line when it
uses the Holocaust more than it respects it.
The movie has two clear halves; the first part is in Arezzo, 1939, and the
second is in a concentration/death camp run by the Germans. The first half
is far better than the second, but is essential in establishing the
motivation for Guido Orefice (Roberto Benigni). As a whole, it's
disappointing--and insulting--despite many enjoyable and even hilarious
moments.
Roberto Benigni is best known to American audiences from *Son of the Pink
Panther* and as the Roman cabbie in *Night on Earth*, a manic physical
actor with many traditional comic talents that lend themselves to farces.
Here, Benigni is both co-author and director, and hand-tailored a role for
himself in which he gets to flex all those comic muscles, everything from
broad winks to careening down a hill in a car with no brakes. (In that
latter scene, which opens the movie, he is mistaken for the King of Italy;
a way of recognizing himself as the King of Italian Comedy, that country's
most recognizable movie export these days).
So you wonder, how does all this fit into the context of a Nazi death
camp? The answer: It doesn't.
The first half of the movie is a courtship, of Guido for Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's wife), and of Benigni of the audience. Guido is a
perpetual clown, somehow eluding capture from the Fascists he satirizes
and creating minor miracles by manipulating coincidence. That he is Jewish
in a time (1939) when Mussolini has passed laws against Jewish interaction
with Italians is minimized. His uncle is roughed up periodically, and
Guido accepts the old man's idea that sometimes "silence is the most
powerful cry." (NOTE: *The Garden of Finzi-Continis* shows, realistically,
the social and political isolation of Italian Jewry that led to their
ultimate round-up after being successfully demoralized.) But the courtship
works: Dora marries Guido and they produce a son.
It also works in that Benigni's comic charms win over the audience as he
prances in lush white marble restaurants and among flag-waving patriots.
He is part-Chaplin and part-Marx Brothers. Especially funny are the scenes
in which he plays a shell game with a local fascist's hat--it's right out
of Harpo and Chico. (The man's squabbling children are Benito and Adolfo).
In fact, the first half of the movie comes close to the great farces of
the 1930s.
However, when the family is sent to a death camp, *the antics continue*,
which surely would have resulted in instant death. But Guido keeps up the
pretense for the sake of his son Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini); he creates an
elaborate game that teaches his son that hiding is essential so they can
gain 1000 points and win a tank.
No matter how knowing and wise the son is, Guido explains away everything
as "someone's lying to you" when he's asked if it's true that they will be
turned into buttons and soap. 
Playing the fool is often a matter of survival (who could forget *I,
Claudius*), but set against the backdrop of genocide, this device is
insulting to anyone who knows even the basics about the Holocaust. Here,
the manipulation of coincidence is unbelievable. The likelihood that a man
of no matter how much he might be driven by love of his son, wanting to
ensure his survival, would have been rapidly demoralized and broken by the
backbreaking physical labor, disease, killing, torture and atrocity at the
camp. Ignored are *all* the features we know about the camps; the
ever-watchful guards, their sadistic behavior; the omnipresent stench of
death. It is not clear how long they are in the camp, but little Giosue is
always neat and clean; surely in real life, he would be lice-ridden and
emaciated. That Guido's clowning is barely affected by the sight of a pile
of hundreds of corpses is just obscene.
The idea that Guido has made the "ultimate sacrifice" is soft and fuzzy,
but in reality, he is teaching his son to hide behind a clown facade, and
avoid what is plainly obvious. This goes counter to the countless examples
of sacrifice and martyrdom in the real survival stories.
Perhaps *Life Is Beautiful* would have been better if Benigni had drawn
upon the real stories of Italian Jews who eluded the Nazis with the help
of their Christian neighbors; and Giosue could have learned some of the
beauty of life from the example of righteous gentiles, who perhaps could
have been brought into the games to allay the boy's fears.
As it remains, despite the "fable" introductory to the film, *Life Is
Beautiful* cheapens the Holocaust experience, and insults your
intelligence. If I could advise you to leave the moment the trains show
up, you could then enjoy this film as "the lovable clown wins his
princess." The first half is really must-see material; the second half is
just plain odd.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
Seen on 10 September 1997 for $8/75  at the SONY 19th Street
In British slang, "the full monty" means to be completely naked. While
*The Full Monty* is about a sextet of out-of-work blokes who decide to put
on a strip-tease act, a lot more than their bodies are laid bare.
"Sheffield, a city on the move!" cries a propaganda film of the 1950s,
declaring a boom for Sheffield and all of Britain. This is a stark
contrast to the present, where steel plants that once helped produced the
flatware on your dining table lay idle and rusting. The streets are not
bustling; Sheffield often looks like a ghost town. The ghosts in this case
are the flesh-and-blood men who are out of work, on the dole, with time on
their hands. The few jobs that are available are low-paying security guard
j obs.
Robert Carlyle plays Gaz, a former steel worker who cannot afford to do
much with his son Nathan (William Snape). Along with his friend Dave (Mark
Addy), they meander around town like a pair of middle-aged teenagers. 
A brief bit of eavesdropping in the mens room of a strip club catering to
ladies for the evening gives Gaz an idea--he should form a strip troupe
and raise money far quicker than the few jobs available to him. Then he
would have money for child support, a nd joint custody. 
What ensues is not unlike *The Seven Samurai*, with a highly entertaining
and comic story of how the other members of the troupe are found and
incorporated. First there is the suicidal Lomper (Steve Huison), followed
by the middle manager cum dance instru ctor Gerald (Tom Wilkinson),
pentagenarian Horse, who knows how to move, and Guy, who wants to dance
like Gene Kelly but winds up flat on his back everytime he tries to walk
up a wall. Luckily, Guy is extremely well endowed, which guarantees his
entry to the troupe.
As is often the case with movies set in Great Britain, there is a lot of
social commentary going on that often passes us by. Gerald lives a
middle-class lifestyle (gnomes all over the garden) and has a house full
on unnecessary luxuries. Lomper lives in a Victorian attached house with
his aged mother.  Dave has sexual troubles with his wife, likely stemming
from not having meaningful work. Many of these men had once been part of a
great nation, and empire, and now, they haunt their old places and the
high street has been supplanted by superstores and megamalls.
Men often define themselves by their work and their relative success in
work defines their overall "worthiness." This is clear in The Full Monty.
What makes it a winning movie is that the actors are able to pull off the
dual roles of physical comedy and e motional depth. That is certainly no
easy task, but the actors all pull it off. It's hard to find a favorite
performance because they all do so well.
Some scenes to watch for: Dave and Gaz meet the Lomper; Gerald's
interview; the six men waiting in line for the dole and spontaneously
jiggling to the strains of Donna Summer's "Hot Stuff." The soundtrack is a
lot of fun, too. 
As with many British movies, you often wish subtitles were included.
Luckily, the Full Monty website (via Fox Searchlight pictures) has a
little phrasebook included. 
----------------------------------
Copyright (c) 1997, Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com.
Other movie reviews with graphics can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html. 

Title
Review for Mutters Courage (1995)
Mutters Courage (1997, German with English subtitles)
  Seen on 18 September 1997 with Laura at the Film Forum for $8.
   The movie is framed by the device of Tabori on the set of the filming
   of his mother's Holocaust story. We see the actors and the sets and
   the strange meeting of George Tabori and the woman who will play his
   brave mother (Pauline Collins).
   My Mother's Courage presents such a vivid picture of the Holocaust and
   its ghastly procedures that it is often difficult to realize that it's
   just a movie. Many images familiar to people who have seen the film
   versions of the Holocaust are more vivid here because the film takes
   you right into the cattle cars in living color (many movies are more
   distanced or in black-and-white).
   The very arbitrariness of "order" is examined here. One moment you are
   a Hungarian citizen and the next you are being arrested on the street
   and being sent to your doom. Everyday you say hello to the shopkeeper;
   the next he is avoiding you entirely. What is so odd about this film
   is the comedy involved. Elsa Tabori is arrested on the street by two
   bumbling detectives who were pressed into retirement for the round-up.
   A sympathetic street car conductor wants to help Elsa escape; she gets
   off at the next stop and waits for the policemen to catch up to her.
   Beyond the horror of knowing what is behind the round-up, the waiting,
   the cattle-car trip, there is another level of thought going on. The
   immediate thoughts of the doomed. Elsa firmly believes that all you
   have to do is "be a good girl and everything will work out." This is
   put to the test when she takes on Maria (Natalie Morse), the gentile
   girl arrested--and violated--while visiting a Jewish friend the local
   fascists pursue viciously through her own home. Being a good girl does
   not, it turns out, become its own reward.. History and human nature
   often get in the way.
   We see a lot of Elsa's memories as she peeks through a crack in the
   cattle car to Auschwitz. The last ride of the doomed is contrasted to
   other rail passengers; gleeful children off to a lakeside trip, tawdry
   hooker in lingerie draped over fat crematoria builders in a luxury
   train car. Even the comfortable accomodations of the German officer,
   complete with LP player, provide a sharp contrast to what is happening
   in the cattle cars behind him, on the very same train.
   A lot of the moments in the film will be familiar to those familiar
   with the topic; e.g., the silent omniscient motorman who hangs out the
   side of the engine car is reminiscent of Shoah. What is unfamiliar is
   the comic elements, which do not always work, like the parody of the
   Hitler lookalike wearing the XX motif of Chaplin's The Great Dictator.
   Sometimes they work, sometimes they don't.
   The best parts of the movie belong to Pauline Collins. The decisions
   Elsa is forced to make are painful and contrary to her nature, and are
   truly show stopping and memorable. Also notable is the performance of
   Ulrich Tukur as the very Aryan, quixotic, and sympathetic Nazi officer
   in charge who proves that having power can make all the difference.
   My Mother's Courage is skillfully directed by Michael Verhoeven, best
   known for The Nasty Girl, and for an earlier exploration of the Nazi
   period in The White Rose (1982, about anti-Hitler German students). He
   knows when to keep away and when to close in.
   Most memorable shot: Elsa looks through the crack in the cattle car
   and sees the officer's reflection in a train passing by.
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
I have seen many buddy movies in my time--*Lethal Weapon,*
*Midnight Run,* *Thelma and Louise*. But the slowest of them all was
*Mrs. Brown*, which brings a curious look at a supposedly "more
reverential" time for the British monarchy, in light of today's royal high
jinks. 
Incredibly, Queen Victoria (portrayed by Judi Dench) took into close
confidence her Scottish servant, John Brown (Billy Connolly), while
isolating herself in the Scottish Highlands at Balmoral, mourning the
death of her beloved husband Prince Albert. Inconsolable, she shuns
official duties and carries on what government business she can 600 miles
removed for the governement.
This concerns her ministers; her eager son, the Prince of Wales, tries
desperately and in vain to take on some official duties; there are even
Parliamentarians who want to be dismantle the costly monarchy and
establish a Republic.  Things are *not* good. Prime Minister Benjamin
Disraeli (Alex Sher) is not amused. 
Only Brown can enlive n the Queen.  He even gets away with unusual
behavior like calling her "woman" in front of others. A bull in the
chinashop, he raises the ire of just about everyone at Balmoral, and in
London, just about everyone derisively calls the Queen "Mrs. Brown." 
So much for reverence. All of this is true (verified by *The Lives of the
Kings and Queens of England*, Antonia Fraser, Editor). Of course, nothing
remotely romantic occurs between them. What is unusual about the pair is
the almost obsessive devotion this "common man" has for his sovereign--for
her mental wellbeing and personal safely. Only he is truly concerned for
*her*. 
Apparently, Prince Albert, a "friend" of Brown's, had the rather
condescending "noble savage" view of working people. Where the film can
take liberties is the dramatization of how and why the uptight Queen is
able to completely unwind with the man who tends her horse. He is the
only person we see having real conversations with her, in which she drops
the royal "we" or third person nonsense. The entire royal family is
depicted, but they are all but indistinguishable from the maids and
ministers. Brown is, in effect, the only person the most powerful woman in
the world can confide.
Having a lifelong love of royal history and history in general, I found
this all very interesting. That Disraeli has to ingratiate himself with
Brown to prevail upon the Queen to come back to London and re-establish
herself as a real power fascinated me. It's not so hard to see how a
Rasputin could rise to power in Russia at his tsarina's side when you
consider her grandmother, who raised her, provided quite a role model. 
*Mrs. Brown* is slower than the 6 train, and is probably not for everyone.
The filming is unremarkable, but the br eathtaking Scottish countryside
compensates, and later scenes of Brown unspooling and declawed in the
decidedly more dangerous London, is understandable. He seems as out of
place in "civilization" as *Derzu Usala* does.
Basically, if you are a history buff, add a star. 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Seen on 24 December 1998 with Linda for $8.75 at the Lincoln Plaza Cinema
Perhaps I am turning into a stone, but I was unmoved by *The Sweet
Hereafter*, although it is a beautifully filmed movie. Other reviewers
have described it as elegaic. While it does remind you of an elegy, how
many elegies run feature-length? 
*The Sweet Hereafter* examines the lives of parents just after a fatal
accident in which a bus plunges through a guard rail, careens down an
embankment, and falls through the frozen surface of a lake in British
Columbia. 
The story that drives the movie is the arrival of an attorney, Mitchell
Stephens (Ian Holm) who wants to push some of the grieving parents into
pursuing compensation, that perhaps somehow the senseless tragedy can be
blamed on someone or something; a careless school bus driver, or a faulty
bolt, or something. As if monetary compensation will make up for the loss
of fourteen children. This sort of lawsuit will gain him one-third of the
netted compensation. Also, it means he has to find the "right" sort of pa
rents to testify.
There are also two parallels to the main storyline. First, there is the
irony of Stephens appealing to parents when his own daughter, a drug
addict, is out of control and he can no longer do anything for her. Or, as
he put it, his love for her has become and anger something like "steaming
piss." Also, there is the parallel of the children's story of the Pied
Piper of Hamelin. This is one of the strongest points of the movie. A lot
of the parents in *The Sweet Hereafter* are hardly worthy of their
children, and there is a strong sense of not just sadness but punishment as
well.
Director Atom Egoyan does a good job of showing people after tragedy.
There is a strong sense of the Time Before and the Time After.
Unfortunately, from the beginning of the movie, it is difficult to follow
the timing of the story and the many flashbacks, as there is a lot of
jumping around. Holm is shown having a chance meeting on a plane--a friend
of his daughter--to whom he talks of his daughter's troubles. Where that
fits into the timing of the rest of the story is very difficult. 
I think that because the story is told subtly, and because the characters
seem so low-key and almost stoic, it is hard to really empathize with
them. There is also the taboo of incest, a topic that should have evoked
more emotion, but Egoyan does a lot of filmus interruptus, and the
constant jumping around of flashbacks hurts the full development of
investing in the story and the characters. You are on the edge of tears,
and then suddenly, you are pulled out of the moment. Even when the
characters are fighting, as in the scene where Billy Ansell (Bruce
Greenwood) and Sam Burnell (Tom McCamus) disagree over having a group
lawsuit, there is no intensity. 
A town losing 14 children in a tragedy undoubtedly changes that town
forever, and Egoyan shows the emptiness and sterility very well. It's just
a shame that it was not as moving as it could have been. *The Sweet
Hereafter* left me with the feeling of looking at the carcass of a
wrecked bus, but not knowing anything about the people who perished within
or the people who loved them. Feeling sorry for them is as difficult as
feeling sorry for the people of Hamelin. There is more after than before
to really build the sort of sympathy a movie like this surely wants to
achieve. 
Written by Atom Egoyan, based on a novel by Russell Banks

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
Seen on 31 January 1998 for $8 with Lynne and Sandy at the UA Continental
Twin in Forest Hills
*Fallen* is a bit of a cross between *The Prophecy* and *The Hidden*.
*Fallen* begins with Detective John Hobbes (Denzel Washington) visiting
the death row cell of a vicious killer he was instrumental in snaring. The
killer is unusual--as if they weren't unusual already; he mutters
something incomprehensible, and definitely gives the impression that the
struggle is not over. Early on in the movie, we learn that Hobbes is an
honorable cop. He cannot be bribed, and he is devoted to his work and to
his family, which comprises a somewhat addled brother and young nephew. 
Soon after the prisoner meets his end in the gas chamber, copycat murders
occur that start to incriminate Hobbes himself. Some clues by the killer
and some independent research (the strange mutterings were ancient Syrian
Aramaic) lead Hobbes to realize that a similar string of killings
happened 30 years before to another honorable cop. A visit to the man's
grown-up daughter--Gretta Milano (Embeth Davidtz)--proves that something
weird and usual is afoot. 
It turns out that the killer is not a person but the spirit of an angry
angel named Azazel, a malevolent spirit thousands of years old who can
jump from being to being and that makes him/it very hard to find. 
Now, if you can go along with this premise, you are halfway to enjoying
this low-key thriller. That was my problem with the movie. It was pretty
slow-moving for a thriller, which is a shame since all the elements are
there for it to be a bit more, well, thrilling. In fact, my brother dozed
off more than once. 
*Fallen* clearly is influenced by the recent upswing in supernatural
thriller shows like *The X Files* and *Millenium*. Watching Washington
unravel the supernatural mystery while being stalked by a vengeful spirit
who can be anyplace is interesting, although sometimes finding information 
about Azazel is too convenient and less than credible. 
The best scenes in the movie is the one in which Azazel jumps from person
to person. One takes place right in the police precinct, and then out on
the street. The better one though is the one in which Azazel chases Gretta
when he figures out she knows about him. It is the only really
spine-tingling scene in the movie. *Fallen*'s premise requires a lot more
action than it delivers. 
Director Gregory Hoblit does a good job of keeping a creepy atmosphere
going, and picks some downright dingy neighborhoods of nighttime
Philadelphia to do this. Overall, the movie is a bit sluggish, though, and
it is hard not to see why, when you consider the story and the cast.
Denzel Washington plays his role low-key. His co-stars are John Goodman
(talk about sluggish) and Donald Sutherland, and the rest are not
particularly noteworthy or familiar. Lynne points out, "As always, Donald
Sutherland is a problem." And he is. His performance and role are the
most out of place. Hobbes is a star officer under his command; why he
chooses to put him down constantly is not explained, and doesn't fit with
the rest of the movie. 
So, *Fallen* is not a bad movie, but it really might not be worth $8. It's
a good bet for a video rental, though. Add a star if you really love the
lyric "ti-i-i-me is on my side, yes it is." You'll hear it throughout the
movie. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
(France, 1996); released in the US under the title When the Cat's Away
Seen on 22 June 1997 with Tony for $8 at the Quad Cinema.
Based on a true incident, director Cedric Klapish discovers
that the search for a lost cat in the Bastille section of Paris turns up
a lot more than you might think. Chloe (Garance Clavel) lives with Michel
(Olivier Py), who really doesn't want to look after Gris-Gris (Arapimou),
her black cat. She eventually finds Madame Renee (played by chatty non-actor
Renee Le Calm), who has at least a half-dozen cats and several dogs in her
charge. Imagine Chloe's horror when she returns to discover that Gris-Gris
has flown the coop. Madame Renee springs into action, though, with her network
of other septuagenarian friends in their Bastille neighborhood. She goes
on daily treks with the local simpleton Djamel (Zinedine Soualem), and little
old ladies spot her a mile away with their advice and sympathies.
As Chloe--a make-up assistant--searches for Gris-Gris,
she undergoes a change. She becomes immersed in her neighborhood and becomes
part of it. It is impossible to overlook the forces destroying the personality
fabric of the neighborhood--evictions, demolitions, and gentrification.
As we are treated to a view of the rooftops of Paris, large cranes loom
over the neighborhood. At one point the camera lingers as a giraffe-like
bulldozer eats away at the top portion of a church it is destroying. Chloe's
transformation is complete as she runs into a work acquaintance--who has
just opened a trendy shop--while searching for her cat with Madame Renee
and another crony. The new shop owner looks at Chloe's friends askance while
then loudly criticize the store and its wares ("Who would pay 800 francs
for a metal bra?").
Most urban dwellers can empathize with this Parisian neighborhood's
woes; the march of realty development and how it makes irrevocable changes
is a universal phenomenon, and urbaphiles everywhere will sadly recognize
"the beginning of the end" as it is shown here. The camera works
mainly as an onlooker. Chloe's loneliness is evident as she watches others
have love lives--her roommate Michel features a new boyfriend every week,
people at bars have each other, while men and women she doesn't want hit
on her. But, as Chloe becomes a real part of the neighborhood, she begins
to discover that happiness can be found right there in your own arrondissement.
NOTE:  Watch carefully for the hilarious depiction of Claire's vacation.
If you turn away or blink, you'll miss it for sure!

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Seen on 8 October 1998 with Lothlorien at the Sony Lincoln Square as a
Sneak Preview ($0)
What makes a honor student withdraw from his usual activities, his
friends, and his studies, and become antisocial, twisted, and flirting
with disaster? Some might say it's sociopathic behavior brought on my too
much curiosity into evil. Others might say, "confusion with his sexual
orientation." Apt Pupil says yes to both, and quite homophobically, I
might add.
While Apt Pupil does present the nuances of power, manipulation, control,
and evil very well, it does so in a way that manages to both trivialize
the Holocaust and bring us back to the good old days of the killer homo. 
The "fun" begins when said honor student Todd Bowen (Brad Renfro) for some
reason becomes enthralled by Hitler's Final Solution, does extensive
research, and does the one thing a 40-year-old manhunt cannot do: unearth
the identity and whereabouts of war criminal Kurt Dussander (played by Ian
McKellen), right there in his home town. Right there, on the bus! He has
fingerprint proof and everything. So he shoehorns his way into Dussander's
home and life. He visits every day after school, craving stories of the
good old days.
The sickening recounting of the inmate's final agonies do take their toll
on poor Todd, who starts to have nightmares and even hallucinations during
the day. His friend notices a change in him. So do his parents. So does a
caring social worker (David Schwimmer with a mustache drew belly laughs
from the audience). Boy, are *they* ever in for a surprise.
There's a lot not to like in Apt Pupil. The idea that an otherwise normal
kid will become sociopathic from an overinterest in Nazi deathcamps is
ridiculous. That a kid will turn to sociopathic behavior and homicide
because he's afraid he *might* be gay, and because one girl has gay baited
him during a failed bout of making out in a car, is pretty over the top,
and frankly, antiquated. That the drifter is HIV+, willing to trade sex
for lodging, and wearing fey clothing, is something I have not seen since,
well, I was too young to remember anything this appalling in my lifetime
(yes, I am that young).
The homophobia in the movie is offensive and disturbing. HOWEVER, the
movie does have a few redeeming qualities. The opening credits are very
good. The exploration of manipulation and control is
excellent--Machiavelli would be yelling "checkmate!" from his grave during
some of the scenes. McKellen and Renfro turn in very good performances as
the Nazi and his protege. There are some truly wonderful bits of
cinematography. The scene in which Todd is practically flying on and then
thrown from his bicycle reminded me of Zentropa (a movie I had finally
just gotten over). There is also a scene that is one of the most gripping
I have ever seen (don't want to give away the context); that such horror
begins with a cut-away to a seen from The Jeffersons is actually hilarious
and ingenious, not tacky. Despite all the badness, the movie has, in its
demented world, a very strong sense of humor.
Personally, I think we should have seen more of Todd before he unearths
his Nazi friend. Seen some of the murderous potential up front, e.g., the
scene in which Todd kills a pigeon should have been in the first twenty
minutes of the film, before meeting Dussander.
Directed by Bryan Singer; adapted for the screen by Brandon Boyce from a
story by thrillmaster Stephen King. Cinematography by Tom Sigel.
PS: The title is very amusing if you say it very loudly with a British
accent, emphasizing the consonants--aPT! Poo-Pil! Call me for a
demonstration.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Pillow Book, The (1996)
(France / UK / Netherlands, 1995; Japanese, Mandarin, and Cantonese with
English subtitles)
  Seen for $8.75 on 22 June 1997 by myself at the SONY Tower East.
   Peter Greenaway's latest film proves to be a departure from his recent
   efforts--it has a discernible plot. The last, and only, Greenaway film
   I have seen was Prospero's Book, and it was one of the best naps I
   have ever had in the movies. Other patrons asked me to stop snoring,
   since it was keeping them awake. He is probably best known for The
   Cook, the Thief, the Wife and Her Lover. In The Pillow Book, Nagiko
   (Vivian Wu) tells us her life story. As a girl, her father would write
   on her face and neck. She also witnesses her father (Ken Ogata)
   subjected to an inferior sexual role by his Hong Kong publisher (Yoshi
   Oida). Interspersed with her story are passages from the 1000-year-old
   pillow book of the Empress Nagiko; her modern-day namesake tries to
   keep a pillow book of her own as well.
   Greenaway finds wonderful ways to display the vivid descriptions from
   the Empress's writings. Years later, Nagiko has trouble finding a
   perfect relationship that balances good lovemaking with good
   calligraphy. After a disastrous marriage in Japan, Nagiko flees to
   Hong Kong, where she lives in squalor but eventually climbs to
   lavishness. She eventually meets Jerome (Ewan McGregor), the bisexual
   that Nagiko initially rejects but then takes on as a lover. He
   convinces her to write on him, rather than being written on. She wants
   to get her work published by her father's publisher, so she writes her
   work on Jerome and send him to the publisher, who has his workers copy
   down the text. He also partakes in lovemaking with Jerome as well.
   Greenaway has made a name for himself as a visual artist whose
   storylines often fall flat.
   The Pillow Book features a visual opulence rarely seen in the cinema
   today. He uses picture-within-a -picture techniques that requires a
   certain visual agility from the viewer, especially since there are
   subtitles involved as well. Making viewers uncomfortable is also
   something for which Greenaway is famous, by grossing out the audience
   (grave desecration), by showing us the painstaking sexual education of
   Nagiko by her parents, the cruelty of her husband (Ken Mitsuishi), or
   by tiring the audience out with repetition. But through it all, every
   frame of the film is alive, with color, black-and-white, multiple
   frames, excellent cinematography and striking sets.
   The performances are fine, but they are secondary to the filming and
   the mise-en-scene. Also, since the storyline and the characters are so
   bizarre, it is hard to comment on the performances, except to say that
   the actors certain meet the challenge. There are some long passages
   without dialogue, and this will probably unsettle American audiences
   used to explosions and foul language. The most "violent" scenes in the
   film occur when Nagiko slaps someone, and some environmental activists
   who kidnap Nagiko. (That subplot, along with the annoying photographer
   Hoki (Yutaka Honda), are the most annoying and distracting portions of
   the film.)
   _________________________________________________________________
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for East Side Story (1997)
(Germany, 1997, in German, Russian, Czeck and Rumanian with English Subtitles)
  Seen on 29 June 1997 for $8 with Tony at the Film Forum. I arrived late, but
  missed about two minutes of the film.
   This is the documentary that asks the question "Who knows how things
   could have turned out if Socialism had just been more fun?" It was
   discovered that one film could do more for propaganda than political
   meetings, especially if you had a clear minority of the population
   attending agitation rallies. But everyone loves the movies and wants
   to be entertained, especially if you have been waiting all day on line
   for state-sponsored toilet paper at GUM. Apparently, only 40 musicals
   were made behind the Iron Curtain, and very often the only role models
   they had were the "traumfabrik" of Hollywood. Happiness was a
   universal theme in both the East and the West.
   The Soviets discovered early on what an important tool they had in the
   cinema, and even Stalin himself was persuaded to allow the making of
   musicals. One, Grigori Alexandrov's Volga Volga, was his favorite--he
   viewed it more than 100 times and made a gift of it to FDR during the
   war. Unfortunately, while the actors since "our happiness is blooming
   like the wheat" the infamous purges ravaged Russia in general and
   Russian movie houses in particular. At least the survivors liked it.
   After the war, the countries that had socialism thrust upon them
   continued to make movies, but under difficult circumstances. Censors
   worked against them while they labored under shortages of essentials,
   like money and electricity. Directors like Grigori Alexandrov played
   the fool, like the Roman Emperor Claudius, to survive the political
   perils of the communist regimes. The musicals proved successful in
   many of the Eastern Bloc countries, but they were few and far between.
   The documentary succeeds; it shows a lot of clips while speaking to a
   variety of people involved in Eastern Bloc musicals--cast members,
   writers, and even audience members. We even get to meet the "Doris Day
   of the East" and the "Elvis of the East." Actually, they were more
   like East Germany's answer to Frankie Avalon and Annette Funicello.
   The musicals themselves are as good, bad, memorable, forgettable,
   clever or stupid as anything made here. Hot Summer was made the same
   year as My Fair Lady and surpassed its Western competition at the box
   office, sending throngs of East German teens to the theaters, to the
   record stores, and to the North Sea for beach vacations. At one point,
   a Russian woman notes that sometimes, holding onto some basic untruths
   is essential "just to survive," and it is not too difficult to imagine
   why the masses didn't mind seeing the screen tell them that prosperity
   and a wide variety of consumer goods were just around the corner.
   _________________________________________________________________
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
Review of Central do Brasil (1998, a/k/a Central Station; Portuguese with
English subtitles)
Seen on Christmas Eve 1998 with Linda at the Lincoln Plaza Cinemas for
$8.75
Big cities are renowned for grinding down the little people, and that goes
triple for the third world. Much like the world of Bunuel's Mexico City in
Los Olvidados, Rio de Janeiro is merciless. People are out for themselves
and if you take a wrong turn, you are much more likely to be the victim of
vigilante justice than police brutality.
Dora is a retired schoolteacher who supplements her pension by writing
letters for illiterate peasants reporting home on their urban
fortunes--sometimes lying, so no one will worry. They trust her to send
the, but she often doesn't, playing God and judging which ones will reach
their destination.
One of her patrons is killed by a bus, leaving her son Josue (Vinicius de
Oliveira) to fend for himself on the streets. Dora takes pity on him and
takes him in. Thinking she can get him adopted by rich foreigners, Dora
sells him to a local thug, and she buys a new television.
Horrified to learn that he is more likely going to become an
unwilling--and deceased--organ donor, she kidnaps him, and the two go on
the run. Dora hopes to reunite him with his father in a remote rural
outpost.
Fernanda Montenegro's Dora is both hard-bitten and vulnerable. It's easy
to see the decent person underneath the her current cynical shell. De
Oliveira, a nonactor, is wonderful as not just a helpless child, but as
Dora's moral barometer. His outrage at her low ethics helps prompt her
into better behavior.
What ensues is a journey "from nowhere to nowhere," as another critic put
it; Josue's father has moved several times, and Dora pushes further into
the frontier to find him. What happens is not predictable. Dora's
metaphoric journey and inevitable decisions are selfless. Given the
hopeless nature of Rio, her decisions are almost miraculous, as she gives
back hope and faith despite crushing realities. It takes looking after a
young boy for Dora to come to a major realization: "I long for my father;
I long for everything." The letters dictated to her are more than
messages; they are prayers.
Director Walter Salles Jr. takes us through the unfamiliar landscapes of
urban and rural Brazil. Surrounded by natural splendors, we see the
emptiness of the cramped tenement projects in Rio, and the fullness of the
open valleys of the north. The further they go from Rio, the more blind
faith and religious imagery fills the vacant rural landscape. In a way,
the excesses of decadent greed and religious fervor both are seen as
crazy, spinning out of control.
The Portuguese title (Central do Brasil) suggests that what is happening
here is essentially what is happening in Brazil. Salles shows what's
possible when cynicism and greed are dropped in favor of belief

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
"Life isn't anything if you're not obsessed," declares young Pecker
(Edward Furlong). He ought to know. He's obsessed with taking photos of
everything he sees, froom a burger sizzling in griddle grease to rats
rutting in the trash. The movie opens in an almost sitcom fashion as we
are introduced to all the other obsessed people in his life. There's his
girlfriend Shelly (Christina Ricci), who controls her Spin and Grin
laundromat with neurotic verve; sister Tina (Martha Plimpton) is
enthusiastically gay friendly as she emcees the gay male go-go bar
dancers; friend Matt (Brendan Sexton III) sees his shoplifting tendencies
as a career choice; his father is obsessively anti-pubic hair; thrift-shop
running Mom (Mary Kay Place) is passionate about treating the homeless
humanely; kid sister Little Chrisy (Lauren Hulsey) shrieks until she is
plying her face with sweets; even Grandma ("Memama"; played by Jean
Schertler) has her shtick--treating her statue of the Blessed Virgin like
she's Charlie McCarthy.
Pecker holds a photo show in the greasy burger joint where he works, and
art dealer Rorey Wheeler (the ubiquitous Lili Taylor) walks in and turns
him into a star. She holds a show of his artwork up in New York, and has
her sights set on a show at the Whitney.
In equally sitcom fashion, there is a trip made up to his gallery show,
by all the aforementioned principals. Their homey and homespun obsesses
Ozzie-and-Harrietness is contrasted as fundamentally good and pure next to
the pretentious New York art scene. Mom has the homeless in for dinner
while his shoplifting buddy gets unheard-of action from not one but two
girls--being an instant celebrity just for appearing as a photo subject at
a gallery.
Fame and fortune turns them all off, and turns their lives upside down.
Pecker ensues by eschewing New York and his opportunities by only having
his art shows in Baltimore. A lot of this clearly comes from writer and
director John Waters's own experience from dealing with the New York art
world, and having home in both cities. But Baltimore is home and where his
heart is. And this is part of why the movie fails. The heavy handed
treatment of Baltimore is good and real and New York is bad and
pretentious makes everything a little stilted. It's like a campy version
of *Sunrise*.
But there are lots of wonderful little John Waters moments and dialogue
throughout the film that alleviate the sitcom stylings and more
black-and-white nature of the two-city rivalry. There are some great
lines, too: "I beg of you, do no become an asshole," "Public hair causes
crime," and Rorey telling Pecker, "How can you be so kind and gentle and
still have talent?"
And while the stiltedness is oppressive, his love of Baltimore is not. He
clearly loves his home town. I haven't seen so many scenes on public buses
since *A Bronx Tale*. The distinctly nondescript skyline of Baltimore is
featured prominently. A pit beef stand and a lesbian strip joint called
"The Pelt Room" are shown with great love and affection, as are most
of the "little places" and "little people" in the film.
One of the best scenes: Pecker and Shelly make out in a voting booth while
an unnaturally obsessed election worker seeks out the troublemakers
disrespecting the sanctity of the polling process. When disturbed, Shelly
retorts "I'm trying to VOTE!"
*Pecker*. Not one of John Waters's best, but still very enjoyable. Be
warned: Hairspray it ain't. Cameo appearances by Patty Hearst, Greg
Gorman, and photographer Cindy Sherman. Original music by Stewart
Copeland.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Seen on 13 February 1997 for $8.75 with Laura, Rob, and Michelle at the
Loews Village VII
"The hardest soul to save was his own," claims the tagline to *The
Apostle*, and it's true. Robert Duvall gives a towering performance as the
charismatic, convinced, and calculating Euliss "Sonny" Dewey, also known
as The Apostle E.F., accountable only to his Lord, Jesus Christ. Written,
produced, and directed by Duvall, *The Apostle* is a bit of a legend in
independent filmmaking. It's easy to see why. It's all about the deep
conviction held by Pentecostal Christians in the Deep South; in many ways
it's probably best for everyone, especially the audience, that Hollywood
had little or nothing to do with it.
*The Apostle* opens with Sonny visiting a Pentecostal church in 1939 as a
child. Fast-forwarding to today, to an auto accident, Sonny stops his car
and goes to the victim, near death, to bring him a chance of salvation in
Jesus Christ, regardless of the victim's faith. Sonny definitely has a
personal relationship with God, but as a human being, he is flawed. Unlike
many movies that always show preachers as hypocrites, Sonny is a man
driven by true faith, and by his emotions. Just as he rushes to bring
salvation to the unsaved, and to hug parishioners and tell him he loves
them, he also just as quickly cracks the man who cuckolds him with a
little league bat in front of his children, or beat up a racist man who
wants to demolish a church that allows blacks to attend. 
Without giving away too much, I can say that *The Apostle* is one of the
most original and different movies I have ever seen. Duvall's performance
dominates the film. As a gay non-observant Jew, it was fascinating to
watch him bring faith to people, while still entertaining his more basic
desires, and being very human. One of the high points of the movie is the
confrontation between Duvall and Billy Bob Thornton. In an era of
skepticism and harshness, it is interesting to see how people need
something to believe it, and the people who bring belief to them. The
subject matter is not approached in a judgmental way either, which makes
it rather original. Religion and faith are commodities usually held up for
ridicule in Hollywood, and hard to understand if you are not particularly
observant.
There are a lot of good actors in *The Apostle* but Duvall pretty much
overshadows them; but this is a necessary evil. *The Apostle* is all about
one man's faith and charisma, and what it can do. Farah Fawcett plays
Sonny's wife Jesse; Miranda Richardson is his newest love interest; June
Carter Cash is Sonny's mother. 
Mary Lynette Braxton, Jewell Jernigan, and Zelma Loyd are wonderful as The
Apostle E.F.'s parishioners, and Walt Goggins gives a subtle performance
as Sam. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Ma vie en rose (1997)
(a/k/a  Ma vie en rose; French with English subtitles)
"Sometimes you just have to be yourself," claims the tagline on the movie
poster. Of course, being oneself is usually easiest for children, before
they learn what is expected of them from society or their families.
So what happens to those children who at an early age know they are
different, especially in a suburb where you know what to expect every day,
where every morning the wives walk their husbands to their cars, all
simultaneously, and where the same reckless neighbor in the yellow
hatchback almost hits you every day? What happens when you are a
seven-year-old boy who deep down knows he wants to be a girl, and marry
that little boy, Jerome (Julien Riviere), across the street?
This is the moment of discovery for Ludovic (George Du Fresne); but it's
not a good discovery. It is perfectly natural for Ludo to want to have
long hair and wear lipstick and earrings and some pretty dresses. It even
seemed perfectly natural to Jerome to allow Ludo to engage him in a play
wedding. So what went wrong? The adults freaked out and the classmates
instinctively move to hit the nail that stands out among the others.
While all the performances are very good--the angry neighbors, the
bewildered parents, the understanding psychologist, and the vicious
classmates--it is Du Fresne's portrayal of Ludovic that is absolutely
amazing. It's hard to know how this child actor is able to portray this
character whose innocence is shattered at this moment, when he learns to
that to say what you feel is to dig your own grave (apologies to Sinnead
O'Connor). Whether he is weathering the pain of disapproving parents,
dressing up, or fantasizing about escaping into the World of Pam
(Belguim's answer to Barbie), Du Fresne is a natural. Frankly, I don't
know how he does it. Perhaps he has not had his innocence completely
shattered by the real world yet.
Michele Laroque and Jean-Philippe Coffey as Ludo's trying-to-understand
parents are also excellent.
This is possibly one of the best movies of the year. If you have every
felt different or outside, you will find this movie hitting you in the
heart; and if you are inside, you get a glimpse of what it's like for
those who are outside, or rather, pushed out. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
Seen at the UA Criterion for $4.50 on 28 July 1997
*My Best Friend's Wedding* is the film that finally proves that a woman's
best friend is not diamonds--he's a gay man.  I had resisted this movie,
because frankly, who can forget *Mary Reilly*? Did anyone even see *Mary
Reilly*? Case closed...
*My Best Friend's Wedding* is the best Julia Roberts movie since *I Love
Trouble.* Let's face it, Dermot Mulroney (as Michael) and RRRRRRupert
Everett (as George; a gay actor playing a gay character) are a lot more
appealing than Nick Nolte--whom I love, even though he refuses to return
my many, many phone calls.
Julianne (Julia Roberts) has a best friend in Michael (Dermot Mulroney) 
with whom she once had a brief romance, nine years ago. But when she
discovers that he is marrying superwealthy Kimmy (Cameron Diaz--who's
inexplicably hated by many women I know), she suddenly realizes that she's
in love with him, and she has four days to stop the nuptials. 
What ensues is improbable but comic. Julie flies into Chicago and is
immediately swept into the wedding plans. Kimmy, the bride, fawns all over
Julie and after a while, it seems that Kimmy really is perfect. She
thwarts Julie's attempts to discredit or embarrass her--whether she's
being forced to sing off-key karaoke or admitting wrongdoing to Michael.
This frustrates Julianne. So she has to call in the big guns--her gay
friend George. He actually has more of a life than she does. George shows
up in Chicago and poses as her fiance. 
Her machinations fail and it is hard to root for her. What make the movie
enjoyable is that it is a traditional romantic comedy, except this time
the Rock Hudson type is openly gay. Even the opening credits give a nod to
tradition. Julia Robertsactually has good comic timing. She falls down
with the best of them--John Ritter, Dudley Moore. Personally, watching
people fall down is a cheap laugh unless it's done well (which is why I do
not really like too many Blake Edwards movies). 
As for the romantice, the soundtrack amplifies the throwback ambiance with
ballads like "The Way You Look Tonight" or the entire cast exuberantly
singing "I Say a Little Prayer" at a crab house (the best scene in the
movie--the reason I would sit through the movie again). No Depeche Mode or
Smith dirges here. 
Dermot Mulroney turns in a good performance as the "straight man" and we
will probably be seeing him in bigger-budget movies from now on; but the
real scene-stealer is Everett, who is more than just the typical gay
character dying to be a woman's best friend. He is a good friend, and he
counters her mad schemes with comeuppance rather than compliance. 
The supporting cast is also very good. Rather memorable are Rachel
Griffiths and Carrie Preston as the loudly dressed sisters and friends of
the bride, Samantha and Amanda; Susan Sullivan shows up as the upper crust
mother of the bride and plays the part well. 
JD Department: I could have very easily snuck into Speed 2 at the
Criterion, but decided against it; if the building collapsed, it would be
worse than being found dead with dirty underwear. 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com.
Other film reviews by Seth Bookey are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/mission.html

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
Seen on 8 November 1998 with Tony at the Quad for $8.
"You must please excuse me. You see, I'm blind," says the old man to the
monster--the noble, misunderstood, and murderous creature cobbled together
by Dr. Frankenstein. And so a pure but brief friendship ensues in The
Bride of Frankenstein.
Contrast this to the first meeting of Frankenstein's director James Whale
(Sir Ian McKellen) and yardsman Clayton Boone (Brendan Fraser), where
first appearances prove deceptive. That friendship takes longer to blossom
but finds a real depth.
The movie opens during the final year in the life of gay film director
James Whale, best known as the director of Frankenstein and its first
sequel, and less known for The Invisible Man and Showboat. He suffers a
stroke, and while he remains as wily as ever in his 1950s-style
queer-dirty-old-man way, the past he spent his life escaping now "floods
all over" him. Not just moviemaking, but also the ghosts of a lost time
and lost possibilities. The memories of a boy brought up by people who
were "like a family of farmers given a giraffe and not knowing what to do
with it."
Clayton Boone proves to be an exception for Whale. He's not the typical
fawning acolyte, impressed by status and fame. In his own environment, the
trailer-dwelling gardener is surrounded by more simplistic people, who say
things like "Funny is funny. Scary is scary. You don't mix 'em." While
Whale slowly reveals himself to Boone, making himself visible a bit at a
time, his devoted yet somewhat disgusted housekeeper Hanna (Lynn Redgrave)
spills all the beans eventually ("He's a buggerer!") to Boone. Despite
having the gaps filled for him, he keeps coming back, posing for a
painting and befriending the ill, older man, finding a real affection and
respect for him. Remember, this is the mid-1950s. Such understanding
between two men so clearly different is not expected.
The friendship has two culminations--a hilarious one at a party thrown by
George Cukor (another gay director) for Princess Margaret, and a more
pathos-filled one later that evening during a thunderstorm. While
comparisons to Love and Death on Long Island have been made, Gods and
Monsters succeeds in two ways the earlier film did not: There is a certain
degree of fulfillment, and a greater sense of depth of the two
protagonists.
McKellen's performance is outstanding, as he vascilates from witty
(laughing off his "touch of stroke") to heartrending (as he remembers his
personal losses during World War I) to salacious and lubricious (cajoling
a reporter into stripping). (It almost makes up for the homophobic Apt
Pupil). Fraser holds his own as typical working man with an atypical
capacity for understanding. 
Redgrave, as Hanna, brings a real Calvinism to her role as the
near-spousal devotee of her boss in a Hollywood where the invisible are
allowed to live out dissipated lifestyles as long as they keep it quiet.
Her almost puritanical outlook brings a real hilarity to the "den of
iniquity" she thinks she is tending.
Director Bill Condon brings a fullness to James Whale by mixing movies and
memories, alternating black and white with color, and humor with sadness.  
This has brought Gods and Monsters to a higher level that has garnered him
several awards already, was the toast of the New York Film Festival, and
has a lot of people calling for Oscar nominations. Based on Christopher
Bram's novel Father of Frankenstein (which received lukewarm reviews),
Condon's adaptation is one of those instances of the movie bettering a
book.
Also starring Lolita Davidovich, David Dukes, Jack Plotnick, and Rosalind
Ayres as a dead ringer for actress Elsa Lanchester (who played "The
Bride"). Original music by Carter Burwell. Cinematography by Stephen M.
Katz.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
(1997, one of two films with this title)
  Seen on 20 September 1997 at the Cineplex Baronet Coronet for $8.75 as a
  Sneak Preview.
   Thriller. Suvival. Wilderness. Bear. Those are the terms the Internet
   Movie Database uses to categorize The Edge, and boy, never were they
   more accurate. Initially, the commercials for this movie made it look
   like another dopey "two rivals fight in the deep woods, plus a
   grizzly" film. The lure of two-for-the-price-of-one brought me in, and
   I am glad I knew next to nothing before entering the theatre.
   In a nutshell, older gazillionaire Charles Morse (Anthony Hopkins) and
   his much younger model wife (Elle Macpherson) come to the world's
   largest log cabin for a photoshoot, along with the photographer (Bob,
   played by Alec Baldwin), his assistant Stephen (Harold Perrineau Jr.),
   and various other personnel. Charles has a voracious appetite for
   knowledge and always has his nose in an informative book, but he also
   notices that his wife and Bob are way too chummy.
   Charles, Bob, and Stephen take on an impromptu adventure to find a
   lone hunter to be a model turns deadly as their small pontoon plane
   goes down (stunning homage to Hitchcock, that scene). The pilot dies;
   the other three have to figure out how they are going to get back to
   the lodge. Oh, and a gigantic bear (Bart the Bear) is after them. All
   this might sound like a vague improvement on The River Wild, but it
   far exceeds that sort of parallel thanks to riveting direction by
   relative nobody Lee Tamahori and an intelligent screenplay by David
   Mamet.
   What the commercials do not show is the presence of Stephen; it only
   shows Bob and Charles as rivals. Watching the billionaire bookworm
   take charge of their survival is interesting. If it were me, I'd be
   dead in about a half hour. Charles forces the men to participate in
   their own survival.
   The only intelligent line in Copland (the next movie I saw) is that
   despite technological and other advances, the human thought process is
   still rather primitive. Watching Hopkins play a man who has every
   reason to be less than civilized while poised to fight his rival in
   circumstances that would allow less than refined behavior is
   fascinating. But it is not a big intellectual exercise; The Edge
   provides one of the best edge-of-your-seat movies I have seen in
   years. Tamahori comes very close to being the next potential
   Hitchcock, giving the sort of thrills humanity gave up when they gave
   up hunting in favor of agriculture.
   The Edge takes none of the turns you might expect. The breathtaking
   woods of Alberta are not forced to carry the film. Anthony Hopkins
   once again proves why he is one of the best actors of our day, adding
   another wonderful performance to a pantheon of memorable characters.
   Alec Baldwin surprises also, and the hitherto unknown (to me) Harold
   Perrineau Jr. was equally good. Elle Macpherson serves her purpose, if
   you were wondering.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Seen on 29 December 1998 by myself at the Cineplex Worldwide for $3
*The Siege* gives us a "what-if" scenario ripped from today's headlines.
As one of its characters says, "everybody uses the Palestinians." What
would happen if terrorism hit hard on the domestic front, and the army had
to declare martial law in New York City?
Apparently, it would be laden with inter-agency squabbling with impromptu
roundups and concentration camps for suspect minorities.
>From the get-go, the Arabs are the enemy, and in retaliation for blowing
up the US facility in Darhan, Saudi Arabia, the US abducts Sheik Ahmed Bin
Talal, a terrorist mastermind. In demanding his release, his supporters
start a terror campaign in New York City. Buses, a theatre, even a federal
building, are blown up. Parents take their kids out of schools, and
backfiring buses send people running for cover.
The FBI is, as always, Hollywood's choice of good guy, and leading the
investigation is Anthony Hubbard (call him Hub), played by a stalwart,
earnest Denzel Washington. Tony Shalhoub plays his fellow FBI officer
Frank Haddad, a Lebanese-American. The minority buddy thing works here.
Certainly better than *Lethal Weapon 4*.
Had the movie merely been a beat-the-clock investigation while the Army
rounded up Arabs in Brooklyn, it might have worked better. However, there
is the sometimes confusing three-way conflict of Annette Benning's
character, CIA personnel named either Elise Kraft or Sharon Bridger. Her
love of Arab culture, knowledge of Arabic, and carnal knowledge of Samir
Nazhde (Sami Bouajila) throws in the additional twist of "whose side is
she on, anyway?" Also tossed in is the bickering in DC over how to
proceed, whether to declare martial law at all.
The Siege touches on a lot of themes, and the most important of these is
how we view "the enemy among us," but it is done without a real
examination of Arab culture. For example, Haddad has a family event,
clearly muslim, to which he invites his co-workers, but it is not clear
what the event it. Meanwhile, in the opening scenes, a "menacing mosque"
is revealed to be in Brooklyn, with the World Trade Center in the
background. The best scene, in which Haddad tries to locate his son after
he's been taken from his home, shows the turmoil of being from an alien
culture, and realizing that you are not as assimilated or accepted as you
thought you were. "I am not your partner; I'm a sand nigger," he wails to
Hub while seeking his incarcerated son.
After the requisite countdowns and car chases, there's the obligatory
victory of Right over Wrong, as Hubbard trumps army bad guy General
William Devereaux (Bruce Willis in a remarkably restrained performance
that is not annoying).
While *The Siege* is not a bad film--the tension is well sustained,
especially in the exploding bus scene--it is formulaic and simplistic. The
use of location shooting for Manhattan and Brooklyn goes a long way to
make it a bit more compelling and realistic.
Sidenote: Annette Benning has never looked worse. Her "Pope Joan" crewcut
does not suit her. She also maintains a monotonously incredulous look
that begets a disappointed latte consumer than a CIA operative. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Eve's Bayou (1997)
Seen on 8 November 1997 with Linda at the SONY Lincoln Square for
$21.50--two teletickets for Linda's birthday. 
*Eve's Bayou* is one of the best movies I have seen this year. It is
difficult to classify this movie. Set in the early 1960s in the Louisiana
Bayou, it follows the lives in an established family of the area, their
daily travails and their secrets. 

The Batistes are descended from a
former slave turned landowner--the original Eve Ba tiste. Among them are
the doctor, Louis (Samuel Jackson), his wife Roz (Lynn Whitfield), his
sister Mozelle (Debbie Morgan), and his three children--Cisely, Eve, and
Poe (played by Meagan Good, Jurnee Smollett, and Jake Smollett,
respectively). With Diahann Carroll as Elzora, the local voodoo lady. 
In Anna Karenina, Tolstoy said "All happy families are alike, but an
unhappy family is unhappy after its own fashion." One thing unhappy
families all do have in common is an aware ness of why they are disturbed.
The Batistes suffer this cognizance as well. Louis spends a lot of time
away from his wife and children, philandering with many women on and off
his medical rounds. He even fools around right under his wife's nose, in
the c arriage house during a party they are throwing, while the whole
family is just yards away. Eve, however, is aware of a lot of these
things, and when she tries to bring these items to light, her mother and
sister work to keep her quiet. 
The movie's publicity is pegged to the better known stars, Jackson and
Whitfield, but it is Debbi Morgan as Mozelle and young Jurnee Smollett who
make the most memorable impressions as the aunt/niece duo who share many
moments together and the gift of psychic foresight. Debbie Morgan, by the
way, might be new to movies, but is highly recognizable to anyone watching
soap operas since 1983 (ex-Angela, *All My Children/Loving/The City*; 
Ellen, *Port Charles*). It's great to see her getting the sort of role
she deserves on th e silver screen. 
The movie shifts from deadly serious to lighthearted in an adept
manner--for example while 10-year-old Eve bears the horrible truths of her
father's affairs, it is during the time when their mother keeps them
cooped up in the house all s ummer because of a premonition. Like most
children, they live moment to moment and act like any kids would under
such conditions, even though larger secrets and pressures are upon them. 
*Eve's Bayou* also features some wonderful visual effects along with depth
of character. Go see it. You will not be disappointed. 

Directed by Kasi
Lemmons.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Vor (1997)
Vor (also known as The Thief, Russian with English subtitles,1997)
Seen on 15 August 1998 for $8.75 with Linda at the Lincoln Plaza Cinemas
Pavel Chukhrai has written and directed not only one of the best Russian
films to come our way in a long time, but probably one of the best movies
of this year. 
In a pretitle sequence, we learn from the narrator that he was born on the
roadside in 1946, his father having died in the last year of the war
against the Nazis. Six years later, Sanya (Misha Philipchuk) and his
mother (Katya, played by Yekaterina Rednikova) are on a train and meet
Toljan (Vladimir Mashkov), a tall, brawny soldier. Toljan exudes a
charismatic sexual appeal and by the time the train ride ends, he has
bedded Katya and Sanya is told to call him Daddy. 
Using his uniform as credentials, he is able to get a room in Baba Tanya's
apartment, where several other families also live. Katya is happy but
Sanya is both mesmerized and terrorized by the brutish man who is only
nice to him when he is corrupting his young mind, telling him how to take
what he wants and not put up with guff from anyone. His tattoos--a tiger
on the back of his shoulder and Josef Stalin on his chest--are meant to be
warning signs. He even tells impressionable Sanya that Stalin is his
father, and that it's a secret. 
Katya soon has her suspicions, that he is seeing someone behind her back; 
she is shocked to discover he is stealing from their fellow tenants. She
is shocked but follows him anyway, and they travel all over Russia, as
Toljan steals from friends and neighbors and then sneaks off into the
night onto trains.  Toljan winds up imprisoned, however, and sent away for
years in Siberia, on a completely unrelated charge, and Katya remains
faithful to this lout who clearly doesn't care if she follows him or not. 
He is clearly indifferent and unrepentent. He likes the life and "work" he
has chosen for himself, and sees no reason to change, despite Katya's
pleas. Throughout all of this, Sanya sees the spectre of his father, the
one he never met. 
The performances by Philipchuk and Mashkov are outstanding, as the
wide-eyed six-year-old and the thief, respectively. Together they have an
undeniable chemistry that is essentially the heart of the movie. 
Now, put into the larger historical context, it makes even more sense why
Katya is following Toljan all over Russia. Katya is Mother Russia, her son
is the future, and Toljan is every tyrant she has ever accepted
unquestioningly as her leader--the most deadly one of all having been
Josef Stalin. Like Toljan, Stalin stole from the people who trusted him
and liked him. Betrayal of the worst kind. 
Director Chukhrai bravely explores the psyche of a people who have never
really fully faced up to the brutalities of their past, and the leaders
whom they chose to perpetrate the worst crimes against them. His use of
close-up is especially effective in showing the mesmerer and the
mesmerized.
Also worthy of note is Dima Shigarev, the 12-year-old Sanya, who is
wide-eyed but clearly world weary, having kept up the vigil for the man
who betrayed them, closely guarding a firearm and a color photo of Josef
Stalin, even when Krushchev was firmly in power. Shigarev's face is very
expressive, and really enhances the conclusion of the movie. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Henry Fool (1997)
Seen in July 1998 with Laura at the Angelika for $8.75
This completely down-and-out variation on *Down and Out in Beverly Hills*,
which in itself is a variation of *Boudu Saved from Drowning*, is a more
disastrous time for the people who get involved with the mysterious and
disheveled bum who drifts into their lives. Well, that's not completely
true. One person, Simon Grim (James Urbaniak), does benefit from the
fateful meeting, escalating from neighborhood weirdo to a 15-minute
celebrity whose porno poem delights the local teens in the World of Donuts
in Woodside, Queens, and enrage their parents.
Figuring out who is the less accomplished of the bunch is difficult.
There's Simon, who watches couples make out and gets beat up for it. Henry
Fool rants and raves, encouraging Simon to write while he doesn't seem to
do a whole lot of anything. Simon's sister Fay (Parker Posey) is the local
slut. Their mom mopes around the house in a depression. 
Yet there are some moments of inspiration. There are some selfless acts.  
Simon's perverse poetry (which we never ever hear read aloud) makes an
autistic girl speak, and helps him lift himself completely from his
milieu. And what a milieu it is. Suicides, child abuse, alcohol abuse,
intolerance, and more bodily fluids and flatulence than you can shake a
stick at. About 95% of the movie seems to be filmed on location in
Woodside, Queens (Laura and I looked at the street signs, I assure you).
Written and directed by indie great Hal Hartley, *Henry Fool* ambles
along, quiet and unpunctuated, a run-on sentence of a film. When your
moviegoing pal says, "I liked it but it was 45 minutes too long," it
confirms my opinion of the pace, but confounds me as to how anyone could
enjoy it fully. There are some truly funny and brilliant moments.
Cinematographer Michael Spiller does things with throwing things out of
focus I have not seen before, making things clear--with fuzziness.
Ubiquitous indie actor Kevin Corrigan (the male Parker Posey) appears
as Warren, one of the local outer borough intolerati. 
Original music by the director Hal Hartley.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Dottie Gets Spanked (1993) (TV)
Seen at The Screening Room as a double feature with *Out of the Past.*
There are two things happening in *Dottie Gets Spanked*. Little Steven
Gale (J. Evan Bonifant), at six-and-three-quarters years old, is an avid
fan of "The Dottie Frank Show," and of its star. He sits glued to the
tube, drawing her horrendous visage whenever he can. His mother (Barbara
Garrick, best known as DeeDee Halcyon Day in the *Tales of the City*
series) is sweet and supportive of his quest to be Dottie's number one
fan, while his father (Robert Pall)  silently but strongly disapproves,
and prefers to watch, you guessed it, sports. 
Steven is a loner and is ridiculed by boys and girls alike, the latter of
which tell him that he's "effimidum"  (effeminate). It is made clear that
Dottie Frank is "for girls" an d that his liking a show this intensely
disapproved of by people in authority.  Here, it's the Father.
What mars all this is the spanking nonsense. Steven dreams of the terrors
of spanking; Dottie Frank's character gets spanked by her exasperated
husband ( Adam Arkin plays co-star Dick Gordon); Steven sees a father
hitting his son for talking to him the wrong way. But his parents don't
believe in spanking. 
The spanking dreams and images mar the movie in which it is very clear
little Steven is getting an early mental spanking that will keep him in
the closet for a very long time. The intense wide-eyed interest young
Steven has for his screen angel is fixating enough, and the contrast to
the treatment he is receiving makes it bittersweet. 
The character name s are also symbolic or homages to other screen
performances. The surname Gale is one that Steven shares with the
fictional Dorothy Gale of *The Wizard of Oz*; "Dick Gordon" is clearly a
reference to Lucille Ball's foil, Gale Gordon; "The Dottie Frank Show" is 
clearly an imitation of *The Lucy Show*, right down to her whine.
The final scene is the one that got to me.
POINT OF INFORMATION: A criticism of this sort of movie is that they are
seen to be mistaken as "little boy wants to be a girl" movies. While this
certainly is true of *Ma Vie en Rose*, the greater message, even in that
movie, is that children who are different in a way that is disapproved by
society immediately learn things the hard way, through ridicule, shunning,
and anger. This is something that goes way beyond just being gay. The
inherent sexism of a culture where boys admiring or imitating women is
seen as ridiculous while girls are encouraged to be more like men all the
time is apparent, and these types of movies simply reflect that back to
us. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Bent (1997)
Seen with Byron and Micki on 26 November 1997 for $8.50 at the Angelika.
The transition from stage to screen is not always easy--for the audience,
and Martin Sherman's *Bent* is a good example. What is probably a
compelling stage performance has been transformed into an sometimes
interesting but ultimately tedious cinema experience. 
*Bent* is the story of a Jewish gay man unlucky enough to be living in
Berlin in 1934. When Hitler's gay henchman Roehm and his gay coterie are
killed in one very bloody evening, it is open season on any man in
Deutschland who seems even slightly "bent." A lot of interesting
historical topics are touched upon in the movie, but it is destined to be
a gay film version of the Myth of Sisyphus. 
Max (Clive Owen) is abruptly taken from the debauched world of
freewheeling Berlin on that bloody night in 1934, and comes to realize
that a certain dangerous amount of conformity is needed to survive the
long madness of the Nazi period, where simply having any sort of power is
a sick temptation. Those with the power wield it cruelly and arbitrarily.
Don't be fooled. History is the result of the choices of thousands and
millions of people trying to survive intact and sometimes, trying to get
more than they should. 
Being involved with Max is dangerous, because he is a self-professed bad
person.  On the train to Dachau he is given a quick lesson in conformity
by Horst (Lothaire Bluteau). Max is determined to survive and eventually,
he is able, through his connections, to get Horst by his side as they
perform the useless duty of moving heavy blocks of stone from one end of a
pit to another.  This goes on for a small eternity while they talk and
talk and talk. The two men wind up loving each other. Only Horst is known
to be a "pervert" to the guards;  Max has chosen being a Jew. In the
universe of the movie, being gay is actually a bit worse in the Nazi view
than being Jewish. 
The heart of *Bent* is the existential struggle of bread versus free will,
with the horrific backdrop of a concentration camp. Free will gets you
killed, and bread allows you to watch silently as you hammer your own self
down. 
Visually, the film is interesting, as the two men are stripped of
individuality 
against the quarries and industrial sites used for concentration camp.
Despite good direction by Sean Matthias, it is very difficult to watch
what seems like an hour of two men talking away as they move stones back
and forth and back and forth. For those familiar with existential works,
you will fare better. My companions and I were very close to snoozing. The
film is very much the consciousness of these two men, one of whom has to
decide for himself what is ultimately more important--bread or free will. 
A documentary of the book *The Pink Triangle* would probably be a better
source of information on this topic. Bent is far too much like Woman in
the Dunes and not enough like Bertolucci's *The Conformist.*
Also starring Brian Webber as Rudy, Ian McKellen as Uncle Freddie, and
Mick Jagger as "Greta." 
Rated NC-17 for the lubricious depiction of simulated sex, men's buttocks,
and flaccid penises--like straight teenagers are flocking to this sort of
thing uncontrollably. A dense but worthy addition to the filmography
Channel Four Films (aka Film Four International / Channel 4 TV). 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
Seen on 11 December 1998 by myself at the UA 64th Street for $4.50
Somewhere in Hollywood it was decided that mix-and-match genre screenplays
area good idea. Action-adventure? Comedy? Psychodrama? Taut mystery?
Screwball romance? Honestly, just pick two and leave it alone. But that is
not what director Dean Parisot and writer Vince Gilligan decide to do. The
only mistake avoided was casting Valerie Bertinelli, always good for an
unintentional laugh.
The oddly named and aimless *Home Fries* suffers a series of coincidences
and motivations that baffles the moviegoing imagination. What is intended
to draw in the audience and sustain our interest is merely annoying. I
must admit, I was curious to see where it was going, and in reviewing it,
I must warn you that I will give it all away.
Sally (Drew Barrymore) gives her married lover Henry the heave-ho, even
though she is pregnant. Cut to Henry run off the road by a mysterious
black helicopter, and then scared to death when they fire a series of
shells at him. Scared to death (heart condition), but untouched by the
weapons. Then we discover that the two men flying the copter, Dorian and
Angus (Luke Wilson and Jake Busey, both of whom have mostly made
forgettable films) are the stepsons of the dead man. So it was not just a
"prank gone wrong." Then there's the matter of the people who might have
heard them over their radio communications. It seems that Sally heard them
talking (but didn't know what they were saying) on her fast-food radio
headset. She works at the local franchise of a burger chain. So naturally,
Angus insists that Dorian get a job there and figure out if they need to
*kill* her to protect their butts and Mom's (played by Catherine O'Hara
whose comedic talents go completely untapped in favor of sheer frenzy).
But then Dorian falls in love with the very pregnant Sally. But the
increasingly murderous Angus wants to kill someone. What a pickle (no bun
intended) for Dorian. How does he keep Sally from getting killed without
telling her that he killed the father of her unborn baby, who happened to
be his stepfather?
*Home Fries* goes on *further* to dabble in the possibility of a
class-struggle story, with the rich Dorian romancing the utterly poor
Sally. It's all too stupid.
Meanwhile, thoughout, there is some absolutely splendid filming (kudos to
Jerzy Zielinski), and a dynamite soundtrack. If they had just decided to
film the Texas scenery with the Chris Isaak music, I would have loved
that. It was just the plot and the dialogue that got in the way.
PS: That's Shelley Duvall as Sally's mother. She may not be dead, but her
career obviously is.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
Seen on 26 June 1998 with Laura, Michele, and Rob at the Angelika.
The tagline for *Buffalo '66* says, "Billy Brown just got out of jail. Now
he's going to serve some real time. He's going home." This is pretty
accurate. But along the way he kidnaps Layla (Christina Ricci) along the
way to pose as his wife. Billy (Vincent Gallo) has never let his parents
know that he was in jail for seven years. He's masqueraded as on-the-go
guy with a top secret job, and it's interesting to see why. When we do
meet his parents, they are thrilled to meet the total stranger posing as
their "daughter-in-law" and completely distant with their son. It's hard
to figure out why he wants their approval. His mother (the unbilled
Anjelica Houston) is obsessed with the 1966 Super Bowl that the Buffalo
Bills lost because she was giving birth to Billy; his father (Ben Gazzara) 
is a cruel, sadistic jerk who grabs at his new "daughter-in-law" 
leacherously whenever possible. Well, I guess you only get one set of
parents and they are supposed to love you and give you there approval. 
Unless they're insane. Then you figure out a few things, forgive your
parents, and move on.
But not our Billy. He's going to kill the jerk who screwed up the field
goal that lost Buffalo the Super Bowl!
What makes *Buffalo '66* interesting and funny is the hyperbolic reactions
Billy has toward just about everything. He is clearly a loser going
nowhere, yet watching him freak out and talk to himself is very
entertaining. There is something unusual in this; it's not quite
schadenfreude, but it's not innocent either. It's hard not to feel
superior to Billy as we discover how he's clung to little incidents in his
life and magnified them in to defining moments. It's also not hard to feel
sorry for him when you see what his parents are like. 
What is completely mysterious is why Layla is not trying to get away from
Billy as fast as she can. We don't get to know too much about her or her
motivation, or lack thereof. Her character is there to make Billy more
human with an open heart and devotion. But why is she doing it?
We also meet some bit players in Billy's psychodramas and loser stories: 
Mickey Rourke as a malevolent bookie (no relation): Kevin Corrigan as
Goon, his nitwit prison friend; Jan-Michael Vincent as Sonny, who runs the
bowling alley--the only place he is a somebody; and Rosanna Arquette,
who's hilarious as the "love of Billy's life." 
Vincent Gallo, who is famous for something, what I am not sure, directed,
wrote and starred in this movie, where he is basically working out his own
family issues. He also wrote some forgettable original music for the film.
He was even outside the Angelika the night we went to see the movie. He's
everywhere you are, whether you like it or not. Gallo was recently
reported to have berated and threaten critics who panned the film as less
than stunning; he's gone off about critics only like movies with gay
characters. In a completely self-aggrandizing moment, he is cruised in the
bathroom by a man who, as Gallo scripted it, cannot take his eyes off
Billy's member because "it's so big." He promptly calls him a faggot and
assaults him.
Meanwhile Gallo is also quoted as saying he's slept with men and hustled. 
So, go see *Buffalo '66*. You'll enjoy it. Just don't get caught
one-on-one with Gallo in a men's room or pan his movie. You might regret
it. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Seen with Tony on 10 November 1997 for $8.75 at the Sony 19th Street
Believe it or not, in life and in the movies, a 13-inch penis will only go
so far. If it happens to be attached to you, you ultimately might decide
it's more trouble than it's worth. Just look at what happens to Eddie
Adams in *Boogie Nights*. 
The hoopla surrounding *Boogie Nights* is ill-deserved. You will spend a
nonrefundable 152 minutes watching truly stupid people rise and fall (no
pun intended) in the porno industry. This was my major beef with the
movie.  Nothing counters the complete stupidity of these characters. The
few moments of pathos are worthless because none of these characters are
drawn either sympathetically *or* demonically. There is no need for the
audience to love or hate these people; it's like eavesdropping on the shop
class kids who smoke near the bike rack at your high school. Would you
want to do *that* for 152 minutes? 
Like many movies set in the 1970s, there are lots of unintentional laughs
in *Boogie Nights*, which spans 1977 through about 1985. One has to credit
the actors in this movie; it takes a lot of talent to act this stupid.
Eddie Adams (Mark "Marky Mark" Wahlberg) possesses the forementioned
13-inch penis. It is "his one special thing," and he uses it to his
advantage, because he is not a bright boy. He catches the eye of the
ridiculously named Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds), a pornographer who thinks
he is a "filmmaker." An overnight success, Eddie becomes "Dirk Diggler"
and is able to fund his hapless American dream--a house featuring a lot of
wood panelling, a closet full of hideous clothing, and a red Camaro. The
movie touches on the notion that he comes from a broken home; his shrill
mother (Joanna Gleason) inexplicably hates him, so he immediately becomes
a porn star. Rollergirl (Heather Graham) isn't prepared for a test, so she
runs off to become the porn star (who never removes her rollerskates). 
These are motivations? None of this is developed or makes sense! 
There are other subplots too numerous and stupid to mention; in the end
none of it means much of anything. There are consequences to the
pornographer's actions, but instead of feeling for these people, all you
can think is, "Well, what did they expect would happen." Many
opportunities to make the characters more pitiful or more ironic or
nastier are missed; they remain simply annoying.  The idea that they form
a "special kind of family" is would be okay if it were not so
bizarre--like Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), who sees herself as a mother
to Dirk and Rollergirl. Ahem! Mothers usually do not *have sexual
intercourse* with their children! 
Also, shame on director Paul Thomas Anderson for ripping off Quentin
Tarantino, and numerous others.
BONUS: In the event rampant drug use and pornography simply was not enough
for you, there is also senseless violence. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Nuit amricaine, La (1973)
(Day for Night, 1973; French with English subtitles)
Seen at the Paris for $8.50 on 17 August 1997.
The latest trend re-releasing lovingly restored or simply significant
films, 25 years or older (the exception being *Dirty Dancing*, being
completely remerchandised after a decade).
*Day for Night* is one of those movies every film student knows about bu t
never sees, and since I eschew video, I was grateful to stumble upon the
current screening just by walked past the theatre. 
The premise of *Day for Night* is simple: What goes on behind the scenes
of a film being made? Who cares? Many people don't but I loved it. The
characters all ring true, but they are not absolutely fascinating and
compelling. The true star of the film is the filmmaking process. The
shooting, the retakes, the "family" dynamics that take place and then
vanish when the film is over, the pressure to complete the film against
all odds. How do you deal with the drunken Italian actress who can never
remembers a line? How do you film a pregnant woman who is showing and her
main scene is poolside? Will neurotic English actress Julie Baker
(Jaqueline Bisset), show up on time, or flip out, again? Why is the
production manager's wife always nearby, knitting furiously and scowling
at every miniskirt? Why won't that damned kitten drink the milk already? 
These issues confront the director (play ed by the film's director,
Francois Truffaut) as he films *Meet Pamela.* It might look like
everything that can possibly wrong is--but guess what?  That's show biz.
The final product looks dreamy and seamless, but problems and a hell of a
lot of waiting be tween takes goes into every film. Scenes are improvised
and scenes are dropped; your private conversations appear in new dialogue;
the show must go on (film). 
*Day for Night* is told frankly against the backdrop of an angst-ridden
tragic romance being filmed. What is interesting, and probably more
interesting on repeated viewings, is the parallel of real lives compared
to the film. Life goes on for the cast and crew despite the filming *and*
their personal crises. In *Meet Pamela*, things are much more simple; the
new wife has an affair with her father-in-law and the son kills his
father; Pamela dies. All very neat and tidy--and fatalistic--those
tragedies. Not so in real life. True confessions are made and somehow,
people just deal with it. Amazing. 
Recent films like imitate *Day for Night*: *Living in Oblivion* and *The
Paper*; the former is an over-the-top comedy while the latter is a typical
Hollywood star vehicle about the newspaper business. They are fine, but
their focusing on the obvious is blissfully absent here. It's
lighthearted and funny "because it is true," for lack of a better
cliche.
All but three of the actors are probably unfamiliar to American viewers:
Truffaut himself, the bilingual Bisset (recently speaking French in *La
Ceremonie*) and Jean-Pierre Leaud, a longtime actor fixture in Truffaut's
films, most notably as Antoine Doinel, a character chronicled in several
films, starting with The 400 Blows (shown on Bravo). 
Also notable: The Paris treated us to a cartoon as well--starring the
well-known French actor Pepe le Pew. I sat next to some idiot gigglers. I
then took a brisk walk to the wonder Wondee Siam for takeout. 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Indian Summer (1996)
(1997, released in the UK as Indian Summer)
Seen on 27 July 1997 with Tony for $8 at the Quad Cinema.
Indian summer can be defined as either an unexpected warm period in the
early Fall, or the last stage of someone life "usually regarded as
tranquil and serene." The latter is not quite true if you're dealing with
AIDS and its fallout.
The movie opens with Tonio (Jason Flemyng), a dancer, literally jumping up
and kicking a wall, and eventually falling flat on his back. This is an
apt visual metaphor sets the tone. Tonio and his fellow dancers have spent
a lot of time at the hospital, visiting loved ones and friends who have
died there of AIDS. The other problem looming is Tonio's future visit to
this hospital, as he is HIV+ himself. As he turns down his doctor's
suggestion of AZT (film is set in 1995), "My lover died last year, and my
best friend is sick right now, I haven't had time to worry about the
third." (She doesn't get the quip.) He would rather throw himself into
dancing. 
After his teacher and best friend, Ramon (Anthony Higgins), dies, the head
of troupe considers calling it quits, but not before performing one last
piece, "Indian Summer," with Tonio as the lead.  At Ramon's funeral, Tonio
literally runs into Jack (Anthony Sher), who is HIV- and was Ramon's HIV
counselor. They later meet at a disco where Tonio, surrounded by gorgeous
flirtatious young men, and he runs into Jack again. He forgot meeting
Jack, who is stocky and older;  Tonio is pretty bitchy to him until Jack
reminds him where they met. Then, he is very interested. The film then
enters the "unlikely romance" phase. 
An outpouring of HIV-related angst, and life angst, ensues. Will Jack be
around when Tonio is dying? Would Tonio even consider being with Jack if
he was not HIV+? Are they a couple? How come Tonio is so calm while Jack
is drinking to forget all the trauma he gets to hear as an AIDS counselor
in the age of defunding. The demented, aging choreographer, Luna (Dorothy
Tutin), comments that she forgets, remembers, and then forgets what she
remembered. She tells Tonio he'll be lucky not to suffer old age.
Pondering one's mortality abounds.
A lot of breast beating goes on. Luckily, it is balanced with a lot of
humor and a lot of heart. At one point the audience laughed so hard that
two whole minutes of dialogue were drowned out. A full spectrum of
gay-related issues is covered. A rather nice scene between Tonio and
Duncan (Phillip Voss) shows how far gay liberation has come, allowing the
younger generation to be themselves. In Duncan's day, he showed a "public
life" by marrying Luna and pursued his true feelings surreptitiously. 
Luckily, life is not all that difficult if you make the most of your
opportunities. This is one of the reasons Jack pursues the "unlikely
romance" with Tonio. He hears people complain of what they might have
done, and he decides plunge ahead and be insecure later.
Alive and Kicking is thought-provoking and funny, with characters that
ring true. It can even sustain two climaxes. It makes optimism look
possible, and not just a serving suggestion. There is a lot of uncertainly
at any age; you might as well enjoy yourself along the way in spite of it.
P.S.: Made by British television's Channel Four. Why are the better gay
films coming from England?  Why can't we do better than Kiss Me Guido?
More reviews by Seth Bookey are at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com

Title
Review for Henry Fool (1997)
This completely down-and-out variation on Down and Out in Beverly Hills,
which in itself is a variation of Boudu Saved From Drowning, is a more
disastrous time for the people who get involved with the mysterious and
disheveled bum who drifts into their lives. Well, that's not completely
true. One person, Simon Grim (James Urbaniak), does benefit from the
fateful meeting, escalating from neighborhood weirdo to a 15-minute
celebrity whose porno poem delight the local teens in the World of Donuts
in Woodside, Queens, and enrage their parents.
Figuring out who is the less accomplished of the bunch is difficult.
There's Simon, who watches couples make out and gets beat up for it. Henry
Fool rants and raves, encouraging Simon to write while he doesn't seem to
do a whole lot of anything. Simon's sister Fay (Parker Posey) is the local
slut. Their mom mopes around the house in a depression. 
Yet there are some moments of inspiration. There are some selfless acts.  
Simon's perverse poetry (which we never ever hear) makes an autistic girl
speak, and helps him lift himself completely from his milieu. And what a
milieu it is. Suicides, child abuse, alcohol abuse, intolerance, and more
bodily fluids and flatulence than you might expect. Or perhaps you would.
About 95% of the movie seems to be filmed on location in Woodside, Queens
(Laura and I looked at the street signs, I assure you).
Written and directed by indie great Hal Hartley, Henry Fool ambles along,
quiet and unpunctuated, a run-on sentence of a film. When your moviegoing
pal says, "I liked it but it was 45 minutes too long," it confirms my
opinion of the pace, but confounds me as to how anyone could enjoy it
fully. There are some truly funny and brilliant moments.
Cinematographer Michael Spiller does things with throwing things out of
focus I have not seen before, making things clear with fuzziness.
Ubiquitous indie actor Kevin Corrigan (the male Parker Posey) appears
as Warren, one of the local outer borough intolerati. 
Original music by the director Hal Hartley.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
Seen on 21 November 1998 with Laura and Peter at the SONY 19th Street for
$8.75
More than 30 movies into the game, Woody Allen finally puts his plea into
the air, in skywriting: H-E-L-P. Big white letters in the sky for all to
see. At least all of New York to see, as it sometimes seems we are his
only intended audience.
In an entertaining but not-so-deep effort, Woody takes on the perils of
being popular in our media-soaked culture. The attitudes we have of the
rich and famous, many of whom are beautiful and consequently, rich and
famous, are somewhat examined here. Only somewhat. If nothing else, Allen
shows us that our celebrities are just as screwy as the rest of us. They
just get an tremendously larger share of attention than the rest of us
ever see.
Here, the "Woody Allen character"--the character that the audience clearly
sees as the character we think Woody Allen is like in real life, and the
one we see in movie after movie--is Lee Simon. He is an "entertainment
reporter" who moves among the beautiful people. As Lee, Kenneth Branagh
does an incredible acting job, as he takes on not just Allen's mannerisms,
but a lot of his vocal affects. If you'd never seen Branagh before you'd
think he was New York's famous stammering director and not a well-spoken
Brit.
As ever, Allen provides flashbacks to Lee's breakup with his wife Robin
(Judy Davis), and follows their parallel journeys. We follow Lee through
several sojourns--an interview turned interlude with an actress (Melanie
Griffith), a crazed evening on the town with a Supermodel (Charlize
Theron, of Devil's Advocate), and debauchery with teen idol Brandon Darrow
(Leonardo DeCaprio). Meanwhile, he also has relationships with a book
editor (Famke Janssen) and a waitress (Nola, played by Winona Ryder).
The much more interesting character and story is that of Robin, who goes
from feeling like a nothing as an English teacher to working for her next
boyfriend, Tony Gardella (Joe Mantegna), a TV producer. Faced with "having
it all" she is disbelieving and underconfident. Alternating from frantic
to aggravated to elated, Judy Davis shows yet another intense performance
for a Woody Allen movie that makes you wonder why he kept casting Mia
Farrow. My God! Imagine how much more spectacular Broadway Danny Rose
would have been with Judy Davis. Robin's growth and development are
the most interesting parts of the movie, making Lee's adventures seems
like so many red herrings. If you know of a bad Judy Davis performance,
let me know. It seems inconceivable.
Also, Woody's preoccupation with oral sex and hookers (this time it's Bebe
Neuwirth) is still going strong. If I really thought that they were back
for shock value and irony, I wouldn't mind, but it seems more adolescent
and self-serving. I suppose the President's antics have given him further
license.
Sometimes, watching Celebrity, you think that perhaps it's just an excuse
for Woody to string together some scenes that have nothing to do with each
other. It's more an exposition of celebrity than an exploration or
explanation. Celebrity is entertaining, but any comparisons to Hannah and
Her Sisters and Crimes and Misdemeanors would be undesering.
Making cameo appearances are Donald Trump, Isaac Mizrahi, and the
Buttafuocos--both Mary Jo and Joey.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Illtown (1996)
Seen on 23 January 1998 for $8.75 at the Village East CInemas with Laura,
Rob, and Michelle
*Illtown* is possibly the worst movie I have seen since *Excess Baggage.*
It started out promisingly, with interesting lighting and a dreamlike
quality. Then, the credits came, and that was the end of that.
Yet, I wanted to give it a chance. Laura turned to me and said, "Is this
the worst movie you have ever seen?" and I told her, "Ask me in five
minutes,"  but it didn't take that long. Once the vicious drug dealers
were hitting the links at the golf course, I gave up.
The plot is hard to follow since there is a lot of jumping back and forth
in time. Dante (Michael Rapaport) is a drug dealer who is genuinely in
love with his girlfriend Micky (Lili Taylor). Meanwhile, he has an
archenemy in Gabriel (Adam Trese) who proceeds to kill most of Dante's
drug runners, and then attacks his friends and family, in a typically
ultraviolent fashion that we have come to expect in general these days. 
Adding to the oddness is Tony Danza as D'Avalon. He seems to be the King
of the drug underworld down in Florida, who has a gay lover, or something
gay going on.  Note the scantily clad men posing like statues on
D'Avalon's lawn. Oh, and he "prefers to make his own mulch." His
dialogue, and that of so many others, was unbearable. For example: 
My goodness; this is what passes for writing these days?
I usually keep very quiet during the movie, but Illtown was just such an
incomprehensible mish-mash of plot and themes, I gave up wondering if it
was an allegory, a bad homage to David Lynch, or simply the worst movie I
have ever seen. Perhaps there's a reason it has taken so long for it to
get released. If you decide you really must see *Illtown,* bear these two
things in mind: 1)  It's okay to laugh hilariously whenever Tony Danza
appears; 2) remember that Micky's deaf little brother symbolizes the
audience--he's always trying to run away.

Title
Review for Oscar and Lucinda (1997)
Have you even noticed the difference between vegetables that have been
boiled and those that have been steamed? Boiling leaves them recognizable
but drained of color and flavor; steaming makes the colors brighter, even
brighter than they were originally.
This, dear viewers, is the difference between *Oscar & Lucinda* and its
competition, the epic and ballyhooed *Titanic* and the enjoyable but
superficial *As Good As It Gets*. What exactly is it that is so wondrous
about *Oscar & Lucinda*? It's a confluence of  storytelling, music,
direction, and cinematography.
Set in the 1840s, the movie follows the title characters' lives from
childhood on. Oscar is the son of a hardened fundamentalist minister who
won't even refer to 25 December as Christmas because it's "papist!" and
smacks his son for eating Satan's fruit (Christmas pudding), in the bleak
but beautiful landscape of southern England. Lucinda grows up rather happy
in New South Wales, Australia. Through various adventures and growing
pains, they come to love God and gambling.
Ralph Fiennes is completely out of typecast here, looking less than
handsome as the nervous jittery Oscar, with his scarecrow appearance and
lack of haircut. Cate Blanchet is absolutely captivating as Lucinda, the
woman of independent means who buys a Sydney glassworks. She lights up
every scene she's in. It would be a cliche to say she is luminous, but she
is. Also wonderful are Tom Wilkinson (recently seen in *The Full Monty*) 
as the Anglican minister Hugh Stratton and Clive Russell as the strict
Theophilus, Oscar's father. 
While some might find the story lacking, the music and the cinematography
are really extraordinary. Watching *Oscar & Lucinda* is like eating a ripe
fruit, or steam vegetable, and this is due to director Gillian Armstrong,
whose career has included *My Brilliant Career*, and more recently a
remake of *Little Women*--she's an Australian national treasure.
What we see is not the typical romance, but a true love story with vivid
characters doing things that are simply not acceptable in the 19th
century, and how they come to rely on each other. This is no ordinary
cookie-cutter romance with situation comedy e elements thrown in. If
anything, it's a situation tragedy with people who are 99.44% pure, and a
church that floats. While there are some slow moments and uninteresting
subplots, Oscar and Lucinda is anything but typical, and the turns it
takes are real, and moving, and shown with a strong sense of empathy. 
Based on the novel by Peter Carey; screenplay by Laura Jones.
Cinematography by Geoffrey Simpson, music by Thomas Newman. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Seen on 21 May 1998 with Andrea for $18 at the Sony Lincoln Square and on
22 May with Tony for $8.75 at the Cineplex Odeon Chelsea.
There is a good news and bad news about *Godzilla*. The good news is that
*Godzilla* does not destroy anything above 60th Street, so my
rent-stabilized apartment was never in danger. The bad news is that the
only good thing about Godzilla is the lizard itself; the acting, story,
and script is flawed. So why did I see it twice? Well, that's a
Seinfelding saga not worth repeating. 
Actually, seeing it twice made me notice some subtle humorous touches I
didn't notice the first time, but was it worth spending in excess of $25
for it? Well, no, but I have done enough sneak-ins and seen enough
Godzilla (and Mothra!) free on cable to see the karmic justice in this. 
Directed by Roland Emmerich (of *Independence Day* fame) and from the
makers of Tylenol, *Godzilla* has been promoted since I saw the preview at
*Men In Black*, and the audience went wild. A lot of secrecy surrounded
the new look of the monster, and with good reason. It's not as "human" as
the original Toho version, and it's face is amorphous.  As Andrea put it,
"They do the feet the best."
An interview with the director reveals that until *ID4*, a lot of filming
was done in New York, and the monster was added later with computer
graphics. So the result is some fairly realistic scenes of authentic
destruction of New York. In fact, the monster destroys the area a block
away from my office, which was spared. Damn. Also, seeing Godzilla
diving over the West Side Highway and into the Hudson River was pretty
neat. 
There are also some neat homages to other movies here. The opening scene
of the sinking of the Japanese fishing boat is right out of the Japanese
monster movies that inspired this movie. The Mayor's first scene is
reminiscent of the umbrella scene in Hitchcock's Foreign Correspondent and
the finale at Madison Square Garden reminds me of the final scene of the
Birds..
That's about it for praise. As Dave points out, a big flaw in these
special effects blockbusters is that there is too much talk. Also, the
acting budget is scuttled, so we get a shrill, vapid Maria Patillo (as
Audrey) instead of a Helen Hunt or a Minnie Driver. It's like two
different movies there for a while. Effects-laden monster suspense one
minute, B-grade comedy straight-to-video the next. Matthew Broderick as the
atomic scientist hero is not an asset either. However, he does fulfill the
traditional role of the little boy Godzilla loves.
Everyone seems rather two dimensional and bumbling. There's the stuttering
military man O'Neill (Doug Savant), the New Yawk cameraman "Animal" (Hank
Azaria) who embodies every stereotype (including an annoying wife who
lovingly calls him a "dumb wop."), Harry Shearer as the sexist pig
newscaster, Michael Lerner plays Mayor Ebert--complete with Gene, the
campaign manager he abuses (that seemed bizarre--I guess the director
hates Siskel *and* Ebert).. The only character that is truly humorous and
not annoying is Jean Reno as the French secret service man who feels his
country's responsibility in creating Godzilla inadvertently by doing
nuclear tests in Polynesia. It's a shame that the joke of his assistant
spies being named Jean-Claude, Jean-Paul, and Jean-Philippe is hidden
until the final credits. Oh, and who keeps a top-secret videotape in a
tent TOP SECRET written with big red letters on it?
There are some inconsistencies as well. It's pouring rain half the time,
but that effect is turned on and off like a faucet. It's supposed to be
raining, yet there's a pushcart vendor flipping burgers on the grill? The
It's pouring rain when people first see Godzilla but when there's a chase
scene minutes later, the rain stops. It starts again when the chase is
over. A movie that costs this much should be able to afford some
continuity. The city is really ravaged, but there is electricity flowing
freely. No gas main explosions or watermain leaks either, which we have in
New York *without* a visit from Godzilla. It's PG-13, and while some
people are killed off camera, there are no injuries and no hospital or
medical scenes.  Godzilla puts a hole in the Pan Am Building in the middle
of a workday, and there is no mention of casualties? It's PG-13 all the
way. 
The love story and the "news story" angles are silly and two-dimensional.
The original Toho productions usually kept the human stories fairly
message oriented about the environment. The film's opening sequence does
this; it's too bad that the rest of the film didn't do that. 
The original music by David Arnold is good in the opening sequence, but
not as good throughout, and the hokey Japanese trumpets of the Japanese
version is sorely missed.   
Add a star if you loved *Godzilla* movies as a kid, or if you are a kid.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Feng yue (1996)
(Feng Yue, 1996; China/Hong Kong--Chinese with English subtitles)
Chen Kaige's latest banned-in-China film is set in the China's turbulent
1920s, when that nation was forced to figure itself out after thousands of
years of Imperial, patriarchal rule. But, nations under years of autocracy
often appreciate it more than you might imagine, and often accommodate
their everyday autocrats.
The story opens in 1911 when the Emperor abdicates. To avoid the chaos,
Zhongliang Yu (Leslie Cheung) is sent to live and study at the country
estate of the Pang family, where his sister Xiuyi (Saifei He) is married
to Zhengda Pang (Zhou Yemang), an heir--and an opium addict. But the
promise of study is not be kept and soon he is forced to be the preparer
of Zhengda's opium pipe. Life at the estate is a life unto itself, but
unbearable for outsiders, and soon Zhongliang flees into the turbulence,
diverted from study in Beijing to the seediness of Shanghai.
Ten years later, the head of the Pang family dies. The Pang clan meets and
decide to make Ruyi (Gong Li) the head of the family. She is the sister of
the debilitated Zhengda. Her distant cousin Duanwu (Kevin Lin) is
appointed to "help" her. Ruyi is also an addict, which makes it difficult
to marry her off. Life at the estate become more and more insular when
Ruyi dismisses all of the concubines and angers the clan elders.
In Shanghai, where it's the men versus the women, Zhongliang has become a
dapper con man, using his sophistication to corner married women into
extortion, starting by using his tongue to unhook their earrings. The boss
(Xian Xie) of this gang of criminals is fond of Zhongliang and sends him
to seduce Ruyi's fortune from her.
What unfolds is a rather unabsorbing tale of unfulfilled dreams and lost
illusions. Well filmed, but boring. The actors do a good job but the
script is not one to cause empathy. It is difficult to watch characters
for 130 minutes when you don't give a damn about them. Considering they
are all leading lives that have been planned by others in a time of
political chaos, you would think there would be something to work with
there. 
The innocent faces of Ruyi, Zhongliang, and Duanwu open the film. Within
ten years they are a naive addict, a gigolo, and a coward. All three go
through the motions dictated to them, and all three are miserable. You
would think that they would have connected on some sort of level. Only
Zhongliang's sister expresses true feelings of being trapped in all this
luxury, but she is shrill and her brother blames her for making him
heartless. 
Chen Kaige is best known for another snoozer--Farewell, My Concubine,
which was rife with unconnected, unsympathetic characters. Kaige ought to
pay close attention to compatriot Yimou Zhang, who directs films where
people really talk to each other and make the suffering more empathetic. 
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Title
Review for Career Girls (1997)
Career Girls has the feeling of going to a class reunion
or even just reading an alumni bulletin. Some people have done well, some
have done worse, and for some people, nothing has changed, and being in
the middle of that self-esteem barom eter can be very unnerving.
Regardless of the refinements that are added over time, a lot of raw
emotions and memories are still bubbling under the surface. This is the
defining essence of the film.
Career Girls is different from some of Mike Leigh's oth er works. There is
no "high concept" operating here as in Secrets and Lies (black woman with
white birthmother) or social commentary (High Hopes). Here it's just two
friends having a weekend reunion after a six-year absence. 
The storytelling works a lot like memory--there is an fair amount jumping
from the present to the past, and while this is difficult at first, it
eventually works very well. Memories being revealed at appropriate moments
as the women remember them, rather than telling a chronological narrative.
Hannah (Katrin Cartlidge) and Annie (Lynda Steadman) were roommates years
ago in a flat above a Chinese take-away in a rundown part of town. Now,
they appear average in every way--well coifed, well dressed, and quite
grown up. But years ago, A nnie was scarred with severe dermatitis and
always shied away from looking directly at people. Interestingly enough,
she studied psychology. Hannah was very passive-aggressive and very
frenetic, jerking about to and fro and causally making random cruel re
marks. 
Annie is from Yorkshire, not too far from the home of the Bront sisters.
The roommates often use Wuthering Heights as a ouija board of sorts. Annie
enjoys a close family life while Hannah has to deal with an alcoholic
mother. Both have suffered w alk-out fathers, though, and while it is
sometimes hard to figure out why they are friends, they do bond. They also
have a friend in another psychology student, the overweight stuttering
Ricky, who never seems to have his eyes open, even though he seems t o
have insights into others. 
Now, while looking at properties together, their camaraderie is
evident--it is often assumed they're a lesbian couple. One realtor turns
out to be Adrian--a man Hannah slept with and Annie was in love with years
ago. But, he doesn't remember either of them. Adrian has "moved up in the
world" and is married with a child on the way. Hannah and Annie feel a bit
left behind. 
Musical Note: An interesting backdrop to the film is the choice of The
Cure's mid-1980s work--these songs permeate certain scenes. "Love Cats"
touches on a pair who "cratch and scream" but stay together through
nightly romps. "The Catepillar Girl"  discusses metamorphosis. But unlike
butterflies, humans can change their patinas but they stay very close to
the ir upbringing and roots. Without fulfilling significant others in
their lives, Hannah and Annie are left very much on their own to dwell on
their past, and still wishing to meet someone who will "kiss them in the
water, and make their dry lips sing,"  as the song "The Walk" mentions.
Career Girls is an October Films release and they have a lovely little Website.
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Seen on 25 November 1998 with Byron and Andrea at the SONY 19th Street for
$8.75
A problem with historical epics is that you already know the ending of the
movie before you've even seen it. So the viewer can only be pleased if the
story shown is enjoyable and elucidates the hidden details that lead
deepen your understanding of history.
Director Shekhar Kapur's Elizabeth wisely focuses on the years immediately
preceeding the Virgin Queen's ascension to the throne and the years
immediately after. It's a wise choice, as covering her entire life is
almost impossible in the time a feature-length film can offer. (Indeed, it
took six hours last to do just that in the 1972 miniseries Elizabeth R,
starring Glenda Jackson.)
This period in English history is one of its most tumultuous, as
successive reigns swung the country from Catholicism to Protestantism
several times, setting England on the verge of yet another civil war
(Elizabeth's grandfather Henry VII had ended the War of the Roses once and
for all). By the time she is crowned Queen, the country is also virtually
bankrupt and beset by the Scots and the French on one side, and the
Spaniards on the other.
The movie begins in the doomed reign of her half-sister, Mary I (Kathy
Burke), who is hoping for an heir so she can keep the country Catholic.
She is also busily burning heretics at the stake.
Legally, Elizabeth must succeed her (as prescribed by a lay of their
father's--Henry VIII). She does, but her court is full of intrigues and
there are few, perhaps none, she can trust. Just about everyone has a
hidden agenda. One agenda that is not hidden, though, is her advisors'
desire that she marry and produce an heir. They underestimate her because
of her sex, and consequently, she surprises them all.
Elizabeth is forced to prove herself in a very short time. Cate Blanchett
moves Elizabeth from unfettered joy and innocence to world weary and worn
with great skill. Her joyful radiant Princess is reduced to a worried
sovereign and it's all thanks to, yes, Acting!
Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes) is Elizabeth's lover, played with swagger
and sex appeal, and giving us a sexuality not often seen in portrayals of
the Virgin Queen. He is clearly jealous when advisors suggest she marry
the Duc d'Anjou (Vincent Cassel), the brother of the King of France.
Meanwhile, Alvaro de la Quadra (James Frain) is advancing the proposal of
his own sovereign, her brother-in-law King Phillip II of Spain. The
venemous Duke of Norfolk (Christopher Eccleston) is a staunch Catholic,
and happily receives the aid of a nefarious, homicidal priest dispatched
by the Pope (John Gielgud) as a hitman, to bring England "back to the true
faith." 
Meanwhile up in Scotland, Marie de Guise (played with an elegant
viciousness by the usually kind Fanny Ardant) is plotting away also.
Sometimes it seems like the only person she can trust is the recently
returned expatriate Protestant Sir Francis Walsingham (Geoffrey Rush). But
you know what? You can never be completely sure who she can trust. Neither
can she.
Elizabeth is rewarding on many levels--visually, historically,
emotionally, and even in terms of plain entertainment. Cate Blanchett (of
Oscar and Lucinda) holds it all together, but the supporting roles are
also rendered well. Director Shakur does make a few mistakes, and the
ending seems very forced and unrealistic, but overall it's a great effort,
visually and narratively, and worth seeing. Shakur uses skillful editing
and camera movement and placement to avoid giving us the typical
stagey-and-stodgy period piece. Two scenes to watch for: Elizabeth's
showdown with the bishops, and the dinner during which she comes to her
*own* conclusions, and determines her own course of action.
Also starring Richard Attenborough as Sir William Cecil. Costume Design by 
Alexandra Byrne.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
It is very difficult to not love anything directed by James L. Brooks
(*Broadcast News*, *The Simpsons*, *The Tracey Ullmann Show*), and it is
very difficult not to love what one friend calls "vintage Nicholson," so
it is very difficult to not like *As Good As It Gets*. And what's not to
like.  It's funny, it's got a cute little pug dog, it's got a gay
neighbor. Hey, it's got Helen Hunt. Why are you reading this review? Rush
out and see this movie now!
Of course, with all this going for it, it's easy to overlook the
improbability of the storyline and the unlikeliness of it all. 
Sold entirely on the strength of Jack Nicholson's reputation (which
suffered under recent nonsense like *Wolf*), it is greatly augmented by
great performances by Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding Jr., and their
little dog, too. The dialogue is very lively and often hilarious. Now,
onto the requisite description of the situation comedy presented here. 
Melvin Udall (Nicholson) is a bigot who has a nasty comment for anyone and
everyone he meets--strangers, neighbors, and people he knows. He surely
has no friends. He also has obsessive-compulsive disorder and
hypochondria, which is played for laughs here, and which disappears as
needed to propel the story along. Melvin is a creature of habit; he never
steps on a crack, he uses a new bar of soap every time he washes his
hands, and he eats lunch at the same restaurant, at the same table, served
by the same waitress, Carol (Hunt).
Melvin's life is turned upside down when his gay neighbor Simon (Kinnear) 
is robbed and beaten, and Frank (Gooding) forces him to care for Simon's
beloved little dog. Also upsetting the apple cart is the absence of Carol
from her waitress station when her asthmatic son gets sick. This forces
Melvin to reconfigure his OCD and prejudices so he can try to restore
them. 
What follows is the very unlikely road trip to Baltimore (from New York) so
Simon can have some sort of reconciliation with his homophobic parents,
which is sidelined by the budding romance of Carol and Melvin. 
Does it matter that this couldn't possibly ever happen? No. Melvin is a
90s Archie Bunker, the bigot you hate to love, but you do anyway. The
movie is very well written and has many funny moments, however
unrealistic. For example, how does a waitress afford  a multiroom
apartment in an historic district in Brooklyn. 
Especially noteworthy: Shirley Knight as Beverly, Carol's mother, and the
scene in which the movie's title is uttered.
Written by Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Lolita (1997)
Seen on 6 November 1998 for $8.75 with Andrea and Lothlorien at the
Lincoln Plaza Cinemas
Setting all the considerable controversy aside, this new version of
*Lolita*, based on Vladimir Nabakov's novel, is one of the most
beautifully filmed movies of the year. Backwards tracking shots while
simultaneously zooming in on a car in sea of grassy fields. Lingering
twilights as the lamps of kitschy motor lodges turn on. The darkness
of a character beside his car against the whiteness of a western
desert. All of it accompanied by the haunting score by Ennio
Morricone. Director Adrian Lyne spreads one of the most sumptuous
visual meals of 1998.
Then there's the controversy: The little matter of a middle-aged man's
sexual affair with a 14-year-old girl, the daughter of a woman he
marries just to be around the young woman. There are people who see
both sides very clearly; Humbert Humbert (Jeremy Irons) is seen as
either manipulating Lolita (Dominique Swain), working the situations
to his advantage; or Lolita has willfully seduced and broken the heart
of a much-older man who still suffers the loss of the girl he loved in
his own adolescence. Personally, I am in the former camp, but Stephen
Schiff's adaptation makes it clear: Both Lolita and Humbert realize
the powers they have over one another.
Set in the late 1940s, Humbert Humbert meets Lolita and her mother
Charlotte (Melanie Griffith), marrying her to be near the daughter who
intoxicates him. Charlotte discovers her husband's journal and is
felled in the street by a car accident. He retrieves Lolita and, only
after having successfully bedding her, does he reveal that her mother
is dead.  What ensues is a private struggle set against the vastness
of America, as the unorthodox couple, posing as father-daughter, cross
the country.
What stands out here, besides the filming, are the
performances. Irons, with his long face, is perfect as the obsessed
leacher. Griffiths' natural affinity for tartiness imparts the needed
annoyances that define Charlotte. The standout is Swain's gum-chewing
Lolita, alternating from "nymphet" to hurt child to viper to
dullard. It's fascinating to watch Swain act like the exasperating
14-year-old she is one moment, and raw sexpot the next. The most
startling scene is one in which she seems to be innocently sitting on
Humbert's lap, reading the Sunday comics, rocking back and
forth--until you realize exactly she's not on a rocking chair.
Swain's performance is the key to the ambiguity that clouds
objectivity with Humbert's rationalizations.
Frank Langella, who's body sure has changed since playing the sexiest
Dracula ever, plays Clare Quilty.
Original music by Ennio Morricone; cinematography by Howard Atherton;
costume design by Judianna Makovsky. Film Editing by David Brenner and
Julie Monroe.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Seen on 19 December with Lothlorien at the SONY Village East for $8.75
Ever see a movie where too much and too little was happening
simultaneously? That's the problem with *Star Trek: Insurrection* in a
nutshell. Or perhaps it just that, as Lothlorien put it, it's just a long
episode of the TV show (that being *Star Trek: The Next Generation*). This
is the ninth *Star Trek* movie, and the third of the "next generation."
The plot, in a nutshell: On a ringed planet, the Baku are an agrarian race
resembling humans in every way who turn out to be ageless Luddites, having
eshewed technology centuries before. Their activities are observed by the
Federation and its new allies, the Sona--observed unseen until android Lt.
Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner) goes berserk, does't respond to orders and
shoots at the secret HQ until its cloaking device fails.
Meanwhile, it becomes obvious that the Sona and the Federation are in an
unholy alliance as they plot to relocate the Baku and capture the helpful
radiation from the planet's rings. Captain Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick
Stewart) is appalled by the plan to relocate the 600 Baku, as it
interferes with the Prime Directive to not interfere with cultures, and he
leads a revolt on humanitarian grounds. That, and he has a love affair of
sorts with a 300-year-old Baku woman, Anij (Donna Murphy) who doesn't look
a day older than 45. Must be that Oil of Olay.
Meanwhile, Data "learns how to be a child" from the 12-year-old Artim (),
who doesn't look a day older than 13.
That's all well and good. However, there are two problems: The
less-than-compelling story limps along, and an overabundance of explosions
and shootouts that don't distract you from a lack of pacing and story
development.
What fans of the show will like are the in jokes and character development
of their favorites. However, many dramatic moments are missed in a
somewhat confusing and unfocused array of twists that occur during
aforementioned spectacles (shooting, explosions, mass migrations, chase
sequences, etc).
What *is* entertaining here is the dialogue, the relationships between the
established characters, the comedy (e.g., Picard and Worf (Michael Dorn)
singing Gilbert & Sullivan to the out of control Data), and little touches
(like Worf undergoing, again, the pains of Klingon adolescence on the
rejuvenating planet).
The special effects are scattershot as well, although the Sona's hi-tech
versions of reconstructive surgery, administered by intergalactic versions
of video babes a la Robert Palmer's "Addicted to Love" girls, is amusing.
The Sona, by the way, look like living mummies, and ooze body fluids and
crack their skin when they get mad.
The performances range from adequate to entertaining, with the best ones
turned in by Stewart, Spiner, and F. Murray Abraham as the vengeful Sona
leader Ru'afro.
A final problem that actor and director Jonathan Frakes (a/k/a Cmdr.
William Riker) should take note of in the future: Don't shoot so much in
direct sunlight. Much of the action takes place in daylight on what surely
looks like the lot where they filmed all the Planet of the Apes movies.
Sci-fi often works better with the dark blanket of outerspace and the
artificial lights of the spacecraft and the computers. Never has daylight
seemed so... dull.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Desk Set (1957)
Seen on cable television.  Shown in full screen and letterboxed versions;
go for the latter.
In the 1990s it is hard to fathom  the days of yore when there was job
security, or was there? Now, we have downsizing, where it is one against
the other; back in the 1950s it was humanity versus the machine.
In a time where Big Blue beats Kasparov at chess, it is interesting to
watch *Desk Set* now. If you are not familiar with it, rent it or watch
for it on American Movie Classics. Special librarian Bunny Watson
(Katherine Hepburn) matches wits with Richard Sumner (Spencer Tracy), who
is looking to install a computer to handle research requests. What results
in the library is rampant paranoia about people losing jobs to the
machine. The machine, by the way, takes up half a room. Laptops were
hardly a concept, yet.
What is really wonderful about this film is the dialogue. It is crispy
written and a joy to hear. Hepburn and Tracy really shine here, and the
supporting cast is not bad either, although they really do take a back
seat to the romantic leads. A particularly good scene is when Bunny's love
interest, Mike (Gig Young), shows up to find Richard in a bathrobe after
having been caught in the rain. The comedy of errors is quite
entertaining.
*Desk Set* also represents one of those rare media portrayals of
librarians as something interesting and positive and worthwhile. [Compare
to its 1990s counterpart *Party Girl*.]
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey can be seen at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html.
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021 USA,
sethbook@panix.com.

Title
Review for What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962)
What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962) 
Seen for free with Byron on 19 August 1997 at Bryant Park.
What ever happened to Baby Jane? What *didn't* happen?  Thirty five years
later, it is rather difficult to review this movie I have so often seen
and which is a common reference and often parodied and imitated film.
Dueling divas (on and off screen) Joan Crawford and Bette Davis at the
helm, *What Ever Happened to Baby Jane?* is a cult classic, especially in
the campy world of gay men.
Seeing it uncut is a pleasure. I think a lot of the preamble disappears on
TV. The opus opens in 1917 when curly blonde Baby Jane Hudson appears
before vaudeville audiences singing treacle like "I'm Sending a Letter to
Daddy" and "I Would Never Trade My Daddy" (cue instant campy hooting from
the gay segment of the audience).  Plain "Jane" sister Blanche Hudson
watches on and bristles as Daddy prefers mealticket Jane to her.
Later, Blanche (Joan Crawford) is the breadwinner is the only reason Jane
(Bette Davis) has a studio contract. As an actress, Jane stinks--she's the
Brigitte Nielsen of 1935. Finally, after a wild Hollywood party, Blanche
is paralzed in an accident attributed to Jane. 
Flashforward to me present. Invalid Blanche is practically a prisoner to
her alcoholic, mentally disturbed sister Jane. She is wants to sell the
house, commit Jane, and make other life arrangements. Jane is pretty
cagey, though. She knows just what is happening, and she is not about to
have Blanche sell the house Daddy bought her toss her aside.
Jane gets busy. Jane dismisses Elvira the maid. Jane sasses the nosy
neighbors. Jane orders a lot of liquor. Jane hires an accompanist to
update her "I love my Daddy"  act. Jane is serving special lunches to
Blanche involving domesticated pets and household pests. Jane is *just
getting started*. 
Director Robert Aldrich's film has all the makings of a modern suburban
horror movie. The glamorous movie stars next door are locked in mortal
combat. The black maid cannot come to work for you too--Jane's killed her!
This is sibling rivalry gone terribly awry. 
I have seen this film many times and I ha ve never once rooted for
Blanche.  She is so sickly sweet and condescending, it is not too hard to
laugh along when Jane imitates Blanche to her face and while
surreptitiously ordering liquor from the store. Jane brings out the worst
in an audience, sh e really does. Why is that? In its day, the movie was
probably quite disturbing. Demented drunk terrorizes sister who is
confined to a wheelchair. Metes out revenge and a savage beating readily.
Horrible, yes. Hilarious? Apparently. Perhaps audiences have been treated
to so much worse since 1962 that watching Davis kick Crawford in her ribs
is a day at the beach compared to movies like the disgusting *Se7en* and
the sadistic, satirical *Scream*. 
Happily, it is only a movie. It's dated, and simplistic psychodramas of
sibling rivalry and never-ending girlhood, provides a lot of unintentional
humor now. Using black and white adds to the horror of it all. The biggest
technical bugaboo for me is the insistent use of the then-relatively new
zoom lens, used poorly most every time.
This movie is also a rare exception when I would encourage talking during
the movie. It's an older gay man's *Rocky Horror Picture Show*. There are
the favorite lines (even the professional loafer played by Victor Buono
has one!), the goofy styles, the bad incidental music, all contribute to
this. But, it is still a great movie. Watch it whenever you can. But being
in a lively crowd is the best circumstance. 
Book Note: The book *Bette and Joan* provides a nice background to the
film. It tracks the lives and rivalries of the actresses themselves, who
never worked together before this film, which revived their sagging
careers. Apparently they never really even met much in person, which
didn't stop them from being rival divas. A must read for movie queens
everywhere. It's the flipside to Mast and Cohen's *Film Theory and
Criticism*. 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
REVIEW OF: Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
Director Whit Stillman is comfortable in the niche he created for himself
with the acclaimed, chatty film Metropolitan and Barcelona, and continues
in this vein, further following the lives of young, bored intellectuals.
This time, he sets it in the very early 1980s, which was basically the
last hurrah of the 1970s, disco, and the sexual revolution as it was
known.
The core group here all know each other from an exclusive school and are
very smart, but still fall prey to the seduction of the nightlife, and
youthful naivete. Charlotte (Kate Beckinsale) and Alice (Chloe Sevigny)
work in a book publishing company. Charlotte is full of what seems like
prescient advice, given in a spirit of knowledge and malice at every turn
possible, which undermines Alice in several ways, and work against herself
as well--though she would never quite realize it. Together they go to an
exclusive disco, where a strict door policy allows them to be among the
descriminate few readily allowed in its doors.
Jimmy (MacKenzie Astin), a junior ad exec, is a friend that keeps getting
allowed into the club by his friend Des (Christopher Eigeman); Josh
(Matthew Keeslar) is the Assistant District Attorney who also knows all of
them from school, where he had a nervous breakdown. He's still a little
odd at this point, also.
Being a young group of twentysomethings, they try to all hang out
together, extend the good times of college, and still talk like they are
in a Western Lit seminar. Meanwhile, what really happens, is real life.
Sexually transmitted diseases that seemed like a fate worse than death
(herpes, before AIDS, meant being doomed) were abounding. Drugs and large
sacks of cash are all over the club, which Josh is investigating while
trying to get his friends spared. This is probably the only part of
the movie that genuinely does not fit in as well as it could.
Whit Stillman excels at showing us these very smart characters chatting
away yet still suffering human frailties. They talk about life but they
miss all the points sometimes. Charlotte rails against everyone
"ferociously pairing off" and extols the virtues of "the group" and
promptly steals her Alice's beau (and Alice is her co-worker, roommate,
and "friend"). Even while trying to evade the justice system, Shakesperean
virtues are argued in the gettaway cab. Perhaps a bit long but enormously
entertaining. Forensic-Club-style arguments about the psychologies of the
dogs in Lady and The Tramp are completely normal here, and very
entertaining.
What makes The Last Days of Disco a bit more accessible is the period
treatment. The Satyricon nature of the disco nightlife is glitteringly
portrayed. Charlotte and Alice look over the dancefloor from a balcony,
ripe with the expectation of sexual freedom and unlimited choices.
Meanwhile, everyone there is pretty much trick or treating. Some
characters actually get into the disco disguised as Wizard of Oz
characters, but this is not Kansas. Even Ildiko Jaid Barrymore is on
hand parodying her former persona--"Tiger Lady."
All the performances are fine, but it's the dialogue that runs the show.
If you want to put this in the context of Stillman's other films, rent
Metropolitan first, see this film, and then Barcelona to follow these
young intellectuals from high school through young adulthood to
professional life. References to Barcelona are made, and some characters
from that movie make cameos as well. 
Jennifer Beals makes an appearance as one of Des's jilted lovers, as
he fobs her off by declaring he thinks he's gay--a fact ascertained by a
sexual yen for Marlon Perkin's assistant Jim on Wild Kingdom.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Seen on 17 February 1999 at the Sony Lincoln Square, preview screening
The prospect of seeing a teenage version of *Dangerous Liaisons* gave me
two expectations: crap or pleasant surprise. I viewed the exact opposite
of both. Well-produced and the unpleasant surprise of homophobia marketed
to America's teens. Just what we need at a time when kids are attacking
their openly gay classmates like never before.
To be fair, the movie is not a running fag joke. However, this well-known,
oft-filmed tale of the depraved and priviledged idle rich was not enriched
by adding fag jokes. The one openly gay character, the campus drug dealer
who's also a real flamer, is used to establish the main character's
depravity. In this case, it involves blackmailing the closet case football
team member so Valmont (Ryan Phillippe) can extort information that helps
him deflower Annette (Reese Witherspoon) as part of his bet with his
venomous stepsister, Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah Michelle Gellar). If he wins
he gets to have sex with Kathryn, or he loses his 1956 Roadster. The
closet case is reduced to sniveling and betraying his best friend.
Hollywood, I am sure, thinks it's being twisted. Of course, doing
something else, like having Valmont seduce a male classmate in his quest
to seduce a female would have been an interesting twist; have him prey
sexually and indiscriminately on both sexes equally, without the epithets.
But Hollywood is still using gay sex for titillation and not much else.
I am not sure if this is what Choderlos de Laclos (1741-1803) had in mind
when he wrote *Les Liasons Dangereuses*. The opening credits indicate that
the story was "suggested by" the novel. Within the first half hour, we are
hearing "Trevor's a fag," when we learn of a boy not demanding sex from
his virgin girlfriend, "could you be more queer?" when Valmont mentions
keeping a journal, and "are you a lesbian?" when Annette doesn't swoon
when Valmont woos her. Kathryn, the most evil character, is shown kissing
the ingenue Cecile (Selma Blair) as part of her scheme. The gay character,
Blaine Tuttle (Joshua Jackson, who also starred in the ultra-homophobic
Apt Pupil), is a complete stereotype who sits back and literally files his
nails while his buddy Valmont blackmails his sex partner with exposure.
Some audience members tittered at the utterance "fudgepacker" but were
appalled and silent later during a race-baiting scene.
Written and directed by Roger Kumble (rhymes with bumble), this sort of
homophobic updating is not needed. He ought to take a lesson from Kevin
Williamson and Wes Craven, both of whom have used current sex symbols in
popular movies without stooping to fag jokes. (Gellar and Phillippe
appeared in Williamson's *I Know What You Did Last Summer*; Williamson's
TV series *Dawson's Creek* just had a character come out.)
As stories go, it is faithful to the original: Libidinous evil duo use
each other to exact revenge on their enemies and sate their appetite for
depravity. The milieu is the prep school set that splits its time between
tony townhouses on the Upper East Side of Manhattan and lush-lawned
estates out on Long Island. The "no expense spared" box was clearly
checked off on the costume and set budget suggestions. 
Kathryn has been dumped by Court for the naive Cecile, which is why she
wants Valmont to take her virginity. Going after Annette is appealing to
him, as he is "sick of sleeping with these insipid Manhattan debutantes."
(Who isn't?) Watching these two manipulate all their acquaintences to
their own ends is entertaining for a while, and lives up to their soap
opera experience (Gellar got her start as Erica Kane's daughter on *All My
Children*; Phillippe was daytime's first gay teen, on *One Life to
Live*--this was not in the press kit.). Blair, the poor man's Tori
Spelling, is very amusing as the clumsy Cecille, and the few adults in the
movie (Swoosie Kurtz and Christine Baranski) turn in some of the best
performances in this movie. Louise Fletcher (Nurse Ratched of *One Flew
Over the Cuckoo's Nest*) is pretty much wasted as Aunt Helen.
There is almost no reason to pay good money to ever see this film. You can
rent *Valmont* or *Dangerous Liaisons*, or even the French-language
*Liaisons Dangereuses 1960*. If you are a fan of any of these stars, there
are other outlets. Gellar appears on Buffy the Vampire Slayer weekly on
the WB; Phillippe has made a few movies (*54*, *Urban Legend*, *Little Boy
Blue*) and you can rent those.
There is no reason to pay Hollywood to insult you. In the case of
Sony-Columbia-Tristar, with movies like the hateful Apt Pupil, they are
doing it repeatedly.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
Seen on 18 October 1997 with Linda at the Lincoln Plaza Cinemas (birthday
outing for me)
Seen again on 7 November 1997 with Andrea at the same theatre ($17.00)
(her birthday outing)
What exactly is an ice storm? Well, it's the sort of storm that is warm
enough to let it rain but cold enough to let everything freeze. Even the
tiniest tree twigs are covered in heavy, thick ice, that allows you to see
the living thing it encases.
The year is 1973, Nixon is trying vainly to defend himself, and life
follows its dysfunctional pace for two families in well-off New Canaan,
Connecticut. What is truly dysfunctional in the movie is authority.
President Nixon is clearly on the decline, as are the parents in the
movie; they rarely know what is going on in their parents' lives, and the
feeling is mutual. When Jim Carver (Jamey Sheridan) returns from a
business trip and announces his arrival, his alienated son Mikey (Elijah
Wood) says, "You were gone?"
The backdrop of the 1970s does make for  a lot of lighthearted
moments--toe socks, garish interior decor, hideous fashions, and
wife-swapping; but there is a deep sadness and disturbing feeling
throughout *The Ice Storm*. Ang Lee makes wonderful use of silence and
music in between the poignant moments of dialogue. 
The Hoods and the Carvers have a variety of problems. Ben Hood (Kevin
Kline) barely knows how to talk with anyone in his family and is having an
affair with Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver). Elena Hood (Joan Allen) looks
like a completely stressed out Michelle Pfeiffer, as she envies her
daughter's freedom and fends off the advances of the pastor. Jim Carver is
almost completely clueless to everything going on around him. 
The children fare no better. They are as empty and joyless as their
parents. Wendy Hood (Christina Ricci) shows a sexual precociousness with
the two Carver boys, while her brother has to fend for himself at private
school, tortured by his own virginity as his roommate makes the moves on
every girl he wants for himself.
*The Ice Storm* is one of the best movies I have seen in a long time. All
the performances are great (Christina Ricci stands out in particular), and
the direction, music, and settings all underscore the film's basic themes
of longing, emptiness, loneliness, and sadness. The 1970s kitsch and the
many quirky and humorous moments keep the movie from being overwrought.
Director Ang Lee's short filmography includes *Sense and Sensibility*
(1995), *Yinshi nan nu* (1994 -- aka *Eat Drink Man Woman*), *Hsi Yen*
(1993 -- *The Wedding Banquet*), *Tui Shou* (1992 -- aka *Pushing Hands*,
all of which are wonderfully made and highly entertaining. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Out of the Past (1998)
Creating a Place in the Present via the Past
Seen on 6 August 1998 for $8.50 with Byron at The Screening Room as part
of a double feature with *Dottie Gets Spanked*.
"To create a place in the present, there must be a place in the past." 
It's one of the ways we provide an edification for our own existence. For
centuries, the gay past remained hidden for gay men and lesbians. While
this is no longer the case, *Out of the Past* fulfills it's title by
bringing noteworthy and even prominent figures from the gay past out into
public consumption, giving them their long overdue recognition. 
Six figures are portrayed. Michael Wigglesworth, the repressed 17th
Century Puritan minister; the "Boston Marriage" of turn-of-the-Century
writers Sarah Orne Jewett and Annie Adams Fields; 1920s activist Henry
Gerber, Founder of the doomed Society for Human Rights; Bayard Rustin, the
gay black civil rights activist who got lost in the shuffle of history
while Martin Luther King became the prominent activist at his expense; and
Barbara Gittings, an early homophile leader who began her work in the
1950s and is the sole subject still living today. 
The stories that unfold are fascinating, and largely unknown even to gay
people. They are astounding; the bravery shown by Gerber and Rustin, the
open love of the "Boston marriage"; the nonviolent persistence of Barbara
Gittings from the 1960s through today.  To even try to tell them here
would do them no justice, so try to see it yourself. There's a lot to be
learned her for all audiences.
Contrasted to the stories of the historical figures is the tale of one
girl's quest for social justice in Utah; Kelli Peterson formed the
Gay-Straight Alliance at East High School in Utah. The school tried to
close down the club, and when told it was illegal to discriminate in this
manner, the school board surreptitiously voted to outlaw *all*
extracurricular clubs. All of them. This led to massive protests by *all*
students, and in the end the Gay-Straight Alliance retained their rights
to meet.
The 97-minute documentary is augmented by archival photos and film reels
(including the Stonewall Riots aftermath), and it won the Audience Award
and was nominated for the Grand Jury Prize at the Sundance Film Festival.
Linda Hunt is the narrator and voices for the historical characters were
as follows: Stephhen Spinella as Michael Wigglesworth; Gwyneth Paltrow as
Sarah Orne Jewett; Cherry Jones as Annie Adams Fields; Edward Norton (II)
as Henry Gerber; Leland Gantt as Bayard Rustin. 
Sad Footnote: One of the Utah youths shown with Kelli Peterson was Jacob
Lawrence Orosco, who killed himself by hanging shortly after the film was
complete, on 3 September 1997 Utah. See
http://www.xmission.com/~sam3915/jacob_orozco.html 
for obituaries and commentary. That kids are still driven to suicide in
this day and age because of their distress over sexual orientation is both
astounding and frightening. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Party Girl (1995/I)
  Seen with Tony in June 1995 at the Angelika.
   You very well might have missed Party Girl, which came and went from
   theaters quicker than you can say "library card." While many reviewers
   judged it mainly on the merits of lead actress Parker Posey (Tales of
   the City, Dazed and Confused), with Entertainment Weekly and People
   magazines giving it "B" ratings, this fun little film rises in ratings
   appeal when seen from the librarian's point of view.
   [INLINE] Our protagonist is Mary, a doyenne of the Downtown scene.
   When her latest illegal rent party is busted by the police, she is
   bailed out by her godmother (played by Sasha von Scherler), a NYPL
   librarian. To pay off her debt, Mary becomes a clerk at a branch
   library (a Jersey City library posed as a NYPL branch for this film)
   and is immediately challenged as irresponsible and not up to the
   "challenge." Mary eventually memorized the DDC20 and begins her
   quest--better living by getting an MLS.
   Along the way, Mary is also involved in helping her disc-jockey
   friend, Leo (Guillermo Diaz) get a job, and in a romance with falafel
   vendor Mustafa (Omar Townsend)
   I noticed that the scenes I reacted to most did not concur with the
   audience's. Those who reacted along with me must have also been
   librarians and other likeminded people. Hearing the librarians'
   professional bickering, seeing the fans blowing on water-damaged
   books, and other little touches would most likely only be best
   appreciated by those in the know. Scene to watch for: Mary confronts a
   patron who reshelves a book improperly.
   What really makes Party Girl stand out, from the MLS (Masters of
   Libary Science) point of view, is that becoming a librarian is seen a
   constructive, positive objective, rather than a punishment. Fifty
   years ago, the worst thing that could have happened to Mary Baily in
   It's a Wonderful Life is to have become a librarian. After decades of
   Hollywood showing the profession in the most unflattering poses, Party
   Girl shows us a hip downtowner deciding to improve her life by getting
   an MLS. A nice change of pace and certainly worth looking for in the
   videostores.
   Basically, if you are somewhat familiar with libraries, falafel, the
   Dewey Decimal System, house music, babganoush, or New York City, you
   will probably enjoy this movie. The perfect break for those times your
   not at the library yourself.
     Note: This review originally appeared under this title in KEYWORDS,
     the Newsletter of the Queens College Graduate School of Library and
     Information Studies Student Association. Reprinted with my
     permission (since I wrote the review and edit the newsletter).
   Librarians will also enjoy Desk Set (1957).
   _________________________________________________________________
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Seen on New Years Day 1999 by myself at the Cinema 1 for $8.75
Young Will Shakespeare is having writer's block. His pre-Viagra therapist
suggests that he find his muse so he can get his quill up and running to
complete his latest play, "Romeo and Ethel the Pirate's Daughter." And he
must write in a hurry. The producer at The Rose theatre is pressuring him,
as he owes money to some local thugs. He also has dealings with the
competition across the Thames--the Curtain.
So sets the stage for the comedy *Shakespeare in Love*, with the
personable and sexy Joseph Fiennes (as the young playwright) leading a
cast of Oscar winners and nominees. Anthony Hopkins he ain't, but he is
entertaining.
Meanwhile, noblewoman Viola de Lessups (Gwennyth Paltrow) wants a life
"full of poetry, and adventure," and to take to the stage in an age that
forbids women actors. So she auditions at the Rose disguised as "Thomas
Kent" for a role in "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter." If there is
any element that makes no sense in the movie is that anyone would not
notice she is a woman in male drag, but that is my sole complaint.
Like many a Shakespeare play, there are twists and turns, cross-dressing,
and mistaken identities. Director John Madden and writers Marc Norman and
Tom Stoppard bring to life a lively bunch, a Who's Who of British Film
Actors: Geoffrey Rush as one of the rival producers; Colin Firth as the
venemous Lord Wessex, Viola's fiance; Simon Callow as a petty bureaucrat;
Judi Dench as the older, sharp-as-a-tack Queen Elizabeth I; Rupert Everett
as the Bard's rival, Christopher Marlowe; and Tom Wilkinson as Hugh
Fennyman.
The movie's comedy also succeeds as it shows the "origins" of elements of
Romeo and Juliet. For example, climbing up to Viola's terrace; the kind
confidence of the helpful nurse (played hilariously by Imelda Staunton);
suggested plot devices come from his rival. Anyone with even a minimal
amount of exposure to Shakespeare will find enough to appreciate the
in-jokes.
The best sequence is the one in which the lovers run their lines; while
the soundtrack maintains a continuous dialogue, the scenes intercut the
lovers both on stage and half-clad in bed. This is what editing is all
about.
What makes *Shakespeare in Love* a winning film is an enthusiastic cast,
quickwitted dialogues, comic timing, and an obvious love of The Bard's
work. Also adding to the movie's charm are some anachronistic elements:
Shakespeare goes to a therapist; oarsmen on the Thames are more like New
York cabbies ("Follow that boat!"); and statements like, "I hear there's a
future in tobacco." England has never looked sunnier; indeed, there
doesn't seem to be any significant rainfall in this romp.
Also worthy of acclaim is Deborah Lynn Scott's costume design. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Seen on Halloween 1998 by myself at the SONY Loews Orpheum for $8.75
One of the rules by which I judge a screen adaptation i that the director
make sure the movie stands on its own merits, and not the novels from
which they are derived.
Oprah Winfrey has touted *Beloved* as a *Schindler's List* for
African-Americans. It fails where the other succeeds. To understand the
horrors of the Holocaust, they were shown. In *Beloved*, the horrors of
slavery are not shown as often as they are referenced in many flashbacks.
Much more time is spent being horrified by the past, which is unveiled in
a slow, plodding manner that stalls in the metaphysical mishmash of it's
presentation.
The storyline jumps around: It opens in 1855 with the haunting of a black
family in Ohio. A deadly ghost is present. Then, the story jumps ahead to
eight years in the future, where Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) lives in isolation
with her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) when Paul D (Danny Glover)
arrives from out of nowhere. He is a fellow former slave from "Sweet
Home"--the plantation where he and Sethe once toiled. Why they almost
immediately have sex is inexplicable, as are many elements of this
ultimately disappointing film.
Out of the bogswamp arrives Beloved (Thandie Newton), who is either
fashioned by insects or just very at home with nature. She cannot talk and
is a mystery to the entire family, but she becomes a (strange) part of the
family--a sister for the lonely Denver, and a replacement daughter for
Sethe's lost infant. But sibling rivalries flare up as Beloved gravitates
to Sethe, only to torment her.
Meanwhile, there are lots of flashbacks. Lots and lots of them. Maybe too
many? The most interesting is the story of a pregnant younger Sethe (well
played by Lisa Gay Hamilton, who looks *nothing* like Oprah's Sethe)
escaping the horrors (sexual abuse and the lynching of Sethe's mother) of
"Sweet Home" to go north to Ohio. She is befriended by a white woman (Amy
Denver, played by Kessia Randall) who helps her give birth and make it to
the home of her mother-in-law Baby Suggs (Beah Richards).
Jonathan Demme's direction cannot help the "stream of unconciousness" of
Toni Morrison's novel, which in turn is problematic. It took three writers
to adapt the screenplay. But Demme does some strange things along the way.
Clouds zip by in fast motion... why? There are some wonderful lingering
shots of the natural surroundings, and the most visually compelling scene
is the one in which Baby Suggs preaches to folks in the woods. Demme
bathes here in an overexposure that makes her golden.
Meanwhile, Beloved (in an outstanding performance by Newton) spins out of
control, eating everything with two hands balled into fists, and running
around naked. Please don't ask why--I don't know. Maybe Oprah knows.
Unlike *Schindler's List*, *Beloved* is just a psychodrama on acid, that
fails to systematically explain slavery's horrors in a way that is
accessible. Too much is expected of the viewer; we are expected to know
historical conditions and the novel. A movie featuring characters named
Schoolteacher, Buglar, Running Boy, Stamp Paid, and the Thirty Women
should have been lyrical, haunting, poetic.  Instead, it's a thematic mess
that takes translates every aspect of the book with no explanation. Who
are the Thirty Women anyway? Why include them and not explain them?
What would have been a *fantastic* movie would have been to delve into the
relationship between Denver and her grandmother, the spiritual
preacherwoman Baby Suggs. The story unwisely centers on crazy Sethe when
the real gold lies in Denver's neglect, and her ability to rise above the
insanity of her upbringing and persevere.
Oh, and the movie's too long. But the music was nice.
Oprah Winfrey is one of the producers, and she plugged it endlessly to her
loyal audience, saying how the movie "changed people's lives." I mean no
disrespect to the Black experience in panning this movie. There are so
many other better movies and plays--*Roots*, *Queen*, *The Autobiography
of Miss Jane Pittman*, *The Piano Lesson*, etc. And there might be an even
better one out there yet to depict the legacy of slavery, but in narrative
form, as PBS's *Africans in America: America's Journey Through Slavery*
took the documentary route.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Seen with Andrea at the Loews Astor on 18 July 1997 for $8.75.
Have you ever been to a movie that evokes a wide spectrum of emotions all
within the first twenty minutes or so? Laughter, tears, excitement, and
yes, even a lurid thought or two. It is indeed rare that a movie does all
this so quickly. Contact is one of those movies. It features Matthew
McConaughey with his shirt off within a half hour. Mmmmm... Every time he
entered the screen I felt like Marge Simpson fantasizing about Lee Majors. 
But seriously folks... Contact is all that and more, even if Mmmmmmatthew
was not cast. It is one of those rare movies that evokes a wide array of
feeling. It combines "what if"; with a lot of current issues and timeless
questions.
Two major elements hold this movie together: The prospect of very
intelligent life beyond our atmosphere, and Jodie Foster's impassioned
portrayal of Dr. Eleanor Arroway, a physicist who has been listening to
extraterrestrial radio waves and charting the skies. As a child, her
father (David Morse) taught her how to use a ham radio and they charted
how far her voice carried. Her fascination with covering distances
eventually leads to a major discovery--loud systematic thumping from the
star known to us as Vega. 
Contact is full of some wonderful cinematography. The opening sequence is
absolutely stunning, free of distracting music. The entire audience was
awestruck and quiet throughout the opener. One incredible shot early on to
watch for: Young Ellie running to the bathroom medicine cabinet. The
special effects in Contact are really marvelous, so seamless that it is
hard to believe that you are not actually watching events unfold.
Contact benefits from a great cast. All the expected "types" are there: 
the project director who steals the spotlight and the credit (Tom
Skerritt); the paranoid military man (James Woods), the officious
Presidential aide (Angela Bassett), the weird billionaire industrialist
(John Hurt). Even some of the minor roles are well cast--Jake Busey as the
religious cult leader, and Rob Lowe as Richard Rank, the Ralph Reed-like
head of the "Conservative Coalition." The only person who is not all that
terrific is, well, Mmmatthew McConnaughy, as he mumbles a lot and is not
always comprehensible. He plays the man of faith who questions Eleanor's
completely scientific stance. He always carried a book around with him. 
It's hard to know whether or not it is a Bible, his own book, or a
Franklin planner. Who cares? He's gorgeous and the romantic lead--that's
what he's there for and he does it well. 
Much like a Hitchcock movie (there I go again), it is an enjoyable ride
that dangles a major red herring. I am sure that most people will find it
odd that I would compare what happens in Contact to Pauline at the Beach
and Rashomon, but they are all of the same ilk. It's compelling and
thoughtful film that stays with you long after the lights have come back
on. I know I was not the only one who felt this way: More than few people
lingered afterward, reluctant to leave the theater. Plus, it was a nice
apology and antidote to Independence Day. 
Based on a story by Ann Druyen and Carl Sagan.
The official homepage  for Contact at http://www.contact-themovie.com is
rather interesting, especially if your browser supports sound.
Other movie reviews by Seth Bookey are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021 USA,
sethbook@panix.com

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
Seen at the Loew's Orpheum, Third Ave. and 86th St. by myself at 11:30,
with a half-off coupon.
Many have made mention of Howard Stern coming off as a big pussycat in
this dramatization of his life that finally makes him "King of All Media."
Unlike the book of the same name, this movie covers Stern's life from
childhood to about 1984, just before he is fired from WNBC in New York
City.
The story is told mainly in flashback, the movie framed by Howard's MTV
Awards appearance as Fartman and his arrival at JFK Airport. Audiences are
immediately disarmed when it is revealed that the publicly vainglorious
Howard is embarrassed and belittled by his butt-cheek-baring appearance
on cable television, viewed as an oddity by the stars he would have as his
peers.
We are taken through Howard's early radio career, where he is suppressed
by the understood confines of American radio. In the film we are led to
believe that the reason Howard is obnoxious is that he had been holding
back and not being himself. However, it is hard to believe that this is
Howard just being himself. He obviously knows how to get an audience going
and the act is actually rather calculated. This is probably just one of
the many reasons people, and the FCC, are out to get him.
The film's true heart is Howard and his crew versus the radio stations
where they work, especially in Washington DC and at WNBC in New York,
where "Pig Vomit" (a/k/a Kenny, Paul Giamatti's performance lives up the
the character's nickname) is set against him before he is even on the air.
Any attempt to reign him in is met with greater and greater resistance,
with bits like Lesbian Dial-a-Date or Out-of-the-Closet Stern.
There is a certain amount of event-altering, which to Howard's many fans,
are evident: The schism between Howard and Alyson, for example, is something
I never recall hearing about on the radio show or reading in the book. It
is hard to believe, after listening to Howard's show for more than a decade,
that he saved something, or anything, new for the movie.
Mary McCormack is wonderful as Howard's wife Alyson, who often suffers the
public recounting of their lives on the radio. Howard Stern, Robin 
Quivers, and Fred Norris play themselves in the film. 
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Title
Review for Office Killer (1997)
Seen on 23 December 1997 for $8 at the Quad Cinema.
The worst-kept secret in my office is my *necrology*--a list of everyone
who has left the premises during my tenure of 3+ years. Publishing has its
victims and there is often lots of turnover. In *Office Killer*, Dorine
Douglas (Carol Kane) keeps a very different, more accurate necrology, one
created at her own hand. Indeed, her basement becomes a mortuary, filling
up with her victims--people at work who would have gladly seen her
downsized out of her copy editing job. 
Norah Reed (Jeanne Tripplehorn) is brought in to bring the
magazine--*Constant Consumer*--kicking and screaming into the 21st
Century. This means making jobs part-time and sending people to work at
home.  Dorine, a mousy, unfashionable nervous wreck with a nearly robotic
voice and nervous mannerisms, is practically a nonentity. Ignored and
disliked by those who don't know her, she is chosen to be made part-time
and work at home via laptop, even though she knows more than most of the
young ne'er-do-wells at work. People often misspell her name, or even call
her my the wrong name. After her accidental electrocution of the lecherous
writer Gary (David Thornton), Dorine decides to bring his corpse home, and
then adds to her macabre doll collection with premeditated murder. 
A consequence of Dorine's murders is that she dresses better and her worth
becomes more apparent to her editors and to Norah the "efficiency
expert"--despite the fervent protests of the young layabout Kim (Molly
Ringwald). What Dorine's co-workers discover, only when it's too late, is
that Dorine is very smart, and uses what she learns by just peeking over
their shoulders against them.
The biggest problem with *Office Killer* is that it gets very grisly. 
While Dorine's annoying crippled mother lies awaiting service upstairs,
she is busy downstairs talking to her dead "friends" as they decompose.
Dorine's murders are also extended to non-officemates; there is even a
corpse down there in the end that we never even see killed. Dorine also
dismembers some of the victims, attaching the fingers to the hands of her
kitchen clock. It gets a lot less tongue-in-cheek as it goes on. 
*Office Killer* offers a certain amount of elegance on a low budget. The
screen credits slither over items you would find in an office by merely
projecting them via slides. The music by Evan Lurie is low-key but very
intense and sustains the film's edgy mood. Also, director Cindy Sherman is
able to manage some wonderfully stifling shots from exteriors, caging her
characters by framing them in windows or fire escape terraces and brick
walls. The offices are drab and ill-lit, adding to the macabre mood of the
film.
At one point, before Dorine has mastered the laptop, Danny (Michael
Imperioli) tells her that some people like working from home so much, they
"hate to talk to people" after a while, as if Dorine's most valuable to
the magazine if she is never actually seen. When Dorine kills people, the
office staff notices they are gone, but the police are never actually
called it. It's as if it's more annoying to have inconvenienced the work
routine, never mind that someone might actually be in trouble. *Office
Killer* makes a nice counterpart to *Denise Calls Up*, another movie in
which the reduction of personal contact thanks to technology is explored.

Title
Review for I Think I Do (1997)
Seen on 15 May 1998 by myself for $8 at the Quad Cinema
*I Think I Do* is a full-length feature from the man who brought us the
gay short film *Pool Days*. It is the story of seven friends/roommates
from George Washington University, who convene for the wedding of two
friends in DC one October weekend. The story begins back in their college
days, when the rather plain Bob (Alexis Arquette, brother of all those
Arquettes), who's gay, has a crush on his hunky roommate Brendan
(Christian Maelen). But, Brendan is having a fling with Sarah, and he
reacts rather negatively when he finds out how Bob feels.
Years later, Bob is a soap opera writer and his boyfriend of one year is
the ultrahunky Sterling Scott (Tuc Watkins), a star on his show who winds
up shirtless in many scenes Bob has written. Bob receives a surprise
proposal of his own from Sterling that weekend. Bob is later surprised to
discover that Brendan is not just acting strangely--he is flirting with
Bob. Other lesser dramas ensue around this main story.
There is something admirable and disappointing about this film. There are
some wonderful lines and performances, mostly from Tuc Watkins and
Patricia Mauceri (the control-freak mother of the bride). Not
surprisingly, these two actors have a lot of experience from *One Life to
Live*, which also featured Josh Weinstein, the main character in the
director/writer Brian Sloan's *Pool Days*. Clearly, Mr. Sloan loves soaps
and especially *One Life to Live*, and that's very admirable. Also very
talented and funny is Guillermo Diaz (of *Party Girl* and *Stonewall*
fame), as the stoner who turns out to know a lot more than we think he
does.
The disappointment: What could have been a 1990s version of *Parting
Glances* is instead a bit diluted and uninteresting. While there are many
funny lines and moments, it is hard to understand what is intrinsically
interesting or compelling about most of these characters. We first meet
them as screwy college friends, and we fast forward to six or so years
later, without any bonding scenes up front--and they are still screwy. Bob
is Carol's "maid of honor," but we barely see them together in the
beginning. The supporting cast members have funny lines, but they are
almost a distraction to the main story, which is Bob as the object of
affection of two men--which is hard to understand. Even his lover Sterling
says, "He's dull." He seems to be in perpetual crisis. Believe me, if two
men were after me, I would see the crisis as an opportunity (two words,
according to Lisa Simpson, served by the same word in Chinese). Believe
me, if even one man was (miraculously) after me, I would not be in such
crisis.
In a rare move, New York stands in for DC (usually it's Toronto standing
in for the Big Apple). New York viewers with sharp eyes will note certain
locales as their hometown, and not DC. The director does go to DC, though,
and in one scene, it is apparent their equipment is far inferior to the
NYC equipment. Matt and Sterling are hardly audible at the Jefferson
Memorial until the camera goes into a medium shot. But, this is an indie
production. It's somewhat forgivable.
However, for all its faults, I would still recommend this movie. The
acting is pretty good, there are some wonderful lines, and in the end,
it's David vs. Goliath (Hollywood), and Brian Sloan has beat a lot of the
odds, and is probably someone to watch for in the future, as are some of
the actors (particularly Tuc Watkins, the best actor in the bunch).
NOTE: Some of the funniest "lines" come from the father of the bride, who
does all his acting with his voiceless face. Watch for them.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
Wendy Wasserstein's screenplay of *The Object of My Affection* has borne
out good movie. It's based upon Stephen MacCauley's novel of the same
name--one of my all-time favorites. The two works are, however, mutually
exclusive.
George Hansen (Paul Rudd) and Nina Barowski (Jennifer Aniston) are
introduced awkwardly at a dinner party, when George's lover Joley (Tim
Daly) breaks up with George via Nina. George discovers they have broken up
when Nina offers him a place to stay in her Brooklyn apartment. Luckily,
they soon become fast friends and actually get along much better with each
other than they do their respective mates. 
When Nina becomes pregnant by the overbearing Vince (John Pankow), she
ultimately decides she would rather have George raise the baby with her.
What ensues is a struggle for George--wanting some form of fatherhood or a
life of his own. 
Some people might object to the theme of the woman who goes over the
unobtainable man because it's safer than facing her own issues (a la My
Best Friend's Wedding). But, Nina comes to her own conclusions, and finds
a way to be happy. There is also the overused device of ending the film
in the future, and equalizing all the characters with fairy-tale happy
endings. 
Expecting the movie to be completely awful, based on advance press and
Wendy Wasserstein's admission that the George character was "a lump" and
that she decided to play up the Nina story more, I was pleasantly
surprised. Wasserstein's screenplay is both funny and touching, and the
performances by Rudd and Aniston save this film from being a complete
flop. In fact, Aniston's performance here alone was enough to win me as a
fan. She's quite endearing.
The supporting cast is also good: Tim Daly excels as the narcissistic
Joley; Allison Janney as Nina's stepsister Connie and Alan Alda as
Connie's husband do not overdo their comic roles. In fact, this is one of
the first times I have not wanted to see Ald a shot to death on film
(which he finally was in *Murder at 1600*). Nigel Hawthorne plays the
older drama critic who points out to Nina, "What happens when all these
homosexual men at your dinner table leave you for other men?" It's a nice
change from the "lonely gay man" image.
The weakest member of the cast is Amo Gulinello as Paul. It's hard to see
why he and George get together and fall in love. It's pretty clear that he
is only there to accentuate to Nina that George might not be hopeless
devoted to her for long, as she grows very jealous. 
One frustration with this adaptation is that George was meant to be a
lump--not a stud. There is little of MacCauley's sensibilities left in
this story. Paul Rudd is one of the cutest actors alive, and he can also
act. It's not difficult to see why both men and women would want to rope
him in. He is actually cuter than most of the men Nina goes out with; why
wouldn't she fall for him? It might have been more poignant of she fell
for a man who was both gay and not absolutely stunning; Paul Rudd is the
latter. 
Some of the best scenes are the ones in which Nina and George take dancing
lessons. It showed both their growing fondness for one another, as well
the passing seasons. Unfortunately, an otherwise funny and touching movie
experience is marred by two very poor editing mistakes. One occurs when
George and Paul go swimming, and the other is when we finally see Nina's
baby born. It is obvious some last-minute editing was going on, and there
is no excuse for such blunder in this day and age.
Bottom line: If you feel you must choose, read the book. You will probably
laugh a lot more at the self-deprecating humor of George.

Title
Review for Daytrippers, The (1996)
Seen on 26 July 1997 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide for $3 by myself.
Just after Thanksgiving, happy couple Louis (Stanley Tucci) and Eliza
(Hope Davis) make love; the following day she discovers what appears to be
a highly literate love note to her husband. How she deals with it and what
ensues is not realistic, but if you let that slide, you will enjoy the
film. What does she do? She immediately discusses the matter with the
whole family, who, since they were going into New York anyway, pile into
the station wagon and head for Louis' office.
The Malone family includes Rita (Anne Meara), Jim (Pat McNamara), younger
daughter Jo (Parker Posey), and her boyfriend Carl (Liev Schreiber). Their
journey is improbable and leads to some other implausible events a la
After Hours. But, the guaranteed overheard dialog is still engaging and
entertaining. First Eliza and Rita invade Louis publishing office. Later,
when tracking Louis down to a Soho apartment, the entire group winds up
invading the home of a young man who is hiding his deadbeat dad from the
authorities. 
And yes, they eventually invade the book party Louis is supposed to be at
later that night. All this in a car without a working heater. 
The movie's strengths are the dialogue and the pacing. It is a low-budget
independent feature, and the real-time telling of tales lends itself to
the no-money-for-editing look of the film. There is a drabness and
darkness (literally) that suits it well. A lot of the dialogue gems are in
the side stories and overheards.
The Daytrippers sums up the very American characteristic of spilling ones
guts to anyone and everyone: the publishing assistant recounting his
latest sexcapade; Eliza walks into a party and a guest (Marcia Gay Harden)
latches onto her for dear life. Rita, who is insufferable to everyone in
her family, hold back nothing to Rob and Leon, just after taking over
their kitchen. [Great line from her long-suffering husband: "For the love
of God, don't let her make soup!"]
Early on, true to his student nature, Carl pontificates how the middle
class is concerned with trivialities that keep them from meaningful
interaction. What he, and everyone else, learns is that being on vacation
is enough to make relationships buckle or unravel.
This is writer/director Greg Mottola's first feature-length effort. For
what it is, it succeeds. The casting is good: Anne Meara dominates as the
shrewish Rita; Liev Schreiber is as convincing as the novelist wannabe
college boyfriend as he was as one of the kidnappers in Ransom; Parker
Posey works well as the rebellious, quirky, and annoyed Jo. Campbell Scott
(a co-producer) makes two appearances as a writer.
Also noteworthy is Richard Martinez's music, which makes a ride on the
Long Island Expressway feel like some sort of dream or fairytale (believe
me, it's not). 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY  10021,
sethbook@panix.com.
More movie reviews are available at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html.

Title
Review for Julia (1977)
Seen several times on Bravo in June 1998.
*Julia* is quite simply one of the most haunting films you might ever see.
Based on a true series of events in the life of playwright Lillian
Hellman, it is the story of the deep relationship between the writer and
her childhood friend Julia, the granddaughter  of superwealthy
industrialists. Julia, despite her upbringing, bristles at injustice and
social inequities, and in Vienna in the late 1930s, this places her in
great danger. She leaves behind her medical schooling to go underground,
helping various antifascist movements with her wealth.
The story is told via he memories of Lillian, as she struggles to write in
a beachfront cottage she shares with her lover Dashiell Hammett (Jason
Robards). The memories we see show why they are such close friends.
Vanessa Redgrave's portrayal of Julia is astounding. And as Lillian tells
us, she has one of the most beautiful faces we have ever seen. Julia, in
Redgrave's hands, is both passionate and sensitive, adding great depth to
her bravery, and her tragedy.
Jane Fonda is equally powerful as Lillian. Among the best scenes are when
she is frantically trying to find our what's happened to Julia after Julia
has been assaulted in Vienna by fascists, resulting in her losing a leg. 
Lillian goes to Vienna and demands  information from the tacit medical
staff.  A lot of this is repeated later when she tried to fulfill a final
promise to Julia.
Lillian does finally get her play written and it's a success. And when
she's in Europe, her friendship is put to the test when she suddenly finds
herself in the cloak-and-dagger world of smuggling money from Paris to
Berlin for Julia on her way to Moscow. The final meeting of the two women
is also riveting. Lillian wants to recapture the essence of the old days,
and Julia, out of necessity, has to maintain espionage vigilance and a
watchful eye. 
Director by Fred Zinnemann adds greatly to the film by making the
storyline nonlinear. Flashbacks are well placed. For example, as Lillian
in on her tense train ride, not knowing who she can trust, there are
memories of another journey where Lillian almost falls off a log into
rushing water and Julia is there to help her through it. It's subtle and
spellbinding. 
*Julia* was nominated for several awards and won Redgrave an
Oscar--resulting in her controversial acceptance speech that made her
persona non grata for many years. *Julia* is also notable for Meryl
Streep's accent-free debut.
Written by Alvin Sargent; based on Lillian Hellman's novel Pentimento.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Devil and Daniel Webster, The (1941)
(black and white, and known by a variety of other names, including All
That Money Can Buy)
I don't always review every movie I see on television, but having seen
Devil's Advocate the night before, I felt compelled to make the necessary
comparisons.
For those of you who don't know the story: Poor New Hampshire farmer Jabez
Stone (James Craig) is about to lose his farm to foreclosure. He has even
used all of the butter and egg money his optimistic, devoted wife Mary
(Anne Shirley) has set aside, but it is no use. His Ma (Jane Darwell),
despite his troubles, won't tolerate his exclamation "consarnit!" Uttering
aloud that he would sell his soul to the Devil for two cents, the Dark One
appears, in the folksy form of Mr. Scratch (Walter Huston). It's your
basic "deal-with-the-devil" storyline. As Jabez enjoys seven years of
prosperity, he grows greedy and cruel. The neighbors he once happily
helped are practically his slaves a few years later.  Craig is able to
pull off a range of qualities--sympathetic, cocky and arrogant, desperate. 
He begins to disrespect his wife and mother and turns all his attentions
to the sultry Belle (played coquettishly by Simone Simon). He builds her a
mansion and practically allows her to raise his son, whose hobby is
harming all animals great and small. Jabez gives up church--while his wife
and mother pray, he and Belle host card games at home.
Meanwhile, Mr. Scratch would love to get his hands on Daniel Webster
(Edward Arnold), the New Hampshire politician who might very well be
President one day. He also happens to have a namesake and godson in young
Daniel Stone. So, when Jabez' seven years are almost up and he panics,
Mr. Webster agrees to help him and gives an impassioned oratory against
Mr. Scratch's handpicked (and now famous) Jury of the Damned.
The story is extremely simple in its morality, but it is very absorbing
thanks to its style. Black and white accentuates the light and shadows.
The darks are pitch black and the brights are luminous. Underscoring (no
pun intended) it all is the Oscar-winning score by Bernard
Herrmann--especially noteworthy in the scene in which Daniel is born and
Belle arrives from "over the mountain." 
It is also interesting to see how Allied  propaganda ensconced itself in
this film, even before we got involved in the war. Daniel Webster is the
smart politician who is perfectly at home with even the poorest citizen,
and above all, a virtuous American. His particular disgust for Benedict
Arnold, the only Juror of the Damned who seems ashamed to be seen, is a
glaring giveaway.
The ballroom scene is also one of its most memorable. If you have a chance
to catch this film on TV or video, do so.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Seen on 3 July 1997 with Andrea for $8.75 at the SONY 84th St. theatre,
where MiB played in all six threatres.
My initial fear: Once again I was going on opening weekend to an already
overhyped movie, another idiotic supersummermegablockbuster with "hit"
written all over it simply because a lot of money has been put into
advertising and Newsweek has seen fit to ignore North Korean famine and
put Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones on their cover last week. 
Needless to say I was very pleasantly surprised. 
The writing was quickly paced and witty; the special effects were
excellent; all the performances on target. The likelihood of a sequel
welcome. The only thing missing, thank god, were the fag jokes.
In *Men in Black*, Earth is a planet-sized safe house for a variety of
aliens, most of whom are conveniently located in the New York Metropolitan
Area. A special unit, the Men in Black, keep track of alien activity and
keep the world "safe for humanity." This involves chasing down renegades
and making humans forget they ever saw anything. This has some emotional
price, though: all MiBs must cut off all ties with their lives and
dedicate themselves to their task, using the *Star* and the *National
Enquirer* as authoritative news sources. 
Kay (Tommy Lee Jones) recruits NYPD officer James Edwards (who becomes
Jay) t. His agility and offbeat ways suit their needs, and
K and Zed (Rip Torn) decide to mold him into one of their agents.
By the second day on the job, though, the world is in danger, and it is up
to J and K to save it. They inadvertently get help from Laurel (Linda
Fiorentino), a NYC coroner who prefers the dead, and sometimes a cat, to
the most living humans.
Just as Jay and Kay are introduced in dramatic fashion, so is the villain,
whose ship crashes into farmer Edgar's (Vincent D'Onofrio) truck. Edgar's
body is quickly used as a host to an intergalactic giant cockroach who has
come to assassinate an alien royal and start interplanetary war. He sort
of "deteriorates" along they way, so the talented but hard to place
D'Onofrio (Household Saints, Full Metal Jacket) is even harder to place
here, as his voice sounds more like Christopher Lloyd's than his own. 
There is something joyous about a movie that hits so many marks so well. 
The dialogue crackles without sagging under innuendo (like Batman &
Robin). The opening sequence, accompanied by Danny Elfman's score (great
as always), draws you in, and almost every scene succeeds, whether it is
involving special effects, sight gags, or truly evocative mise-en-scene
(note the later scene in the coroner's office). New York City is used in
every outdoor shot, but it is not the New York people are used to seeing
in the movies--the Bridge and Tunnel Authority building, the armory on
25th Street, the rotting ruins of the 1964 World's Fair (used in the
finale).
Men in Black comes at a perfect time, when UFO movies abound, The X Files
is part of the national consciousness, and the Roswell incident celebrates
its fiftieth anniversary. It's a relief not to see the "unravelling
conspiracy" scenario for the umpteenth time, and it's fun to watch Jones,
Smith, Fiorentino, and Torn chew the scenery.
Major Motiion Picture Distractions: Sat next to a man who sucked his teeth
and laughed like the cartoon character Muttley. I am sure that explained
his sex appeal, as he had a young lady friend in tow. He snacked on
pretzel nuggets and spilled salt all over his pants. How dreamy.
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Title
Review for Notti di Cabiria, Le (1957)
(a/k/a Nights of Cabiria, Italy 1957 Black and White)
It was a beautiful summer evening, so I figured I would spend it at the
movies. So I figured I should go to the movies. But, with *Bulworth*,
*Clockwatchers*, and even *Wilde* all suddenly gone by mid-July, and *The
Mask of Zorro* not out yet, my only viable choice was a restored classic
of Italian neorealism--*Nights of Cabiria*.
When you don't know a lot about director Federico Fellini, it might be
easy to be scared off. However, *Nights of Cabiria* sends a message so
universal and stirring you would have to be either an idiot or have a
heart of stone not to love this movie, or at least not understand it. 
The title character is a prostitute named Maria "Cabiria" Ceccarelli
(played by Fellini's wife, Giulietta Masina). While we are used to seeing
prostitutes being portrayed as drug addicts or abuse victims, the sense
here is that even 12 years after World War II, prostitution is a matter of
economics. Cabiria is a bit different from the other hookers at the
Passegiata Archeologica. She actually owns her rectangular cinder-block
house on a dirt road on the outskirts of Rome. She assiduously avoids
falling into the clutches of pimps who offer protection. But she is
foolish in one way. She's a fool for love. The film opens with Cabiria
being tossed into a canal and left for drowned by her latest "beau", who
has also run off with a lot of her money.
The sense here is that the nights of Cabiria are not just the nights she
spends on the streets and having dreamlike experiences; she has a lot of
restless nights of the soul, too, as she is endless in her quest for true
love.
Cabiria sees the highs and lows in 1957 Roma. She spends a chaste evening
with a movie star Alberto Lazzari (Amedeo Nazzari) one night, and winds up
wandering the streets, dumped by a john in the countryside, the next. She
gets rambunctious with her hooker friends, and just as quickly accompanies them
to a religious pilgrimage to beg the Virgin's mercy and grace. She also
sees two possibilities for herself--the adored mistress of a film star, or
the aged prostitute living in a hole in the ground, waiting for the
kindness of strangers that helps her survive.
There are also some hits to organized religion. The pilgrimage has a
carnival air to it and the much hoped-for miracle of change does not come
to Cabiria, who gets more out of her chance encounters with a Good
Samaritan and a kooky priest on the street than she does from the Roman
Catholic Church proper.
Finally, Cabiria winds up at a hypnotist's show and her true essence is
revealed on stage. She promptly winds up courted by Oscar D'Onofrio
(Francois Prier), who pursues her relentlessly and asks her few
questions. He seems almost too good to be true; but over time he seems to 
provide an out for Cabiria, saving her with true love. 
Two things stand out here. First is Masina's performance. She is an
endearing Italian Lucille Ball, with a wonderful comic face and a quality
of universal pathos and empathy. It's obvious from the way she is filmed
how much Fellini loved her (and why they died five months apart). Second,
the reaffirmation of the wonders of life and the resilience of the human
spirit are amply shown. *Nights of Cabiria* is told with kindness and
affection, and should not be missed. 
Written by Federico Fellini, Ennio Flaiano, Pier Paolo Pasolini, and
Tullio Pinelli. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
Seen on 31 December 1997 with Tony for free at the Loews Village VII
As 007 movies go, *Tomorrow Never Dies* provides is a lively entry with
the sexually appealing Pierce Brosnan in his second outing as the fourth
James Bond to grace the series. For reasons that are not completely clear
to me, I have seen a lot of action/adventure movies this year, but this is
the one that *intentionally* made me laugh. Unlike American pictures, the
Brits prove once again that a keen whit can coexist with explosions. I was
laughing within the first five minutes, and the mile-high flames ensued
about three minutes afterward. 
In general, if you've seen one 007 movie, you have seen them all. What
separates them is the strength of the characters and the execution of the
formula. Here, media mogul Elliot Carver (Jonathan Pryce) engineers the
makings of World War III between China and the UK by rearranging GPS
signals, forcing the Chinese to think their waters are being breached,
while manipulating the British into thinking they sank their destroyer,
when he sank it himself. 
Like most 007 movies, the movie makes the most of location shooting, with
a parking garage car chase in Hamburg and a helicopter-motorcycle chase in
Bangkok, after a spectacular fall from an office tower. 
As James Bond, Pierce Brosnan is probably the most sexually appealing of
the actors to play the role of the British agent. He is prone to wearing
open denim shirts than tuxedos and suits like his predecessors. The "Bond
Girls" this time around are the horrible Teri Hatcher as Carver's wife
"Paris," and the formidable Michelle Yeoh as Chinese agent Wai Lin. 
Luckily, Hatcher disappears after the first reel, and seeing Yeoh and
Brosnan handcuffed together on a motorcycle while being chased by a
helicopter was very entertaining. 
The villains are equally good. Pryce is perfectly cast as the billionaire
maniac, a 1990s *Dr. No*, assisted by the evil Stamper (Gutz Otto), an
able successor to 007 villains like Jaws or Odd Job. Carver's visage
appears in a variety of places throughout the movie, projected on TV
screens and hanging from the side of a skyscraper, much like Big Brother
in *1984*.  Also requisite is the 007 gadgetry, and they outdo themselves
this time as Q (Desmond Llewelyn--who has played Q since 1964's
*Goldfinger*) presents Bond with a car he can operate with a finger on a
touchpad on his cellular phone. Judi Dench continues nicely as Bond's boss
tough M, as does Samantha Bond as Moneypenny. Joe Don Baker appears
briefly as a buffoonish American military man.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Seen on 30 July 1998 with Andrea at the SONY Lincoln Square for $9
Knowing that Out of Sight was from "the makers of Get Shorty" was like
saying "from the makers of Illtown starring Tony Danza." Most everyone I
know (okay, just Cathy), hated Get Shorty, but many liked this one. So, I
caved in to the demands of a boring summer, moviewise, as American-made
summer fare goes, and parted with $9. 
Well, no one told me Steven Soderbergh directed it, did they? Out of Sight
lived up to the positive word of mouth, and while I enjoyed it and
recommend it, now that I am out of the cool glow of the movie screen, I
cannot tell you why I enjoyed it so much.
Well, three things. First, there's the very interesting camera work for
which Soderbergh (sex, lies, and videotape, and Kafka) is known. Second,
the utterly charming George Clooney's characterization of Jack Foley, who
assiduously talks bank tellers into handing over lots of unmarked bills
taking advantage of his observations yet never raising his voice, or a
gun. Third, some of the writing was just superb. Clooney's interaction
with his co-stars is a lot of fun to listen to. His flirtation with Lopez
while actively evading her was entertaining, however unrealistic.
So what didn't I like? Well, charm and sex appeal aside, what makes a
smart US Marshall like Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) risk it all to help
out a felon? Yeah, exactly. Makes no sense. So Out of Sight might just be
referring to the many ways we get to see her, cop with an hourglass
figure, slink around in what is clearly not regulation uniform, toting a
rifle.
Also, the easy-to-follow-yet-complex plot is interesting, well paced but
not exactly engrossing. This is one of the two dozen adaptations of Elmore
Leonard's novels for the big screen since 1957, and after seeing Jackie
Brown, and seeing my brother dozing through it, that was not an attraction
either.
But, it is good summer moviegoing or future rental fare, for light, fluffy
entertainment with a little bite and a less than predictable plot. Above
average for what it is, but not compelling either. Catherine Keener, Luis
Guzman, Dennis Farina, Michael Keaton, Albert Brooks, Samuel L. Jackson,
and Nancy Allen turn in good performances, in roles of varying
performance.
Also noteworthy: original music by David Holmes (IV) and interesting
cinematography by Elliot Davis.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Seen on 25 December 1997 with Tony for $8.75 + 1.50 Teleticket at the
Loews Astor in Times Square.
In ancient Rome, big spectacles kept people entertained. Sometimes, they
even recreated great naval battles, like the one at Actium, sinking a ship
if necessary. An artificial lake would be made, and a mock battle would
ensue, ships sinking, etc., all to the delight of the crowd.
*Titanic* is the most expensive movie made to date--more than $200
million. Director James Cameron has been captivated by the worst maritime
disaster in history. He built a replica of the ship 90 percent to scale.
He waived his own fees to get it made.  It endured audience testing and
re-editing after a stalled Summer 1997 release. I saw many previews and
anxiously awaiting my chance to see it.
So why did James Cameron raise the most dramatic story of the sea, only to
weight it down and sink its true potential with a teen romance,
action/adventure moves, and misrepresentation of what happened?
But before I go into all that, here's what's great about the movie. As
spectacles go, *Titanic* delivers one that is first class. The lush
opulence of the Titanic is recreated in great detail. The special effects
are absolutely stunning. Watching the great boat sink is something you
won't soon forget. From the moment the boat hits the iceberg to the the
time the lifeboats go back to find survivors and drift through the
bobbing, lifejacketed, frozen corpses or the "Unsinkable's" passengers,
you will be absolutely amazed at this recreation. Also, the scenes of the
ship enjoying its maiden voyage on the open sea is a real treat also,
because you get a good sense of how mammoth the Titanic was, and why it
was called the "Ship of Dreams."
The movie, however, revolves around the fictional love story of
first-class passenger Rose DeWitt Bukater and steerage vagabond Jack
Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), a world-traveler who has never shaved. Rose is
engaged to wealthy American snob Cal Hockley (Billy Zane, in too much
make-up) so she and her mother Ruth (Frances Fisher) can stay in the life
to which they are accustomed.
The Titanic's real passengers, the collision with the iceberg, the
sinking, and the aftermath are all much more compelling, and better
covered in a wonderful three-hour documentary on A&E cable TV. Also,
Titanic has several inaccuracies, like when the ship splits in half. Of
course, who wants to spend $10.25 to *not* see the ship split in half
above the waterline? In reality, it happened below the water's surface. No
one knew the ship split in two until the 1980s, when the sunken vessel was
finally found.
Because the audience testing clearly indicated that teenagers are the
target audience, the love story becomes paramount, and none of us are
spared the sort of action-adventure we are used to seeing from Cameron in
movies like *Terminator 2*. It is very hard to believe that the two young
class-crossed lovers would have as much energy as they do, what with
running through flooded passageways, breaking down gates, fleeing the
scorned fiance, etc., escaping *every* conceivable peril. In fact, it is
unlikely that these two passengers, one first class the other steerage,
would ever have met; class-conscious British boats like this kept people
firmly in their place. 
Also amusing and improbable is the framing device of the story being told
in flashback by a 101-year-old Rose (Gloria Stuart) to Brock Lovett (Bill
Paxton) and his crew, who have located the submerged wreck and have found
her through a sketch Jack had made of her and a gigantic diamond, a sketch
retrieved via robotic arm in a safe her old stateroom from the ocean
floor. Real footage of the ship on the ocean floor is used, and the
computerized dissolves from the embarnacled ship's railing to the brand
new ones on the maiden voyage are very well done. 
Many opportunities are missed to capture the real dramas that unfolded. It
also seems as if some key scenes wound up on the editing room floor. For
example, we see an old couple on a bed together as their room fills with
water, but we never really saw them before. Undoubtedly these are the
famous Strauses (owners of Macy's); the wife refusing to get on a lifeboat
when she had the chance, to stay with her husband of 40+ years of
marriage. Also, there is no sort of epilogue, no text telling us how the
disaster resulted in international laws ensuring lifeboat space for all
aboard ocean vessels; nothing of the inquiry into the disaster, nothing of
the press sensation and how the media pilloried the White Star Line's
executive, Bruce Ismay in print.  Ismay exhorted the captain to make
headlines by pushing the engines to the limit; instead, the ship hit the
iceberg with no chance of avoiding it.  Apparently, it was going too fast,
and the lookouts had no binoculars, and there was no time to turn the ship
in time.
So, for all the money it cost to make this film, it ends up being a *Jerry
Maguire* at sea, with romance for the ladies and action for the guys and
little or nothing to do with the White Star Line's push to get noticed in
the press or with the many preventable disasters that befell the ship. 
As for the performances, the most spirited one, for as much as we get to
see her is Kathy Bates as the down-to-earth American millionnaire--the
"unsinkable" Molly Brown. The principal actors of the love triangle do
what they are supposed to do, but I was not really moved by them. The best
performance in Titanic is the ship itself, and it is so well done, you
won't be disappointed.

Title
Review for Journal du sducteur, Le (1996)
The Seducer's Diary/Le Journal du Seducteur
France, 1995; French with English subtitles
There is always a point in a movie where you sort of know
"it's downhill from here," and this movie is full of them. For
me it was when various organs were pulled out of a corpse. For Tony it was
seeing the hickey on Claire's (Chiara Mastroianni) neck in her analyst's
office. If you were to judge Paris by the characters in this movie, you
would assume the whole city was stark raving mad. Almost everyone seems
to have a problem, a crazed look, or something to hide. These are often
interesting elements in good movies; here is is more annoying than anything
else. The only really funny, well-written moment is when the analyst (Hubert
Saint-Macary), completely distracted by the book Claire has left with him,
blows off a new client by succinctly summarizing that life is rather pointless,
and that in time he will get over being lovelorn and find someone else.
The movie is well filmed and finds isolated parts of Paris
that accentuate the creepiness of most of the characters. The entire diegetic
time of the film is the visit to Rue Mazarin by analyst Hubert with his
doctor; Hubert is trying to remember something that has happened to him;
the entire movie then is a flashback that explains how he got into this
state,but in a very roundabout way. Hubert turns out to be the least of
the story. There is Gregoire, who seduces Claire and others by giving them
a copy of Kierkegaard's "Diary of a Seducer." Then there is slacker
Sebastian, who cons his way into Claire's house so he can sleep on their
couch, and eventually wants to con his way into her mother's (Anne, played
by the film's director, Daniele Dubroux) bed. There are various other characters
weaving in and out of the intermingled and uninteresting plots--Robert,
the creepy neighbor of Gregoire; Diane, the crazed grandmother of Gregoire;
Hugo, the suicidal gun-toting professor (a wasted cameo by Jean-Pierre Leaud,
famous for his portrayal of Antoine Doinel in several Truffaut movies).
Sometimes directors are successful in creating psychological thrillers where
you are taken through a labyrinthian storyline that has a great payoff,
like House of Games, or Hitchcock's Stage Fright;
but Daniele Dubroux, whose credits and accomplishments are not as numerous
as those more famous directors, is still going to have to prove herself.

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
One benchmark of movie success is the ability to inspire an audience. *Il
Postino* spurred more than a few people to investigate poetry. People
leaving the theatre attempted a few waltz steps right out front. (This is
the same place people wept on the curb after *Fearless*.) It's too soon to
know just how many Japanese have taken to the dancefloors, but *Shall We
Dance?* did sweep Japan's version of the Oscars. 
The opening voice-over informs us that rigid Japanese society (remember
the popular phrase, "The nail that stands up gets hammered down" came from
there) is such that a married couple rarely touches in public, much less
dance.  Couples don't even privately say "I love you" all that much. 
Such is the rut of Shohei Sugiyama (Koji Yakusho), who is married with
child, has a boring accounting job in an overcrowded Tokyo office, and has
"imprisoned"  himself by buying a house (apparently quite a feat for the
Japanese bourgeois). 
Life runs like a train on its track, until the evening Sugiyama sees Mai
Kishikawa (Tamiyo Kusakari) staring forelornly out of the window of a
dance studio. Bewitched, Sugiyama looks up each night to see whether or
not she is there. Temptation forces him off his subway car and up the
stairs and is quite hilariously and literally thrown into the studio; he
signs up for some beginners' courses.
A lively comedy ensues as Sugiyama immerses himself into amateur dancing,
eventually competing. His new acquaintances include the overweight
diabetic Tanaka (Hiromasa Taguchi) whose doctor suggested dancing as
exercise, and an older know-it-all;  the kindly older Tamako (Reiko
Kusamura) who runs the school and Toyoko (Eriko Watanabe), the Rubenesque,
tart-tongued fellow student, who has a harsh word for just about everyone.
All of these types make a nice recipe for comedy, drama, and some gushy,
sentimental moments. 
A society that demonizes dancing more taboo the way sexual orientation is
here is hard to imagine. But it's easier to imagine than *Footloose*, a
town where dancing is forbidden. The Japanese "instinctively" know not to
do this sort of thing. When the crazed dancer at the classes turns out of
the systems administrator Aoki (Naoto Takenaka), he and Sugiyama guard
their secret, afraid of being "outed." They instinctively know ridicule
and shame can follow. Accordingly, the camera keeps it's distance and
close-ups are used to underscore the drama. The full frame is utilized,
and watch for funny little things happening off to the side apart from the
main action. 
Meanwhile, as Sugiyama dances, his wife gets more and more suspicious. She
winds up hiring a very sympathetic private detective. 
Overall, this is an excellent movie. All the performances hit their
intended marks; the potential for abusing physical comedy is avoided--we
are spared a Blake Edwards movie. 
My sole complaint is that the movie comes to a snorestill at two distinct
times:  Once to literally read a letter, and the other to hear a true
confessions soliloquy. These are only minor drawbacks, though to one of
the most enjoyable films I have seen this summer. 
Dance, don't walk, to a theatre near you!
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
  Seen on 20 September 1997 at the Cineplex Baronet Coronet for free.
   What has an ensemble cast, pointless flashbacks, a love of policemen,
   90 minutes to bore an audience to death, has only two funny moments,
   one overblown dramatic moment, and stinks? No, it's not Mayor
   Giuliani's campaign. It's Cop Land. A lot of people were leaving the
   theatre within the first half hour. Of course, it was free to anyone
   who was there for the preview. I would have left, but I rarely leave a
   theatre, and besides, I had to see if this would be the worst movie I
   have seen since Excess Baggage.
   Cop Land would probably read better than it films. The high-concept
   premise here is that Garrison, NJ (not it's real name) is a town of
   1280 people, mostly police (all of whom are white) and their families
   and embroiled in a deep cover up. Already, the prospect of watching
   corrupt straight white men is unappealing; I could just watch the news
   every night and review that.
   Sheriff Freddy Heflin (Sylvester Stallone) is the "law" in
   Garrison, and he has a childlike trust in those who have empowered him
   to guard the American Dream. The worst thing that happens to him is
   bumping his nose on the steering wheel while swerving to miss a deer
   caught in his headlights. But the American Dream, in this case, is
   built an a lie. Oooooo. How shocking. Corrupt cops (Harvey Keitel, Ray
   Liotta, Peter Berg, etc.) work in New York City, which they hate, and
   come home to be above the law to a town across the George Washington
   Bridge, which, oh so ironically, overlooks New York.
   The plot thickens when hero cop "Superboy" (Michael Rappoport) screws
   up and is forced fake his own death after killing two delinquent,
   reckless, but ultimately harmless black youth. Lots of subplots and
   "buddy boy" nonsense ensues. The film takes its sweet time and when
   Freddy finally figures out he is living in a gangster movie, it is too
   late to care. That he is deaf in one ear, the result of saving the
   love of his teen years, who married some other putz, keeps him off the
   NYPD he reveres, and out of our sympathies.
   Ultimately, Cop Land is something that would have been a great book,
   but is in fact, a dreadful movie. There are simply too many characters
   and subplots to keep track of or care about. I watch soap operas and
   read 19th Century Russian novels, but this was too much of a
   challenge. There are so many other ways to watch stories like these,
   and one springs to mind. NYPD Blue. Tuesday nights on ABC, 10 Eastern,
   9 Central. Slow and steady builds audience interest. Throwing dressed
   up pigs (no pun intended) in the form of an All-Star cast into this
   mishmash was a real waste. The only actor missing from this mix was
   Steve Buscemi.
   One of Three Woman Shown in the Cast: Cathy Moriarity, who is often
   seen holding a drink or looking like she ought to be.
   Most Annoyed Actor with a Bad Haircut: Robert De Niro as the very
   exasperated Internal Affairs officer with a very very very bad
   haircut.
   Smartest Actor: Janeane Garofolo, as the Sheriff's Deputy who does the
   only logical thing in the movie; she leaves town.
   Best Ironic Line: Ray Liotta tells Stallone that there are two kinds
   of people in this world: Video game players and pinball players. I
   guess those were the intended audience members.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Seen with Byron for $3 on 21 August 1997 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide.
A review of this movie would be pretty much similar to those for the first
(Jurassic Park), except that this is even worse. To quote Bart Simpson,
"it's crappy crap crap crap."  Four years after the Lost World theme park
was destroyed by genetically revived dinosaurs running amok, ruining a big
investment, and killing a few people, it turns out "something has
survived." Actually, it turns out dinosaurs were also bred on nearby on a
nearby, also off Costa Rica. Sort of the alpha version of the Jurassic
Park, which was destroyed many many opening weekends ago. The movie opens
briskly by putting a little girl in jeopardy and then cuts away without
showing what has happened to her. A bad sign. 
The principal character now is Dr. Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum), who winds
up back on the island when John Hammond (Richard Attenborough) convinces
Ian's girlfriend Dr. Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore) to document the
dinosaurs in actions. She is a paleontologist on the go. Along with two
other photographers, they are going to show what the island is like
without man's interference. It turns out the bad folks at Ingen want to
resurrect the theme park idea, where tourists would happily pay to see
T-Rex--in San Diego.
When the corporate bad guys show up, the movie takes the first of many
tragic turns into laughability. It's a labyrinth of conflicting incohesive
theme.  The environmentalists versus the evil corporate slant. There are
lots of ridiculous plots in here: Malcolm returning to do relay races with
dinosaurs, now with stowaway black daughter in tow (putting a child at
risk for "dramatic effect" is a longstanding cinema faux pas); Sarah's
insisting on setting the broken leg of a baby T-Rex, not believing its Ma
and Pa will hunt it down and actually be dangerous (this is when Byron
exclaimed that she should be the first to get eaten); a T-Rex is holed up
in the boat's cargo bay, so how does it kill people at the helm (leaving
just a hand on the wheel) without any destruction on the ship?
A slew of stereotypes ensue as well. The bad guys invariably have British
accents, like Pete Postlewaite as Roland Tembo, whose dream is to hunt a
buck T-Rex. Time for a new dream, bub.  There's the wide-eyed black man
running from the T-Rex in San Diego that evokes the "manservant" from
jungle movies yelling "da Mummy is on da loose!" There's the
mambo-listening hispanic inexplicably named "Carter."  There are the
panicky Asian tourists, with cameras, fleeing the T-Rex. I guess they only
expect Godzilla in Tokyo.
It's insulting to expect us to suspend all disbelife and care too. If you
want to create a tense thriller with great special effects and lifelike
dinosaurs, do that, but don't throw machismo, blended families and their
traumas, conservation politics, and impossible feats of agility at us in a
noisy mishmash. If grown men are plucked out of cars and torn asunder, can
we really believe a 12-year-old girl can conquer an overgrown lizard with
her gymnastics routine?
The only worthwhile portion of the movie is the overlong scene where
Sarah's life is literally hinging on the shattering of a windowpane.  Of
course it steals from other masters, but it works, until it goes on far
longer than it should. 
The Lost World represents two hours plus that I can never reclaim, with an
idiotic unendurable moralizing finale. Luckily, with Wondee Siam around
the corner, we able to bolt the theatre and have something to look forward
to. 
Note: As in the case of Career Girls, this Cineplex Odeon theatre showed a
"Mr. Bean" short before the previews. 
Copyright (c) 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021, sethbook@panix.com
More film reviews by Seth J. Bookey can be seen at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
People are gushing over this movie and it all seems so undeserved. Without
giving too much away, the movie's theme and subsequent plot equals its
tagline "Can you really trust anyone?" Apparently not. You cannot even
trust David Mamet. 
My biggest problems with The Spanish Prisoner were two: The film is very
stagy and unexciting in its presentation. It's unswervingly flat. While
it's nice not to be manipulated by music and editing now and then, this
Spartan approach is a bit uninvolving as it continues past 30 minutes
through the conclusion of the film. There is unforgivably complete lack of
filmwork, like editing and camera movement. While it adds to the cinema
verite unemotional presentation of a con game, it prompts less and less
audience investment as it moves towards its inevitable conclusion. 
The other problem is that this film is a lot like another Mamet film:
*House of Games*. Its a bit much to see a director steal from his own
repertoire. You expect that from Brian DiPalma (I am one of eight people
who saw *Raising Cain*, so I should know). The idea that you never really
know someone and it's difficult to trust others is hit home here, as in
the older movie, and we are hit over the head with this repeatedly. That
people are taken in easily is nothing new; that it can be this perfectly
orchestrated stretches common sense, though.
In its favor, there are some wonderfully quirky moments and some genuine
laughs. Most of these come from the office ingenue, Susan Ricci (the
ironically named Rebecca Pidgeon). The movie begins with the arrival of
Joe Ross (the lead role played by Campbell Scott) to a ritzy Carribean
isle--St. Estaphe. It's a business retreat also attended by the paranoid
boss Klein (Ben Gazzara) and George Lang (Ricky Jay), Joe's co-worker and
friend, who is constantly spouting off aphorisms, some humorous and some
ridiculous.
While on the island, Joe falls into a odd, close friendship with the
mysterious Jimmy Dell. The action moves to New York, where after some odd
run-ins with Dell, Joe starts to realize that something is afoot, and the
secret patent-pending formula is is working on is in danger. There is a
very odd feeling of homoerotica (I don't think it's just my pink glasses
getting in the way here) between Joe and Jimmy; that Jimmy is conning him
and Joe is falling for it and that there is some attraction for Jimmy from
Joe are not coincidental. The only other chemistry Joe has is with THE
IDEA that Jimmy wants his sister to date Joe, a man Jimmy approves for
her.
I cannot say much more without ruining the movie. I will say this, though;
it's not worth full price. See it with coupons or sneak in (like someone I
know did), or wait for TV or video. I would normally never recommend this,
but it's so utterly uncinematic and flat that rushing to the cinema to see
it seems unnecessary. 
With a good director and a good cast, you would think this movie would be
a lot better. I expect so much more from David Mamet, who usually produces
excellent work, like he did in last year's The Edge.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html
